_	In the fourth canto, while speaking to Sujāta, Uddālaka says – the notion that the disabled are a burden on family and not worthy of attention will decay the world.
_	The initial development of CEON was based on the notion that early successes will be met by facilitating the activities of existing environmental sites and networks active in the Arctic and increasing the potential for integration and syntheses between sites.
_	The stark opposite to the Sapir–Whorf position is the notion that thought (or, more broadly, mental content) has priority over language.
_	Another related concept is heteronormativity, the notion that the masculine and feminine genders as well as heterosexual orientation are the social norm.
_	Contrary to the notion that environmental protection is bad for the economy and jobs, the worst sources of environmental harm are commonly due to a surprisingly small fraction of all economic activity—and to an even smaller fraction of the jobs.
_	Aaron Weisburd, who founded Internet Haganah, criticized the term, writing: "The problem is that the term jihobbyist conveys the notion that these guys are not serious, that they do not constitute a threat.
_	However, it also supported the notion that the concentration of heavy water in a number of the barrels was too small to be of value to a weapons program.
_	They may be alternately referred to as verbal tics or vocal tics, but most diagnosticians prefer the term "phonic tics" to reflect the notion that the vocal cords are not involved in all tics that produce sound.
_	On the set, the notion that the characters should not develop or improve throughout the series was expressed as the "no hugging, no learning" rule.
_	Peter's visits to the West impressed upon him the notion that European customs were in several respects superior to Russian traditions.
_	Montague was outraged at the notion that perfectly healthy men would have the audacity to pretend that they had served His Majesty and pretend that they had been injured to win respect, sympathy and the possible affections of a young woman.
_	His colleague from sister-publication "The Guardian" disagreed, calling it "empowering platitudes", whilst a writer for "Metro" also agreed that the song was empowering, saying "[it] supports the notion that if you holler and stomp loudly enough, it’s really empowering."
_	As stated by Poulakos, Prepon deals with the notion that "what is said must conform to both audience and occasion."
_	In a follow-up study, the authors tested the notion that schizophrenia is the result of a genetic by environmental interaction, that is that insults in utero may be specifically stressful to persons with a brain vulnerability to schizophrenia.
_	This was possibly the first study to support the notion that earlier findings of brain abnormalities in schizophrenia were not only etiologically significant but related to early environmental factors (such as pregnancy and birth complications or in utero insults), and that pathogenesis was related to factors that could be prevented.
_	Public Surveys conducted by WPO in 2008 also revealed that 79% of the Americans were of the notion that a major shift to alternative sources of energy is economically beneficial in the long run .
_	This was the notion that because some prominent person in the past said something must be so, then that was the way it was, and anything one observed to the contrary was an anomaly (which was paralleled by a similar shift in European society in general – see Copernicus's rejection of Ptolemy's theories on astronomy).
_	The term "six sigma process" comes from the notion that if one has six standard deviations between the process mean and the nearest specification limit, as shown in the graph, practically no items will fail to meet specifications.
_	As such, the notion that 3-MeO-PCP has opioid activity has been described as a myth.
_	However, he wrongly posed the notion that the water was evaporating.
_	He proposes that the 2008 financial crisis compounded this position; rather than catalyzing a desire to seek alternatives for the existing model, the response to the crisis reinforced the notion that modifications must be made within the existing system.
_	At the same time the Committee recommended that the Psychological Strategy Board, created in 1951, be abolished because that Board had apparently been founded on the notion that psychological activities and strategy existed apart from official policies and actions, a concept repudiated by the Committee.
_	This has led to the notion that white light can be defined as a mixture of "all colors" or "all visible wavelengths".
_	Bariso wrote that "the theory that homosexuality is a disorder is not novel but — like the notion that the earth is flat and the sun revolves around it — instead is outdated and refuted".
_	Wanting to be an adventurer like his grandpa, Nat, defying the notion that "Dreamers get swatted", tells his friends his plan to get aboard Apollo 11 and go to the moon.
_	Moreover, the definition stated by the 1993 Declaration on the Elimination of Violence Against Women also supported the notion that violence is rooted in the inequality between men and women when the term violence is used together with the term 'gender-based.
_	20th-century anthropologists largely reject the notion that all human societies must pass through the same stages in the same order, on the grounds that such a notion does not fit the empirical facts.
_	Potter and Heath argue against the notion that consumerism is driven by conformity; instead, they state we are largely motivated by competitive consumption, which is an attempt to attain status distinction through the products we buy.
_	He dismissed the notion that any one single reason explained the loss, saying "Different candidates lost for different reasons."
_	High-profile criticism of the notion that access to the Internet should be considered a human right comes from Vint Cerf who is often dubbed the "father of the Internet".
_	The Court held that even if a vote could express personal views, the ethics law would still not be a violation of Carrigan's First Amendment rights because "this Court has rejected the notion that the First Amendment confers a right to use governmental mechanics to convey a message."
_	It was the Spaniards who gave the world the notion that an aristocrat's blood is not red but blue.
_	They won by a score of 3–15 to 1–13, in the process putting an end to the notion that Kerry had no answer to the northern style of defensive play.
_	Bell seemed to have become resigned to the notion that future experiments would continue to agree with quantum mechanics and violate his inequality.
_	An anonymous Toyota official also rejected the notion that she could have even hit the lever based on its location in the car (a Toyota Land Cruiser).
_	Since ancient times, the notion that weather can somehow foreshadow coming seismic activity has been the topic of much discussion and debate.
_	The fusion of science, science fiction and the spiritual influenced other readers as well; "With great commercial success he blended scientific speculation with science fiction to propagate modern myths such as the notion that “superior” extraterrestrial species reside on numerous planets, and that the human soul evolves through cosmic reincarnation.
_	Perhaps the most frequently cited observation drawn from Ibn Khaldūn's work is the notion that when a society becomes a great civilization (and, presumably, the dominant culture in its region), its high point is followed by a period of decay.
_	Through this paradigm, Spencer aimed to reconcile the associationist psychology of Mill's "Logic", the notion that human mind was constructed from atomic sensations held together by the laws of the association of ideas, with the apparently more 'scientific' theory of phrenology, which located specific mental functions in specific parts of the brain.
_	Speaking to MCV, Guillemot dismissed the notion that annual "Assassin's Creed" installments are diluting the brands, stating instead that they're necessary to "satisfy the demand".
_	According to some critics, no homo perpetuates the notion that homosexuality and gay people are lesser than heterosexuality and straight people.
_	He was always driven by the notion that something should be funny."
_	This economic model is a major version of market socialism and decentralized planned economy, stemming from the notion that people should be able to participate in making the decisions that affect their well-being.
_	The CIA also promoted the notion that individuals in exile, such as Árbenz, should be prosecuted in Guatemala.
_	Recommendations are varied but seem to find some common ground around the notion that treatment should be individualized to the specific circumstances under which a patient has developed BLS since these circumstances affect the complex microbial make up of the affected bowel.
_	The first is the notion that fire may be against an "opportunity" target or may be "prearranged".
_	These workplace bullying bills would typically have allowed employees to sue their employers for creating an "abusive work environment", and most have been supported by the notion that laws against workplace bullying are necessary to protect public health.
_	It could have had the real killer's DNA on it, and it could exclude without any doubt the notion that Juan Rivera had anything to do with this case.
_	To combat the notion that production functions, if not theoretically sound, are at least empirically well-supported, Shaikh fitted a function to a set of data points that spell out "HUMBUG" when plotted, then showed that the result was a proper production function.
_	With Democrats facing possible large losses in the 2010 midterm elections and President Obama struggling in opinion polls, idle speculation in Washington media circles concerning Obama's chances in the 2012 presidential election led to the notion that Clinton would take over as Obama's vice-presidential running mate in 2012 to add to his electoral appeal.
_	Protesters objected to the notion that a nuclear war was survivable, and answered with the assertion that the only way to survive a nuclear war was for one not to happen at all.
_	This etymology comes from the notion that one "rides" or straddles a bidet much like a pony is ridden.
_	This led the majority of cosmologists to accept the notion that the universe as currently described by the physics of general relativity has a finite age.
_	Even the notion that Blight has a human host does little to inject him with personality or a deeper connection to our heroes.
_	He specifically disagreed with the notion that Hamas had accepted the state of Israel within their new charter, and called this "a complete distortion of the truth.”
_	The genre of gallery paintings had by then become a medium to accentuate the notion that the powers of discernment associated with connoisseurship are socially superior to or more desirable than other forms of knowing.
_	The modern term "triumphal arch" derives from the notion that this form of architecture was connected to the award and commemoration of a triumph to particularly successful Roman generals, by vote of the Roman senate.
_	Finocchiaro also describes as mythical the notion that Galileo "saw" the earth's motion, since this direct observation was only possible in the 21st century, and the idea that Galileo was "imprisoned," since he was "actually held under house arrest."
_	That is, he rejected the notion that barbarian invasions in the 4th and 5th centuries caused the collapse of the Roman Empire.
_	Stockade approach introduces the notion that an inbound TCP connection may be rejected with some random probability proportional to the level of spam already seen from the connection’s originator over some configurable period of time.
_	In particular, the trailer was perceived to play into the white savior trope common in Hollywood cinema, where a white protagonist acts as a messianic figure and 'saves' a non-white culture from themselves, thus promoting the notion that morality and ethics are innate characteristics of white people only.
_	In his victory speech, Kerry asserted that his win meant that the people of Massachusetts "emphatically reject the politics of selfishness and the notion that women must be treated as second-class citizens."
_	This formalizes the notion that such a polygon allows segments to touch but not to cross.
_	The effect tends to be in line with the notion that history is written by the victors and thus design history is written by the economically powerful.
_	There is a growing evidence base that points to and supports the notion that adults also show signs of sensory processing difficulties.
_	The Puritan movement hinged largely on the notion that "a holy commonwealth could be established on earth."
_	This was done under the notion that those who supported the "Jyllands-Posten"'s right to free anti-Islamic speech would be placed in a precarious position were they to condemn the antisemitic cartoons targeted at one of the most sensitive of Jewish topics.
_	In response to the notion that Israel has a natural right to sovereignty and existence, Larudee has responded "I am sorry but there is no nation on earth that has the right to exist and this was articulated by Thomas Jefferson... nations have risen and fallen and disappeared from the earth and will appear on the earth according to the necessity and requirements of their population.
_	In order to test the notion that attention plays a vital role in visual perception, Treisman and Schmidt (1982) designed an experiment to show that features may exist independently of one another early in processing.
_	It is important to note that this study reveals that COAT patients have no domain-specific deficits, which supports the notion that chronic opioid use has minor effects on psychomotor, cognitive, or neuropsychological functioning.
_	While the training and animal work was commended, "The Chimp Channel" received largely negative critical reception with the notion that it fails its attempt to expand the simple, effective concept of "Monkey-ed Movies".
_	[But] the notion that some radical Islamic group in America would make a threat, even a veiled one, against two men's lives because of it is chilling."
_	The Court rejected the government's argument that the Court should focus solely on the distinction drawn between widowers and widows, based on the notion that the statute discriminates not against the covered wage earning female, but rather against her surviving widower, who was burdened with proof of dependency.
_	John Frank, the VP for EU Government Affairs at Microsoft stated in a 2016 blog post that a US court of appeals ruled in favour of Microsoft, supporting the notion that “US search warrants do not reach our customers’ data stored abroad”.
_	Mammoth (Russian: ма́монт "mamont" , from Yakut мамонт "mamont", probably "mama", "earth", perhaps from the notion that the animal burrowed in the ground)
_	It is believed by some that the origin of the story is the notion that catfish can sense the small tremors that happen before many earthquakes, and are more active at such times.
_	Whale's biographer Curtis rejects the notion that Whale would have identified with the Monster from a homosexual perspective, stating that if the highly class-conscious
_	This finding is compatible with the notion that specific types of T cell receptors are involved in the development of specific drug-induced SCARs.
_	In weighing the equal protection challenge, the Court rejected the notion that sexual orientation is a suspect classification.
_	Yang contemplated the notion that Taiwanese opera might die someday unless an effort is made to cultivate a younger generation of actors.
_	Experts say the corruption extends from ordinary citizens to high reaches of government and that most Mexicans have become accustomed to paying bribes and to the notion that the average police officer will try to shake them down in some way.
_	He added the two had often discussed the notion that after graduation they would set up their own roving revival ministry "and drive around the country and get rich."
_	Though CPI (M) has sought to build what it terms a "secular and democratic alternative" to the INC and BJP, general secretary Prakash Karat discarded the notion that these moves would result in a Third Front electoral alliance.
_	The notion of a hidden rationality contradicts the notion that subject of psychology is only the analysis of experiments.
_	She considers the two-state solution unrealistic and describes as inherently racist the notion that Israel is a Jewish state.
_	It is commonly stated that the Spartans were obeying the laws of Sparta by not retreating, but it seems it was actually the failure to retreat from Thermopylae that gave rise to the notion that Spartans never retreated.
_	Although the win-win concept is the ideal orientation, the notion that there can only be one winner is constantly being reinforced in American culture:
_	Woolrych argues that the notion that the period constitutes an "English Revolution" not only ignores the lack of significant social change contained within the period, but also ignores the long-term trends of the early modern period which extend beyond this narrow time-frame.
_	The predominant educational psychology from the 1750s onward, especially in northern European countries was associationism, the notion that the mind associates or dissociates ideas through repeated routines.
_	Universal Pictures was well aware that the robust debut of "Furious 7" could not be duplicated due to the wave of good reviews and publicity over the death of star Paul Walker, as well as the notion that the installment was both a farewell to said actor and a kind of coronation for the franchise as a whole.
_	When he learns that Rebecca turned Bernie into a vampire, though seeing not good to come from it, Aidan decides to accept until a scheme by Bishop and Marcus force Aidan to reluctantly kill Bernie on the notion that he murdered his bullies.
_	This film is a rejection of the notion that there is a god; isn't that obvious?
_	The project explored the notion that ‘what we share is more powerful than what divides us’.
_	It is now often used to refer to the notion that people in Australia have multiple cultural or ethnic backgrounds.
_	However, a Giuliani spokesperson quickly dismissed the notion that any such plan was in place, saying "When Mayor Giuliani makes a decision about serving in public office, he will inform New Yorkers on his own."
_	Paulsen was one of the first players to challenge the notion that an attack could be constructed out of brilliance.
_	“I’m fascinated by the notion that in this day and age everyone carries a small piece of ‘America’ inside them, a tiny concept or visual reference, often involuntary.
_	Students seemed to be acting on the notion that it's a temporary downturn and graduate school is a good place for the moment."
_	Imagineers consider this to be the true beginning of the design process and operate under the notion that if it can be dreamt, it can be built.
_	However, it attacked the notion that there was one normative spectrum of development, instead emphasizing how local conditions would create adaptations to the local environment.
_	Since the sick were exempt from fasting, there often evolved the notion that fasting restrictions only applied to the main dining area, and many Benedictine friars would simply eat their fast day meals in what was called the misericord (at those times) rather than the refectory.
_	If "A. afarensis" was the definite hominid that left the footprints at Laetoli, that strengthens the notion that "A. afarensis" had a small brain, but was a biped.
_	The separation between female and male spheres was heavily influenced by biological determinism, the notion that women and men are naturally suitable for different social roles due to their biological and genetic makeup.
_	Time has been far kinder to the LP; Allmusic's review, by Stephen Thomas Erlewine, praised Angus Young's "monster riffs" which appear to be easy but give the music its strength and this allows Scott to be "somebody who never hid the notion that lurking behind the door are some bad, dangerous things, but they're also fun, too."
_	Bullard has also argued that the U.S. output gap may not be as large as many estimates suggest — as estimates are based on the notion that output was at, rather than above, potential during the housing-bubble period — which has implications for monetary policy.
_	The Office of the United States Trade Representative challenges the notion that ISDS challenges "the sovereign ability of governments impose any measure they wish to protect labor rights, the environment, or other issues of public welfare".
_	The gallery's stock was selected on the notion that the "aura" of more established art would rub off on and validate newer products.
_	Overall, current research favors the notion that the benefits of fish consumption during pregnancy outweigh the risks; however, the type of fish is important.
_	"The Denver Post" disagreed, citing the insufficiency of licensing fees to previously regulate medical marijuana and rejecting the notion that the taxes would drive pot back to the black market.
_	She has described the community in which she was raised as being preoccupied with its Arab identity and with the notion that it has a better sense of what “the truest and purest Islamic teachings” are than other communities in Indonesia.
_	One of the most persistent myths about Sparta that has no basis in fact is the notion that Spartan mothers were without feelings toward their off-spring and helped enforce a militaristic lifestyle on their sons and husbands.
_	Ironically, the original Batwoman, Katherine Kane, was created in the 1950s, along with original Bat-girl Bette Kane, as a romantic interest for Batman (and Bat-girl as such for Robin), to deter the notion that Batman and Robin were both gay and in a relationship.
_	Blanche begins drinking heavily and escapes into a fantasy world, conjuring up the notion that an old flame, a millionaire named Shep Huntleigh, is imminently planning to take her away.
_	Typical to variations of the Irenaean theodicy is the notion that the present world is the greatest possible world, or the best of all possible worlds.
_	The Lurianic idea that all physical and spiritual Creations possess their particular bodily "soul", explains the notion that gilgul can involve a person's soul occasionally being exiled into lower creatures, plants or even stones.
_	Many Reform rabbis took offense at the notion that the beit din must be strictly halakhic and Orthodox, but they acquiesced.
_	The defeat weakened Clinton politically, emboldened Republicans, and contributed to the notion that she was a "big-government liberal" as decried by conservative opponents.
_	As Hubbard biographer Jon Atack notes, "the notion that everything that exists is trying to survive became the basis of Dianetics and Scientology."
_	In his writing of 1887, he posited the notion that "Pi-sho-ye" referred to nothing else than the Visayans.
_	Increasingly in the most recent Plato scholarship, writers are skeptical of the notion that the order of Plato's writings can be established with any precision, though Plato's works are still often characterized as falling at least roughly into three groups.
_	Pope Pius XII was the one who introduced, as late as in 1945 in his speech to his cardinals, the notion that the Church was the victim of the Nazi regime.
_	Other points of criticism among these reviews also included the level of graphic violence, which included cannibalism, and the notion that the series was sold on the basis of its shock value.
_	It rests on the notion that "meditation in movement" is a valuable companion to "meditation in stillness" of a more formal Chan practice, especially practice of Silent Illumination or "mochao" in Chinese tradition.
_	This announcement followed the notion that Man Overboard, commonly recognised as "particularly frequent" with releasing music for their fans, had been relatively quiet for the past year.
_	The available research favors the notion that the benefits of fish consumption during pregnancy outweigh the risks; however, the type of fish is important.
_	Historian Nicholas Campion has discussed the roots of the notion that celestial and psychological realms are connected, which can be traced to the 6th century BC, and in Ptolemy's case presents a mixture of Aristotelian and Stoic philosophy, resting on the Platonic view that "the soul comes from the heavens" which explains "how human character comes to be determined by the heavens".
_	Molecular evidence supports the notion that many novel polyketides remain to be discovered from bacterial sources.
_	Rhetoric of science is a body of scholarly literature exploring the notion that the practice of science is a rhetorical activity.
_	This issue concluded with the notion that "sh" and "ch" were reflexes of Proto-Poplocan.
_	He dismisses both the notion that the strategy will trigger an invasion by the Chinese government and the notion that Taiwan benefits economically by developing economic ties with China.
_	Its development came out of the notion that "programming in the large" and "programming in the small" required different types of languages.
_	But nowadays, the residents of these Ryukyu Islands do not identify themselves as such, although they share the notion that they are somewhat different from Japanese, whom they call "Yamato" or "Naicha".
_	As noted by Copernicus himself, the notion that the Earth rotates is very old, dating at least to Philolaus (c. 450 BC), Heraclides Ponticus (c. 350 BC) and Ecphantus the Pythagorean.
_	By 1972, Schneider had raised deep problems with the notion that human social bonds and 'kinship' was a natural category built upon genealogical ties (for more information, see kinship), and especially in the wake of his 1984 critique this has become broadly accepted by most, if not all, anthropologists.
_	The Roman Catholic church formally disavowed its long complicity in anti-Semitism by issuing a proclamation in 1965 repudiating the notion that the Jewish people bore any guilt for Jesus's death.
_	Certain case law supports the notion that in some circumstances representation by counsel at the trial will not be enough to make an conviction conclusive enough for the establishment of probable cause.
_	Meanwhile, Professor Willcocks, author of the LSE paper cited above, speaks of increased job satisfaction and intellectual stimulation, characterising the technology as having the ability to ""take the robot out of the human"", a reference to the notion that robots will take over the mundane and repetitive portions of people's daily workload, leaving them to be redeployed into more interpersonal roles or to concentrate on the remaining, more meaningful, portions of their day.
_	It debunks the notion that people rapidly adapt to changes in life circumstances and quickly return to an initial life satisfaction baseline, finding instead that changes in life circumstances such as government policies, major life events (unemployment, major disability) and immigration change people’s baseline life satisfaction levels.
_	Some scholars believe that Ya'qub fought as a ghazi warrior for the purpose of spreading proto-Sunni Islam, others support the notion that he was motivated by his Persian identity and consequent desire to restore the glorious Sasanian past, while still others believe he was simply motivated by greed and adrenaline.
_	The British Colonial Office in 1835 issued the "Proclamation of Governor Bourke", implementing the legal doctrine of "terra nullius" upon which British settlement was based, reinforcing the notion that the land belonged to no one prior to the British Crown taking possession of it and quashing earlier treaties with Aboriginal peoples, such as that signed by John Batman.
_	"Ethos" was therefore achieved through the orator's "good sense, good moral character, and goodwill", and central to Aristotelian virtue ethics was the notion that this "good moral character" was increased in virtuous degree by habit ("Rhetorica" 1380).
_	This study also supported the notion that the difference between the types of recall depends on the order in which the learner must recall the items, and not on the order in which the items are presented.
_	This policy helped entrench the notion that abstraction was foreign to the American experience.
_	Topics covered in "Spear's WMS" include 'Asset Management' with articles on investments in bonds versus equities, quantitative easing, impact of Mark Carney's appointment on the HNW individuals, Risks and Rewards of Rare Earths Investments; 'Art & Collecting' with articles on the art market boom, gallery etiquette and collectors who only want top names; 'The Good Life' with articles on owning your own island, airports becoming more luxurious, Aston Martin, Lamborghini and Porsche competitions; 'Property' with articles on the repossession of a £5.25 million in One Hyde Park, social investment and the housing crisis and leaseholds in London; 'Legal' and 'Taxation" with articles on challenging the notion that companies must minimise the tax they pay, that tax avoidance is not a fiduciary duty, how US laws impact tax evasion by use of Swiss banks and G20 take action against tax-avoiding multinationals.
_	The anti-feminist perspective emphasizes the notion that the male dominates the female in the story, and she ultimately succumbs to his will by getting the abortion.
_	The model is based on the notion that people are evolutionarily predisposed to first assess a stranger's intent to either harm or help them (warmth dimension) and second to judge the stranger’s capacity to act on that perceived intention (competence dimension).
_	Massive amounts of money are being spent on these races, which reinforces the notion that these positions are actually political and not so much purely legal.
_	The following also alludes to the notion that not everything is set, a circumstance or result could potentially be one way or the other.
_	Stephen Popiel, a vice president of Millward Brown Goldfarb automotive market-research company, noted that for most automotive consumers, safety has to do with the notion that they are not in complete control.
_	It is in 1957 in his article "On a question preliminary to any possible treatment of psychosis" that he advances the notion that it is the Name-of-the-Father (a fundamental signifier) that is the object of foreclosure.
_	Feminist writers such as Catherine Clément and Hélène Cixous write in "The Newly Born Woman" from a place of opposition to the theories proposed in psychoanalytical works, pushing against the notion that socially constructed femininities and hysteria are natural to being female.
_	Kimball dismisses the notion that his life is in danger until he is informed that his car has been wrecked and his chauffeur is dead — killed by a fer-de-lance, a South American snake that is probably the most poisonous in the world.
_	“American leaders must give up the notion that they can transform the Middle East and its culture through military force,” he wrote, and instead “get out of the elusive middle, step across the threshold of anger, and sit down and talk” with the Middle Eastern leaders.
_	Even when Nicholas first displayed symptoms of delicate health, the notion that he might die young was never taken seriously, and he was betrothed to Princess Dagmar of Denmark, daughter of King Christian IX of Denmark and Queen Louise of Denmark, and whose siblings included King Frederick VIII of Denmark, Alexandra, Queen of the United Kingdom and King George I of Greece.
_	DeMott refuted the notion that it was his idea, stating that the other trainees came up with because they wanted to skip the session.
_	TPR helped disseminate the notion that players should not be given credit for events over which they have no control.
_	It refers to the principles of pluralism and multiplicity of viewpoints, the notion that truth and reality are perceived differently from diverse points of view, and that no single point of view is the complete truth.
_	He writes, "the notion that historical context should play no role in the interpretation of the Koran—that what applied to Muhammad's community applies to all Muslim communities for all time—is simply an untenable position in every sense."
_	The decision to have two actors play Wilson was somewhat based on the notion that Wilson today is perceived as a completely different person from when he was in his 20s.
_	Foremost among these is the notion that the Partisans responsible for the Via Rasella attack were ordered to come forward and turn themselves in to the SS and wilfully declined to do so.
_	From an early age, both parents steeped their son in liberal politics, humanistic ideals, and Calvinist moral and religious philosophies, particularly the notion that education was essential to individual freedom and that hard and meaningful work was the way to prove oneself worthy in the sight of God.
_	Quebec differs from the rest of the nine provinces in that its policy focuses on "interculturalism"- rather than multiculturalism, where diversity is strongly encouraged, but only under the notion that it is within the framework that establishes French as the public language.
_	In doing so, he reinforced the notion that “law is not a set of fixed, self-defining categories of permissible and prohibited conduct” but instead is a dynamic set of normative rules that can guide foreign policy decision-makers.
_	The findings support the notion that business acumen is a learned skill - developed on the job by learning the required skills from knowledge mentors while working in different employment positions.
_	In the book's epilogue, Farmer playfully alludes to the notion that Phileas Fogg is still alive, and may in fact be the actual author of the story (Farmer notes that they both share the same initials, suggesting that Philip Farmer is actually an alias for Phileas Fogg).
_	He also promoted the notion that Christianity must remain under one church, both theologically and literally; under the body of the Catholic Church.
_	Additionally, the pupae whose adult stage would enter the directly developing morph had larger pupal weights, consistent with the notion that the lighter morph allocates more resources towards maturation and reproduction.
_	He added that Charles Darwin's theory of evolution was also used by conservative politicians, judges, and publicists to justify the idea of a "natural order of things" as well as "the notion that progress resulted from the elimination of the weak and the 'survival of the fittest.'"
_	In fact, the research of Evelyn Hooker and other psychologists and psychiatrists helped to end the notion that homosexuality was in and of itself a mental illness.
_	Wintour herself, when asked about it, dismisses the notion that she has all the power attributed to her.
_	This case strengthened the notion that a prior restraint of the press violates the First Amendment.
_	In the 20th century, the notion that human beings are rationally autonomous was challenged by the concept that humans were driven by unconscious irrational desires.
_	In resisting that authority, assemblies resorted to arguments based upon natural rights and the common welfare, giving life to the notion that governments derived, or ought to derive, their authority from the consent of the governed.
_	Staten Island has acquired a number of nicknames over the decades, some connected to the notion that it is considered an afterthought by other New York City residents.
_	On his departure she penned a poem, "On Monsieur's Departure", which, taken at face value, has lent credence to the notion that she may really have been prepared to go through with the match.
_	Evidence of motor tics was found lacking and the notion that involuntary vocal tics are transferred to the written form was labeled "problematic".
_	In the People's Republic of China and South Korea, the 1999 formal adoption of the "Hinomaru" and "Kimigayo", along with debates about the status of the Yasukuni Shrine, U.S.–Japan military cooperation, and the creation of a missile defense—was met with the notion that Japan was moving toward the right of the political spectrum.
_	Public Allies was founded in 1992 by Vanessa Kirsch and Katrina Browne, recent college graduates who wanted to challenge the notion that their generation was apathetic and uncaring.
_	The artist inserted her own, personal historical objects and ephemera, with short, narrative explanatory text, into the scenes, affecting the notion that she had occupied the house shortly before the viewers' arrival.
_	Forced sterilizations occurred in part due to the notion that immigrant families would put a strain on fiscal budgets, and thus sterilization offered a means of population control, as well as lifelong birth control.
_	Sanders has dispelled the notion that his first victory, secured by a narrow margin, was "just a fluke".
_	Other work has disputed the notion that Joynson-Hicks was an anti-Semite, most notably a major article by W. D. Rubinstein which asserted Joynson-Hicks had allowed more Jews to be naturalized than any other Home Secretary.
_	Whether or not it was justified, the notion that Joynson-Hicks was an anti-Semite has played a large part in his portrayal as a narrow-minded and intolerant man, most obviously in the work of Ronald Blythe.
_	Embodying a basic tenet of Renaissance humanism that humans are limitless in their capacity for development, the concept led to the notion that people should embrace all knowledge and develop their capacities as fully as possible.
_	When Shift and Rishda set up the notion that "Tashlan" is in a stable, Emeth insists on seeing Tash with his own eyes.
_	Patty Larkin produced "La Guitara", a compilation of international women guitarists challenging the notion that there are no great women guitarists.
_	The central concept underlying this method was the notion that music should be controlled during public presentation in order to create a performance situation; an attitude that has stayed with acousmatic music to the present day .
_	The emergence of "viral marketing", as an approach to advertisement, has been tied to the popularization of the notion that ideas spread like viruses.
_	So... it just solidified the notion that perspiration is more powerful than inspiration."
_	He demonstrated that two individuals with the same surname in China could have received that surname from one of several different surnames in an earlier era, casting doubt over the notion that those who share the same surname today would be considered "belonging to the same family five hundred years ago".
_	The Muslim text stated, among other things: “We reject the notion that the Eternally Transcendent and Almighty God is like a tribal chief or a dishonest realtor who parcels out land to his favorites, and we reject the idea our sacred texts can be abused as if they were title deeds of ownership.
_	Along with prayer he also believed in free will and reason, but clearly did not subscribe to the notion that pleasure-seeking would keep him from heaven.
_	However, he rejected the notion that his weight led to his injuries.
_	The commentary work of Rabbi Meïr Weiser (b. Mar. 7, 1809; d. Kiev Sept. 18, 1879) advances the notion that the party of Mithredath Tabeel took advantage of the document's translation protocol of Cyrus the Great's government.
_	Vane decided to return to England, apparently with the notion that he would acquire a royal governorship to trump the colonial administration.
_	Although many sources inaccurately depict this operation as an assassination attempt on Iraqi Prime Minister Abd al-Karim Qasim, the notion that the CIA sought the target's assassination is refuted by the plain meaning of the text itself.
_	Therefore, the notion that the appendix is only vestigial became widely held.
_	This ideal is upheld through the notion that in activist and theory circles marginalized groups must be included in the discussion.
_	The observation that a few dark spots form before sunrise, with significant spot formation occurring immediately following sunrise, supports the notion that the system is powered by solar energy.
_	It reveals, just under the surface, not only the promise of dim lights, perfume, mystery, and sweat-stained sheets, but a figure whose most prominent feature is the outline of a human heart, cracked and broken over and again, who remains resolute in the notion that love prevails."
_	The National Party, at the time, rejected the notion that it was in a coalition with Labor at the state level.
_	The report of Marshall Baron of Bastos (1862) supported the notion that the fortifications were still viable over the centuries.
_	Robert Arp cited the series winning a Peabody Award due to its willingness to criticize intolerance in April 2006 as a "special concern for criticizing and countering intolerance", and the notion that "the Church of Scientology suffers from the widely held perceptions that it seeks to silence former members and others who criticize its beliefs and practices", as the motivation behind the episode.
_	Isaiah Berlin attributes to Herbert Butterfield the notion that "toleration... implies a certain disrespect.
_	For example, Brian Tamanaha asserts: "The rule of law is a centuries-old ideal, but the notion that law is a means to an end became entrenched only in the course of the nineteenth and twentieth centuries."
_	Shortly after the revolution, victorious guerrilla leaders demonstrated their Cuban spirit by engaging in exhibition baseball games that included symbolic gestures reinforcing the notion that baseball would be an integral component of post-revolution Cuba.
_	This term was made popular by Douglas Coupland's novel , and stems from the notion that jobs in McDonald's and other fast food and retail businesses are frequently insecure.
_	This finding has since been used by other investigators to reinforce the notion that reactions may or may not be unidirectional by influencing reaction rates with the kinetic isotope effect.
_	The historian Bruce Cumings similarly rejects the notion that history is controlled by conspiracies, stating that where real conspiracies have appeared they have usually had little effect on history and have had unforeseen consequences for the conspirators.
_	Somali nationalism is centered on the notion that Somalis in Greater Somalia share a common language, religion, culture and ethnicity, and as such constitute a nation unto themselves.
_	Astrological botany is based on the notion that if plants or seeds are to be used for medicinal purposes then their planting and collection must be carried out with regard to the positions of the planets and other heavenly bodies, which are at the heart of the disease process.
_	He championed Amedeo Avogadro's notion that equal volumes of gas at the same pressure and temperature held equal numbers of molecules or atoms, and the notion that equal volumes of gas could be used to calculate atomic weights.
_	When God emphasizes upon the notion that everyone is for themselves on the Day of Judgement and that marital relations will not be to your aid when the judgement takes place, the Qur'an says:
_	The Roman Catholic Church has never fully accepted Hesychasm, especially the distinction between the energies or operations of God and the essence of God, and the notion that those energies or operations of God are uncreated.
_	Dominants perform more energetically costly behaviors (e.g. social policing and care) compared with subordinates, supporting the notion that energy expenditure drives liver investment.
_	A division also emerged between "Western" feminists who strived to save the "Other" women from an orientalised enemy and Afghan feminists who criticized the notion that war could liberate them.
_	The "Black is beautiful" cultural movement aimed to dispel the notion that black people's natural features such as skin color, facial features and hair are inherently ugly.
_	It was a rejection of the notion that mountaineering was always a dangerous impossible challenge for women, despite a belief that women were somewhat physically inferior.
_	Part of the Sons of Malta's ongoing humbuggery seems to have been the perpetuation of the notion that they were actively engaged in plotting filibuster expeditions, as demonstrated by the following news items:
_	The main tenet of the Hearing Voices Movement is the notion that hearing voices is a meaningful human experience.
_	In common with many post-structuralists, his arguments consistently draw upon the notion that signification and meaning are both only understandable in terms of how particular words or "signs" interrelate.
_	Fausold rejects the notion that the two nominees were similar ideologically, pointing to differences between the two on federal spending on public works, agricultural issues, Prohibition, and the tariff.
_	There are those supporting the notion that lowering rice tariffs has been a benefit to the Haitian community.
_	The Jesuits accepted Augustine's assertion of the necessity of grace, but rejected the notion that there was any substantial difference between sufficient and efficacious grace (both determine man's behaviour to an extent).
_	Moreover, besides "Hablar en gringo" when referring to someone whose language is difficult to understand, re-enforced the notion that alluding to the languages of other nations is a cliché.
_	The philosophy is founded on the notion that human society originates with the development of agriculture, and societies are based upon "people's natural prospensity to farm."
_	The method is rooted in the notion that users typically prefer to learn a system by using it to accomplish tasks, rather than, for example, studying a manual.
_	Historian J. Arch Getty remarked, "Lenin deserves a lot of credit for the notion that the meek can inherit the earth, that there can be a political movement based on social justice and equality."
_	IBA challenges the notion that ISDS is biased against developing countries, noting that there is "no correlation between the success rates of claims against states and their income levels or development status."
_	The enlightenment thinkers pushed the notion that their goals could be best achieved by throwing open Korea's ports and establishing commercial relations with the West.
_	Determinism is a philosophical concept often confused with fate, it can be defined as the notion that all intents/actions are "causally" determined by the culminations of an agent’s existing circumstances; simply put, everything that happens is determined by things that have already happened.
_	and has produced much academic work supporting the notion that dreams may contain analytically useful information,
_	The first one is that the concept of shared meaning is critical; secondly, is the notion that organizational culture is constructed socially and is affected by environment and history.
_	This was based on the notion that Stephen could have been one of the Jack the Ripper suspects; this theory has been dismissed, because he would have been unable to return to Cambridge in time for lectures the following morning.
_	Bewildered and hesitant, he gradually yields to the notion that the original Helena will be restored to him.
_	Dorothy M. Emmet found issue with the notion that the mystical experience is the point of intersection between the temporal and eternal orders.
_	While most researchers would accept the notion that psychological adaptations, shaped by natural selection, underlie culture, some would stress the strength of cultural behaviors on shaping selection pressures (Boyd and Richerson, 2005) or emphasize cultural niche construction (Laland et al., 2000).
_	The focus on natural history encouraged the notion that very little divided the animal world from the human subjects who were documented.
_	A second account explores the notion that Cofresí killed a crewmate when burying loot, claiming that after noticing that Hermenegildo "El Tuerto"
_	In her study, she tested the notion that children who are ethnically prejudiced also tend to reject ambiguity more so than their peers.
_	In a rebuttal, Wellar attacked the notion that Ashley's limited mental abilities justified the decisions made on her behalf: "Infants have human rights even though they can't speak for themselves.
_	Some conspiracy researchers have alleged a plot involving elements of the Mafia, the CIA, and the anti-Castro Cubans, including Anthony Summers, who stated: "Sometimes people sort of glaze over about the notion that the Mafia and U.S. intelligence and the anti-Castro activists were involved together in the assassination of President Kennedy.
_	He was intrigued by the notion that decreased levels of DHT led to the development of smaller prostates.
_	It is suggested that one reason for the prevalence of war rape was that at the time, military circles supported the notion that all persons, including women and children, were still the enemy, with the belligerent having conquering rights over them.
_	"Bi-racism" is defined as an inability to conceive the notion that someone's parents could be of a different skin color.
_	The Protestant reformers, led by Martin Luther, rejected the notion that rich men could gain God's grace through good works—and thereby escape purgatory—by providing cash endowments to charitable institutions.
_	According to Helfgott, the news coverage of the crime exposed the prevalence of drug use in Kingwood and the notion that if the teenagers encountered any legal trouble, their parents would make the problems disappear.
_	Another author, J. E. Rae, depicted the notion that the strike established Winnipeg's class division so severely in the decades after that Winnipeg had a marked class polarization.
_	The campaign sought to draw attention to the notion that Bill Clinton had "ducked" the draft to avoid military service during the Vietnam War.
_	More recently, there is mounting evidence that the cerebellum, which controls motor function, may be crucially involved in some cases of foreign accent syndrome, reinforcing the notion that speech pattern alteration is mechanical, and thus non-specific.
_	With the prevalence of environmental problems, many economists embraced the notion that, "If environmental sustainability must coexist for economic sustainability, then the overall system must [permit] identification of an equilibrium between the environment and the economy."
_	As editor of the "Press", Seltzer emphasized the public service aspect of the paper and "vigorously developed the notion that his reporters were watchdogs for the public over political and governmental affairs".
_	The phagocytosis theory is based on the notion that phagocytes are cells that have the power to englobe foreign bodies – and above all bacteria – introduced inside an organism.
_	The discovery of "Jianianhualong" supports the notion that asymmetrical feathers appeared early in the evolutionary history of the Paraves.
_	On the very first page of "Mein Kampf", Hitler openly declared his belief that "common blood belongs in a common Reich", elucidating the notion that the innate quality of race (as the Nazi movement perceived it) should hold precedence over "artificial" concepts such as national identity (including regional German identities such as Prussian and Bavarian) as the deciding factor for which people were "worthy" of being assimilated into a Greater German racial state ("Ein Volk, Ein Reich, Ein Führer").
_	According to his brother Faramir, even as a boy Boromir chafed under the notion that the Stewards were not kings, though they ruled in all but name.
_	Nozick poses utility monsters justify their greediness with the notion that, compared to others, they experience greater inequality or sadness in the world, and deserve more happy units to bridge this gap.
_	The Professor himself disagreed with the notion that his stories diverged from reality, but rather defended his position that the "essentials of that abiding place are all there (at any rate for inhabitants of N.W. Europe), so naturally it feels familiar, even if a little glorified by enchantment of distance in time.".
_	The ToK System embraces a view of nature as levels, but adds the notion that there are also "dimensions of complexity".
_	He remained unrepentant to the end of his life, rejecting the notion that his earlier activities represented treason.
_	The song revolves around the notion that "'Thugs' means, 'criminals who are basically misunderstood'."
_	Vere Lorrimer wrote lyrics, titled "Distant Star", for the series theme music with the notion that Steven Pacey would sing them over a new arrangement of the theme by Norrie Paramour.
_	Harte sends Aubrey and Babbington on a mission to the north coast of Africa, with the notion that Babbington will be taken by the French ships in the neutral port Medina.
_	They include the movie "Flight of the Navigator", the novel "The Dark Fields", its film adaptation, the 9th book ("White Night") of Jim Butcher's book series "The Dresden Files", the "Limitless" film (claiming 20 percent rather than the typical 10 percent), the shōnen manga "Psyren", and the 2014 film "Lucy", all of which operate under the notion that the rest of the brain could be accessed through use of a drug.
_	William T. Jarvis' article "The Myth of the Healthy Savage" states that his work on primitive diets is still widely sourced by dentists who emphasize nutrition, but argues that it had shortcomings that Price overlooked due to a steadfast ideologically motivated adherence to the notion that the modern diet led to physical degeneration.
_	Gripp also joined forces with MC Lars to perform some of the vocals, including the chorus to "Guitar Hero Hero (Beating Guitar Hero Doesn't Make You Slash)," a song commenting on the notion that video games like "Guitar Hero" take kids away from playing in bands and actually learning their instruments.
_	Joseph calls into serious question the notion that role modeling from middle-income people is a valid goal/outcome of mixed income housing.
_	Official policy began to fully endorse the notion that Ukrainian (vis-a-vis Little Russian) language and nationality did not exist.
_	The name "second genome" comes from the notion that humans have, effectively, two genomes: the native human genome, and the more diverse set of genomes carried by the human microbiota.
_	As if to refute the notion that the Tigers were made up purely of imported players there were 12 locals selected for the 1909 Midland Counties Cup Final against Coventry.
_	According to contrast, infants act according to the notion that differences in form mark differences in meaning.
_	While the 1991 revisions of the Constitution granted the sovereignty rights to the Taiwanese people, it did not explicitly name Taiwan and instead used the term "free area" to maintain the notion that the Republic of China encompassed more than Taiwan.
_	"I love the notion that they're working with us collaboratively," said Carol Phelan, the senior marketing communications manager at Polaroid, which bought a one-year sponsorship.
_	A necessary being is compatible with all the definitions provided, because it is supervenient on everything; yet it is usually taken to contradict the notion that everything is physical.
_	Furthermore, in July 2013, he received criticism for contesting the notion that Israel was the enemy of Arabs by declaring that the Muslim Brotherhood pose a significantly more substantial threat.
_	It is thought that this might be eulogy in praise of Kūkai, further supporting the notion that the Iroha was written after Kūkai's death.
_	She argues that this group of domestic abuse survivors faces a specific set of difficulties, "They are silenced by ageist assumptions about them as too resistant and hopeless to change or made invisible by the notion that very frail elders are the only victims of elder abuse."
_	She challenged the notion that women were incapable of taking on leadership roles or performing complicated surgeries as she did both, successfully, in the many hospitals and clinics she ran in China, overseeing populations of over 1 million.
_	Jews who seek to reconcile discrepancies between science and the creation myths in the Bible, the notion that science and the Bible should even be reconciled through traditional scientific means is questioned.
_	Drawing heavily on economic data from Statistics Canada, the book challenges the notion that the Alberta government's spending on public services is far higher than other provinces.
_	On August 23, 2014, Russian Deputy Prime Minister Arkady Dvorkovich ruled out any government move to ban McDonald's and dismissed the notion that the temporary closures had anything to do with the sanctions.
_	This occurred because people could no longer profit on the notion that consumers only had access to local markets.
_	This supports the notion that bilinguals who do not receive sufficient exposure to both languages acquire a "weaker language" and a "dominant language," and depending on similarities or differences between the languages, effects can be present or absent like that of the Greek-English example above.
_	Life in a state of discrepancy encourages Shiite leaders to reject the notion that reality begins with abstract ideas.
_	If all these predictions hold up, there would be support for the notion that secular IQ gains and race differences are not different phenomena but have a common origin in literacy.
_	While no epidemiological evidence directly supports the notion that nicotine acts as a carcinogen in the formation of human cancer, research has identified nicotine's indirect involvement in cancer formation in animal models and cell cultures.
_	Thus it serves as a counterexample to the notion that the product of normal spaces is normal; in fact, it shows that even the finite product of perfectly normal spaces need not be normal.
_	In a public speech archived as a podcast on the "New York Times" podcast website, Cohen outlines his personal beliefs about ethics as being ultimately dependent on a person's immediate circumstances, while dismissing the notion that personal moral character might influence an individual's ethics.
_	The most common form of causal determinism is nomological determinism (or scientific determinism), the notion that the past and the present dictate the future entirely and necessarily by rigid natural laws, that every occurrence results inevitably from prior events.
_	That contradicts the notion that inalienable possession is marked by less linguistic distance between the possessor and possessee.
_	Despite the notion that the Colonel's prior occupation would make him the obvious suspect for every murder, it is stressed that "everyone has equally good reasons for bumping off the victim".
_	While instrumental dependency as a process is similar to modesty or self-deprecation, it is defined separately due to the notion that instrumental dependency is typically task-dependent, meaning the ingratiator would insinuate that he/she is dependent upon the target individual for the completion of a specific task or goal.
_	"The Saturday Review of Literature" wrote that Monroe's performance "effectively dispels once and for all the notion that she is merely a glamour personality" and Crowther proclaimed: "Hold on to your chairs, everybody, and get set for a rattling surprise.
_	These apocryphal tales—which included the notion that Albert, the Prince Consort invented the piercing that shares his name in order to tame the appearance of his large penis in tight trousers—are widely circulated as urban legend.
_	This tale retroactively erases the notion that anyone else before Grayson and Bette Kane ever held the titles of Nightwing and Flamebird, except for the birds and the legendary figures named after them.
_	Kennan's doctrine was based on the notion that the Soviet Union was led by an uncompromising totalitarian regime, and that the Soviets were primarily responsible for escalating tensions.
_	Payne does not propound a theory of "red fascism" or the notion that communism and nazism have been essentially the same thing.
_	Director Martin Campbell came on board shortly afterwards and soon clashed with Troy Kennedy Martin, demanding rewrites, in particular to the notion that Craven had known about Emma's involvement with GAIA right from the start; this was removed at Campbell's behest.
_	For nearly half a century the very large majority of working archaeologists adhered to the notion that people making and using the very distinctive Clovis "point" and its associated lithic technology were the first to arrive about 13,500 calendar years ago and to have spread quickly throughout the Americas.
_	This participation, the idea goes, lends new currency to the notion that these technologies can be employed to allow citizens to "reprogram" politics.
_	In particular, the notion that gist memory improves with age plays a central role in FTT's prediction of age increases in false memory, a counterintuitive pattern that has been called developmental reversal.
_	After discussing it between themselves, Kang and Lee agreed to write a song with the notion that "no one can control me".
_	Jean Buridan (1300–1358) also rejected the notion that this motion-generating property, which he named "impetus", dissipated spontaneously.
_	Blackford also helped dispel the notion that the moniker "Rock-A-Bye Baby" meant that passengers were gently rocked to sleep aboard the RVRR.
_	There has been recurring tension between federal and state law; state authorities have not easily accepted the notion that federal law and federal courts must be deemed the controlling considerations in dealing with the Indians.
_	Underlying this entire process is the notion that an individual expects unity and coherence in the personalities of others.
_	Her laboratory has supported the notion that the code was no accident but arose from affinities between the nucleic acid codons and their cognate amino acids.
_	The genre of gallery paintings had by that time become a medium to accentuate the notion that the powers of discernment associated with connoisseurship are socially superior to or more desirable than other forms of knowing.
_	Holder has also endorsed the notion that prosecutors, when deciding to pursue white-collar crimes, should give special consideration to "collateral consequences" of bringing charges against large corporate institutions, as outlined in a 1999 memorandum by Holder.
_	He further rejected the notion that non-Quebecers could not partake in that province's internal debates and stated that he would "do everything I can to better the conditions of those people in Quebec who have been betrayed by successive governments."
_	Instead, he wanted to disprove the notion that people ought to be cultured.
_	Owen used these fossils to counter the notion that reptiles evolved from a sequential progression from early amphibians (what he called "metamorphosed fishes").
_	The issue is compounded by the notion that most important job positions in business and government are held by graduates of the University of Tokyo.
_	The report of the RFI dismissed the notion that "Gaul" was involved in espionage or that she was in a collision.
_	By reinforcing a connection to the familiar world of touch, the frames also scuttle the notion that abstraction belongs to a rarefied superstratum of experience.
_	His next two races did little to dispel the notion that Moonax was some way below top class.
_	In 2010, Fair denied the notion that drones caused any civilian deaths, alleging Pakistani media reports were responsible for creating this perception.
_	On 3 July 2018, researchers reported that molecular oxygen is not made on the surface of comet 67P, a finding that supports the notion that the oxygen comes from the body of the comet, and may be primordial.
_	Changes in the later editions include removing the assertion that the risk of sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) is not heightened by placing the baby to sleep on its belly, and removing the notion that feeding the baby whenever it appears hungry will give the mother "an abnormal hormonal condition" which could lead to postpartum depression.
_	There is the notion that by providing a minimal amount of welfare support, an individual will be free from marginalization.
_	The classification of the family Amphibamidae is based on the notion that the origin of Lissamphibia is derived from three hypotheses, which conflicts with the evolutionary position of "Doleserpeton" in relation to its primitive ancestors and descendants.
_	And that any attitude based upon the notion that there exists a total and rational explanation for the artistic impulse and activity is for us the enemy of real poetry.
_	The advocates of this anti-systematic interpretation do not see a contradiction between Plato's criticism of writing and the notion that he communicated his entire philosophy to the public in writing.
_	He regularly reminded his own parishioners of what he called the "Jewishness of Christianity," the notion that "Jesus was born a Jew, lived the life of a Jew, and died a Jew."
_	He refuted the notion that state-sponsored killing acted as a deterrent to murder and cautioned against the possibility of mistake.
_	They point to a study comparing natural father and stepfather families as support for the notion that stepparents do not view their stepchildren the same as their biological children, and likewise, children do not view their stepparents the same as their biological parents.
_	Witkin's seminal work in scale space included the notion that a one-dimensional signal could be unambiguously segmented into regions, with one scale parameter controlling the scale of segmentation.
_	"God Doesn't Mean You Get To Live Forever" delves into the notion that belief in God may not translate into the eventuality of everlasting life and the conflict such a notion brings upon a gospel musician, "Q."
_	The exposition highlighted the endemic cultures of the colonies and downplayed French efforts to spread its own language and culture abroad, thus advancing the notion that France was associating with colonised societies, not assimilating them.
_	A special belief connected with "sorei" is the notion that the memorial
_	However the notion that Estonia or Latvia are ethnic democracies has been rejected by some commentators.
_	With the lowering of the voting age to 18, the minimum legal drinking age (MLDA) was similarly lowered under the notion that by being able to vote (and for males, be subject to being involuntarily drafted into the enlisted ranks of the military), one should also be able to legally consume alcoholic beverages.
_	From this study, Gerbner also began working on what would become his Mean World Index, which subscribes to the notion that heavy consumption of violence-related television content leads the viewer to believe the world is more dangerous than it actually is.
_	Dwayne resented the notion that his life was somehow any better because he barely remembered his parents, who were murdered by Silhouette's father Andrew Chord.
_	In "The Unthinkable Swift: The Spontaneous Philosophy of a Church of England Man", Warren Montag argues that Swift was concerned about refuting the notion that the individual precedes society, as Defoe's novel seems to suggest.
_	The term cultural lag refers to the notion that culture takes time to catch up with technological innovations, and that social problems and conflicts are caused by this lag.
_	Lexy named Lorelei for the Rhine maiden who lures sailors to their deaths with her siren song, underscoring the notion that Paul's desire to hear the dog's voice could lead to his undoing.
_	Soon, a royal commissions endorsed the notion that any felon—except those convicted of murder, witchcraft, burglary, or rape—could legally be transported to Virginia or the West Indies to work as a plantation servant.
_	The company announced plans in 2010 to map the "Korean genome" based on the notion that United States-backed genome mapping efforts up to that time were representative of the "Caucasian genome" rather than the "Human genome" as claimed.
_	Pointing out the unreliability of truth, which is often accused as "having tendency of relativity and nihilism", the theory flatly refuses the uniformity and regularity of history, emphasizing the irregularity and inconstancy of truth and toppling the notion that history progresses in a linear order.
_	The opening sequence of the movie gives a brief glimpse into the notion that the coin might be "cursed," as another passerby is struck down by a car while reaching for the coin in the middle of the road.
_	The two concepts only differ in that physicists traditionally think in terms of minimizing the potential function, while biologists prefer the notion that fitness is being maximized.
_	While "Yamaji"'s analysis cannot account for every form of folk performing art, the evidence for a large portion is insufficient for certainty but it does dismiss the notion that folk performing arts are originally local creations.
_	That is the origin of the notion that police may search a suspect, and the area immediately surrounding the person, without a warrant during a lawful arrest in accordance with the SITA doctrine.
_	It's the notion that if you want something enough, are prepared to work for it and have the raw determination to plough stubbornly on towards your goal despite all of the logic, misfortune and outside advisors telling you otherwise, then you will eventually get there.
_	She herself rejects the notion that she is a journalist, and, in fact, what appears in her books as witnesses, are fiction and are changed between different editions of the same book.
_	As a result, many experts support the notion that emergency medical services should serve only immediate risks in both urban and rural areas.
_	This corresponds with the notion that "tanged point cultures" such as "Brommian" or "Bromme-Lyngby" appear to be based on the Magdalenian, during the Allerød and were closely associated with reindeer hunting.
_	Publications available on the Internet generally support the notion that chargeback involved literally charging departments based on actual resource consumption rather than forecast usage.
_	The Holy Roman Emperors would uphold the notion that they had inherited the supreme power and prestige of the Roman Emperors of old until the downfall of the Holy Roman Empire in 1806.
_	He attempted to strike a balance between Western Enlightened thought as a necessary means of winning liberation, and not propagating the notion that it was morally superior to the experiences and knowledge of people of color on Saint Domingue.
_	Das concludes with the notion that "this publication ushers in a new era, that the forces it unleashes will remain active and gain strength ... it will probably lead to a longterm process impacting the study of Hinduism in the USA," and notes that the real debate should not be a political debate, but a debate on the one-sidedness of text-based Indological studies.
_	"The results indicate the American Dream – the notion that it is possible for individuals to rise to the top through effort, luck, and genius – is not yet dead.
_	At least two modern accounts support the notion that Robinson was a good fielder.
_	In May 2007, the AoC released its "Implementation Plan 2007-2009", which elaborated on the notion that the AoC will not replace or reconstitute any existing plans or political channels.
_	Tarrow displays skepticism at the notion that digital ties and communication can overcome interpersonal trust and ties.
_	In philosophy, universality is the notion that universal facts can be discovered and is therefore understood as being in opposition to relativism.
_	The IP datagram includes a 3-bit wide Precedence field and a larger DiffServ Code Point (DSCP) that are used to request a level of service, consistent with the notion that protocols in a layered architecture offer services through Service Access Points.
_	The right to information Bill is implicit in the notion that the Ghanaian taxpayers need to have access to information concerning what government does with their money and what government plans to do on their behalf (Daily Graphic, July 21, 2017a).
_	The basic idea of the product portfolio matrix is the notion that a product, service or PSS is characterized by:
_	France had the notion that people would enjoy watching "stock cars" race.
_	The corollary of decline is the notion that the empire had earlier reached a peak, and this too has been problematized.
_	The earliest attested tradition about Sigurd is his slaying of a dragon, however, which supports the notion that he may have a purely mythological origin, or that he represents the combination of a mythological figure with a historical one.
_	At first, she had little confidence in the Magirangers' abilities due to their kindness and sought to destroy Wolzard on the notion that he was Raigel, only to be captured as a result.
_	It challenges the notion that it is a singular movement with a singular goal, but rather it is a multifaceted movement with multiple goals that pose a challenge to not only one oppressed group of society, but to all oppressed by a sexist, capitalist structure.
_	From the end of the War, a growing belief among women's organizations was the notion that all women faced similar problems as subordinates to men and that combining their interests might lead to gains.
_	Helen agreed that further education was necessary, and should be encouraged in immigrant communities, but she rejected the notion that immigrants were inherently inferior, and disliked the condescension shown by many of her peers toward immigrants.
_	Syndicalists also argued against the notion that the war was a clash of different cultures or that it could be justified as a defense of civilization.
_	In chapter nine, Marita's Bargain, Gladwell advances the notion that the success of students of different cultures or different socio-economic backgrounds is in fact highly correlated to the time students spent in school or in educationally rich environments.
_	Although having no knowledge of the 'druid' Rama, Schuré pursued the notion that a secret esoteric knowledge was known to them all, that this group were among the pillars of civilization and represented the founders of spiritual and philosophical ways of being as well as in some cases—though contrary to their message—religions.
_	Disabusing the psychological supposition of our "skin-boundedness" (discussed further below), transactionalism rejects the notion that we are apart from our environment or that man has dominion over it.
_	Where employers have the practice of hiring workers early in their working lives with the notion that they will remain for the rest of their working days, the mobility of labor is reduced.
_	The perpetrator's friends and family dismissed the notion that he was radicalized, saying that he was a drug addict who had lost his way.
_	Immanent within BCG works like Fillmore and Kay 1995 and Michaelis and Ruppenhofer 2001 is the notion that phrasal representations—embedding relations—should not be used to represent combinatoric properties of lexemes or lexeme classes.
_	This separate cab-chassis design challenged the notion that the word "ute" referred to a monocoque body style.
_	Krug strongly opposed the notion that libraries ought to censor the material that they provide to patrons.
_	Most rely on the notion that a worker's productivity declines significantly after age 70, and the mandatory retirement is the employer's way to avoid reduced productivity.
_	Specifically, "the notion that the typical contrast between opposites…
_	Technological determinism is the notion that technological change and development is inevitable, and that the characteristics of any given technology determine the way it is used by the society in which it is developed.
_	Its lead single, "Got on My Skateboard", was issued a month earlier, with Andrew Massie of "The Rockpit", expressing the view, "Wrapped in driving drums with an instantly memorable hook that'll earworm you for days, [it] bleeds nostalgia of years gone by and the notion that you should take advantage of being young to make sure you don't ever regret things you didn't do, rather than those that you did."
_	Arkansas automobile salesmen quickly picked up on the notion that better roads would help their business as well, and became the driving force behind the Arkansas good roads movement.
_	Less controversial is the notion that the field equations determine the motion of a fluid or dust, as distinguished from the motion of a point-singularity.
_	Thus, even if we accept that Shostakovich had a photographic memory, we are still left with the notion that Volkov transcribed the composer's memories in personal shorthand, shuffled and re-shuffled these "penciled scribbles" (Volkov's term), and managed to reproduce entire paragraphs of previously published material verbatim, right down to the original typography and layout.
_	Urrutia opposes the notion that Jesus may have either led or planned a violent insurrection.
_	In the 14th century, Jean Buridan rejected the notion that a motion-generating property, which he named "impetus", dissipated spontaneously.
_	For Collins, each blank panel begins with pages upon pages of dictionary or encyclopedia pages...an overdose of information that reflects the assault on our senses of our modern day world – the notion that you should be taller, richer, younger…
_	Ellis also cites reporters who spoke with residents of Live Oak at the time, dispelling the notion that Live Oak silenced the story.
_	There's some in Europe among the Muslim community, there's some anti-Semitism, but the notion that in the heart of European society or North American society there's anti-Semitism is preposterous.
_	In "The Knight's Tale", Chaucer writes, "Pypes, trompes, nakers, clariounes, that in bataille blowen blody sounes," which adds to the notion that clarions must somehow be distinct from trumpets.
_	A note on purity, the notion that A*6802 is of indigeonous Native American origin can be challenged based on possibility of introgression from Europeans and Africans.
_	Al Ghaffar gives the notion that Allah continuously and repetitively forgives an individual for his sins.
_	It stems from the notion that in order to be recognized, accepted and successful, individuals who were black had to outperform their white counterparts.
_	There was some pushback to the idea based on the notion that it might also prohibit less dangerous acrobatic performances, to which Jenkins clarified that it really had a handful of performers in mind, including Zazel.
_	This was viewed as his spoofing and or criticising the notion that the "ideal" family produces children of both sexes.
_	The book is framed as a rejection of the notion that Islam is a peaceful religion and sets out to prove that Islam is violent and intolerant.
_	He also attacks the notion that West Indian blacks harbor animosity against whites by pointing out that as many blacks owned slaves as whites, and that most people who were alive during slavery have since died.
_	This was evident for Bacon during the 1970s as she has spoken of the introduction of the notion that “the ‘personal’ is political”, and ‘sexual politics’ taking three years for the organisation to fully support.
_	Homeopathy, the notion that illness is binary and can be treated by ingredients that cause the same symptoms in healthy people, was another outgrowth of this early era of medicine.
_	Also, psalm 139:8 ("If I ascend up into Heaven, thou art there: if I make my bed in the Underworld, behold, thou art there.") lends support to the notion that people do not "necessarily" go to Hell because of suicide alone.
_	The literature supports the existence of somatovisceral and viscerosomatic reflexes, but there is little or no evidence to support the notion that the spinal derangements (often referred to as subluxations by chiropractors) can cause prolonged aberrant discharge of these reflexes.
_	Equally unsupported in the literature is the notion that the prolonged activation of these reflexes will manifest into pathological state of tissues, and most relevantly, that the application of spinal manipulative therapy can alter the prolonged reflex discharge or be associated with a reversal of the pathological degeneration of the affected reflexes or tissues.
_	Other critics rejected the notion that her background affects the authenticity of her music.
_	Goodwyn (1976) and Postel (2007) reject the notion that the Populists were traditionalistic and anti-modern.
_	Through this device, Renoir refutes the notion that one common man's bravery, honor, or duty can make an impact on a great event.
_	One prominent hypothesis is the notion that mitral cells transform the strength of olfactory input into a timing code, where odor concentration is encoded in the phase of mitral cell firing relative to the sniff cycle.
_	Slayers by the notion that, while humans killed due to infection with bodily fluid of the undead will be zombified, most undeads are not re-animated corpses but are merely made by some supernatural power that created them to look similar to humans.
_	(The other states, however, did not follow suit and several rejected the notion that states could nullify federal law.)
_	The same investigation invoked the of a tax haven, just four years younger than Hines-Rice definition, to refute the notion that Ireland was a tax haven.
_	He wrote further that he was an "enemy" of the Reform, Liberal and Masorti movements, leading some to reject the notion that he is "Chief Rabbi" for all Jews in Britain.
_	It is a central tenet of the philosophical idea known as solipsism; the notion that for any person only one's own mind is known to exist.
_	The resistance came from the notion that there would be a reduction in the number of contractual actions, thereby potentially impacting staff levels and ultimately impacting grading and promotions.
_	The dominant, pre-Hamiltonian view was that altruism evolved via group selection: the notion that altruism evolved for the benefit of the group.
_	In 1991, Carl N. Degler (February 6, 1921- ) noted that, as of that time, social scientists in various fields including sociologists, psychologists, anthropologists, and political scientists had begun to accept the notion that biology, as it describes innate human proclivities, plays an important role in study, but he could not point to any historian that necessarily accepted this notion.
_	However, the Galo people hold the notion that Taki's descendent groups namely, the Doje, Yapom, Pomte- Sarte and the Bute-Kamdu frequently trespasses onto momen inhabiting trees, streams, caves, rocks etc.
_	Thought has remained the guiding principle of the Chinese state, communist ideology became increasingly sidelined after the 1980s and the PRC's main justification for its continued existence is the notion that multiparty democracy is inefficient and cannot rapidly modernize the nation.
_	Although "Long Hair in Three Stages" set the general consensus of US Maple as "deconstructionalists of rock and roll," the band have since disavowed the notion that they were deliberately deconstructing anything, rather, according to guitarist Mark Shippy, just "constructing things differently."
_	The predominant educational psychology from the 1750s onward, especially in northern European countries was associationism; the notion that the mind associates or dissociates ideas through repeated routines.
_	This transition in marketing strategy spawned the events Maddenoliday and Maddenpalooza, both of which reinforced the notion that the annual release date of Madden NFL is a day worth celebrating for gamers.
_	Later proposals advanced the notion that the geological shapes present in chaos regions could have been made by a series of over a 100 flooding events.
_	Fränger argued against the notion that the hellscape shows the retribution handed down for sins committed in the center panel.
_	Most of the studies in this area are large prospective studies that follow people over time, and while there may be a correlation between the two variables (friendship and health status), researchers still do not know if there is a cause and effect relationship, such as the notion that good friendships actually improve health.
_	Other positions which seem to have been considered ghuluww by early writers were the (public) condemnation ("sabb") of Abu Bakr and Umar as usurpers of Ali's right to be a successor of Muhammad, and the notion that the true Imams were infallible ("maʿṣūm").
_	In his work on the subject, Șăineanu also stood out as one of those rejecting the notion that Rabelais' writings have a special anticlerical meaning, arguing instead that his mockery of clerical society was merely a rendition of common and folkloric attitudes—a conclusion quoted in agreement by Annales School historian Lucien Febvre in his own "The Problem of Unbelief in the Sixteenth Century".
_	The thesis explored the notion that an idea which can influence human behavior may blindly evolve the capacity to influence its own prevalence in the human population by motivating its human hosts to engage in behavior that spreads the idea.
_	The other 'persuasive arguments theory' (PAT), begins with the notion that each group member enters discussion aware of a set of items of information favoring both sides of the issue but lean toward that side that boasts the greater amount of information.
_	The manuscript history further supports the notion that the language of the "Cançó" is of a more Iberian dialect (so that it could be mistaken for late medieval Catalan).
_	Hausser wrote two books, published by right-wing imprints, arguing the purely military role of the "Waffen-SS" and advancing the notion that its troops were "soldiers like any other", according to the title of the second book.
_	Both documents are interesting as they refer back to Professor Bain's report and the many recommendations it made and continue to put forward the notion that there is an ongoing need to modernise FRSs.
_	However, her family stayed in New York, and Powell resided in a series of hotels, reinforcing the notion that she enforthed that she would only join the administration for one year's time.
_	As a secondary argument, Medina put forth the notion that the prior ruling in the case was inappropriate because the jury was allowed to determine liability of "Life" based on the inaccuracy of the article, while neglecting to take into account whether or not the act by the magazine was reckless or willful.
_	In "Breaking the Tablets" Halivni explicitly rejected the notion that this withdrawal is simply an example of "God hiding his face" as viewed in normative Judaism.
_	The Weismann barrier concept is still broadly considered to be correct, but the notion that the germ cells are unaffected by somatic cells or their environment is proving not absolute.
_	Van Nieuwerburgh has suggested that coaching supports the notion that learning should be personalised, and encourage both the student and the teacher to develop throughout the learning experience.
_	My parents held the notion that we may have to leave."
_	In the larger scheme of things the Nootka Conventions weakened the notion that a country could claim exclusive sovereignty without establishing settlements.
_	When she learns that Stefan is now king and has had a newborn daughter named Aurora (Elle Fanning) with his wife, Queen Leila, acting on the notion that true love is nonexistent, Maleficent places a curse on the newborn Aurora to sleep forever unless she receives the kiss of true love, as revenge on Stefan.
_	Justice Stevens took issue with the notion that the exclusionary rule served to deter only "police" misconduct.
_	Intuitively, development captures the notion that if is a curve in , then the affine tangent space at may be "rolled" along the curve.
_	Tsurtsumiya lamented in a 1992 interview, “Now we have new possibilities, but also a new complication--the notion that profit can be made from art.
_	These points solidified the notion that the movement was both dictatorial and militaristic.
_	In "Slate" magazine, Hitchens pondered the notion that, instead of curing antisemitism through the creation of a Jewish state, "Zionism has only replaced and repositioned" it, saying: "there are three groups of 6 million Jews.
_	His 1983 article "How Many People Have Ever Lived On Earth?", a publication of the International Statistical Institute, disproved the notion that the number of people living in the 20th century was in actuality much less than the total number of individuals previously in existence.
_	Jacques Maritain (1882–1973) introduced into Thomistic metaphysics the notion that philosophical reflection begins with an "intuition of being," and in ethics and social philosophy sought to harmonize Thomism with personalism and pluralistic democracy.
_	In a November report, the UN Special Rapporteur noted that because of the intrusiveness of the security apparatus "virtually no citizen would risk demonstrating any opposition to the Presidency or Government—or would do so at his mortal peril"; the notion that opponents would face some sort of retribution was shared by most observers.
_	This underestimation is most likely mainly due to the notion that, as mere "table music", the divertimenti are musically too superficial to deserve the attention the rest of Mozart's oeuvre does.
_	Kessler said in his book that the measures Woodward took to conceal his meeting with Felt lent "credence" to the notion that Felt was Deep Throat.
_	The introduction of flows, which are akin to the equations of motion used in fluid dynamics, exploit the notion that dense coordinates in image analysis follow the Lagrangian and Eulerian equations of motion.
_	These critiques were based on the notion that most female roles on the show were either a lead-in to the episode's plot, the recipient of Face's affections, or both.
_	Steele further notes that Lindsay's "gothic landscapes raise doubts that the majority [of Australians] ever subscribed" to the notion that the country and its natural environment was unmarked by a history prior to the arrival of the British colony.
_	While at first upset at the notion that his father went on to have another family, Howard bonds with Josh when the latter shows admiration for his journey to space and possesses a lecherous nature similar to his original one.
_	The "McConnell" dissent characterized the "Austin" argument concerning the “corrosive and distorting effects” of corporations as the notion that corporations “will be able to convince voters on the correctness of their ideas.”
_	They reject the notion that BMP is a less serious program as compared to the Mazer School of Talmudic Studies.
_	Chambers is the notion that women lead sound change due to some inherent biological verbal advantage.
_	Much support for animal emotion and its expression results from the notion that feeling emotions doesn't require significant cognitive processes, rather, they could be motivated by the processes to act in an adaptive way, as suggested by Darwin.
_	One alternative and usually computationally faster technique based on the notion that interactions over large distances ("e.g." > 1 nm) are insignificant to the "net" forces acting in certain systems is the method of spherical truncation.
_	Sometimes, grouped with unity of action is the notion that no character should appear unexpectedly late in the drama.
_	After testing the notion that extra nipples could be a sign of fertility, he discovers that they are actually an atavism, or evolutionary ‘holdover’ – a sign of how humans evolved.
_	The Germans allowed the Danish government to remain in office and this cabinet rejected the notion that any "Jewish question" should exist in Denmark.
_	Furthermore, unlike their bid for the 1996 Games, which was largely criticized for its overall disorganization and arrogance—wherein the bid lacked specifics and relied largely upon sentiment and the notion that it was Athens' right to organize the Centennial Games—the bid for the 2004 Games was lauded for its humility and earnestness, its focused message, and its detailed bid concept.
_	A new theme recorded in the coffin texts is the notion that all people will be judged by Osiris and his council according to their deeds in life.
_	Their report dismissed the notion that the Aubracs were collaborators but noted inconsistencies.
_	But Robert D. Truog, director, Harvard Center for Bioethics, Frances Glessner Lee Professor of Legal Medicine, Professor of Anaesthesia (Pediatrics) argued that the notion that Charlie's parents are paying is misleading.
_	Government websites have also tended to promote the notion that China is synonymous with the PRC instead of the ROC as was mandated by the KMT.
_	In the 1990s and early 2000s an influential group of archaeologists, led by Steven A. LeBlanc of Harvard, popularized the notion that warfare was endemic among all prehistoric peoples.
_	This understanding counters the notion that human history is simply a series of accidents, either without any underlying cause or caused by supernatural beings or forces exerting their will on society.
_	Other philosophers, however, adopt a non-physicalist position which challenges the notion that the mind is a purely physical construct.
_	They reject the notion that the end of this verse would be a stand-alone blessing, meant exclusively for Muhammad, Ali, Fatima, Hasan and Husain, as they have in mind the context of the verse as a whole and the one preceding it.
_	It seems to contradict the notion that Jesus' body was horribly mangled by the crucifixion.
_	It's clear he does nobody any harm; but the notion that he might even outlive me is almost painful to me."
_	Yu rejects the notion that there is any form of allegory in "Guan ju".
_	It was the Spaniards who gave the world the notion that an aristocrat's blood is not red but blue.
_	He explains this seeming paradox by vetting, and then validating, the notion that nutritionism and, therefore, the whole Western framework through which we intellectualize the value of food is more a religious and faddish devotion to the mythology of simple solutions than a convincing and reliable conclusion of incontrovertible scientific research.
_	Furthermore, it refers to the notion that wisdom may manifest itself in feelings of disgust towards anything which lacks goodness or wisdom, though the feelings or the reasoning of such 'wisdom' may not be immediately explicable through reason.
_	The use of an honor code depends on the notion that people (at least within the community) can be trusted to act honorably.
_	They all disputed the notion that 100 underage boys were involved with adult men.
_	Spinoza's philosophy contains as a key proposition the notion that mental and physical (thought and extension) phenomena occur in parallel, but without causal interaction between them.
_	The availability heuristic operates on the notion that, "if you can think of it, it must be important."
_	Another positive review came from Ian Winwood of BBC Music, in his review, he stated, "...This may not be quite enough for Trivium to turn back the hands of the clock to the point where the world lay at their fretboards, but the notion that this is a band whose best days lie behind them is one that, at least for now, is resting on ice".
_	I strongly reject the notion that I have to do stage kicks or be some sort of persona.
_	We confirm the notion that the Ashkenazi, North African, and Sephardi Jews share substantial genetic ancestry and that they derive it from Middle Eastern and European populations, with no indication of a detectable Khazar contribution to their genetic origins."
_	Many of the essays in this volume attempt to undercut figural totalization, the notion that one can control or dominate a discourse or phenomenon through metaphor.
_	The court discussed the notion that websites posting such stolen information were analogous to criminal fences.
_	This is because of the notion that the current Linux TRIM command implementation might not be optimal.
_	Saint John's School of Ontario (SJSO) was the third of three private Anglican boys' boarding schools in Toronto founded on conservative Anglican ideas and the notion that children were not challenged by present-day society.
_	Flynn has criticized the notion that cognitive gains over time, or the Flynn effect, are "hollow" if they cannot be shown to be increases in "g".
_	They used a single image twice to convey the notion that the Goombas are walking, rotating it back and forth, causing it to look lopsided as it walks and giving the appearance of a trot.
_	Conley, the author of "You May Ask Yourself", claims that ontological equality can also be used to put forth the notion that poverty is virtue.
_	J similarly rejected the notion that there could be arbitration to prevent a dispute and that arbitration connotes the settlement of a dispute between parties.
_	It also illustrates the author's vision of human destiny and the notion that fear of the future is endangering Earth's spiritual renaissance.
_	Specifically, the notion that religious language is evocative of the mystical experience is problematic, because it is difficult to determine what language is adequate without resorting to literal or abstract ideas.
_	Popular sayings can reflect the notion that remolded memories produce new creative associations in the morning, and that performance often improves after a time-interval that includes sleep.
_	In 1928, Kiyoo Wadati proved the existence of earthquakes occurring well beneath the lithosphere, dispelling the notion that earthquakes occur only with shallow focal depths.
_	That position was reflected and constituted in the notion that their "sovereignty" was either completely lacking, or at least of an inferior character when compared to that of "civilised" people."
_	Recency effects come from the notion that terminal list items tend to be better recalled than other items.
_	It is based on the notion that there is a positive intention behind all behaviors, but that the behaviors themselves may be unwanted or counterproductive in other ways.
_	He is the primary proponent of the notion that calcium is a basic taste, equivalent to sweet, sour, salty, and bitter.
_	Tim O'Reilly believes that the way companies sell the IoT devices on consumers are misplaced, disputing the notion that the IoT is about gaining efficiency from putting all kinds of devices online and postulating that "IoT is really about human augmentation.
_	By implementing the notion that something needs to be done, political leaders influence scientists.
_	As in his outlook on criticism, the writer rejected the notion that his was a creative text, and indicated that he did not wish to make himself seem "more interesting than I really am."
_	There is something essentially “mysterious, improbable, unique, bewildering” about her; this reinforces the notion that their propinquity serves only to remind André of Nadja's impenetrability.
_	This assumption is in turn based on the notion that giant dike swarms mark the arrival of deep-seated mantle plumes.
_	Yoes rejects the notion that art artwork can be explained in relation to a single message or story, believing such explanations to be posturing:
_	Brian Cronin has also stated that the story was a strong look at a theme Morrison later explored in the pages of "Final Crisis" – the notion that there are certain people (here Nick Fury; in "Final Crisis" Batman) that you just cannot duplicate, because they are truly unique individuals.
_	This rejects the notion that corporations should be treated in the same way as natural persons (i.e. looking for a "guilty" mind), and advocates that different legal concepts should underpin the liability of fictitious persons.
_	While Purdey pursued the notion that environmental manganese was a cause of BSE (something that arguably could never be proven), Brown suggested that a chelation therapy to remove the excess manganese from patients with vCJD could be of benefit.
_	Other women had translated religious literature, as this conformed with the notion that female education should promote piety.
_	GRI disputed the notion that its technology could be the threat to privacy it is in the film.
_	In recent philosophical work, the term centers on Jacques Derrida's "Plato's Pharmacy", and the notion that writing is a "pharmakon".
_	Kovel is particularly scathing about deep ecology and its "fatuous pronouncement" that Green politics is "neither left nor right, but ahead", which, for him, ignores the notion that "that which does not confront the system comes its instrument".
_	Phonetician John C. Wells proposed a definition of Estuary English as "Standard English spoken with the accent of the south-east of England" but criticised the notion that the spread of language from London to the southeast was anything new.
_	He propagated the notion that Labor's defeat in the election had been contributed to by CIA interference, and wrote an article on the subject which appeared in "The Bulletin" in January 1982.
_	At the same time, according to Brennan, Jobs "started to seed people with the notion that I slept around and he was infertile, which meant that this could not be his child."
_	The United States historically had large disparities in health and access to adequate healthcare between races, and current evidence supports the notion that these racially centered disparities continue to exist and are a significant social health issue.
_	Uyghur nationalism, or the East Turkestan independence movement, is the notion that the Uyghurs, a Turkic ethnic group who primarily inhabit China's Xinjiang region (or "East Turkestan"), should form an independent state.
_	This idea stemmed from the notion that smaller streams can often be diverted by individuals but irrigation projects from larger rivers require more work and capital than individual citizens can provide
_	Rural residents also disagreed with the notion that farms needed to improve their efficiency, as they saw this goal as serving urban interests more than rural ones.
_	, who called it "daft commentary" and a "gross misrepresentation of what the sari means to us", and the notion that the sari is exclusively a Hindu dress as "utter nonsense".
_	In one correspondence, Murad entertained the notion that Islam and Protestantism had "much more in common than either did with Roman Catholicism, as both rejected the worship of idols", and argued for an alliance between England and the Ottoman Empire.
_	In a 2003 paper titled "Economic Development as Self-Discovery", Hausmann and Rodrik contest the notion that growth will follow automatically from the presence of state-of-the-art technologies and good economic institutions (like well-designed and enforced property rights).
_	While Wittgenstein made his famous turn from the "Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus" to the "Philosophical Investigations" wherein he jettisoned the previous idea that the world comprised an atomistic set of propositional facts for the notion that meaning derives from its use within a holistic self-enclosed system.
_	Exiting a congressional hearing about the "," he is confronted with the notion that he has grown disconnected from everyday Americans he has been committed to watching over, and doesn't truly know what his adopted people are like anymore.
_	He challenged the notion that Germanic barbarians had caused the Western Roman Empire to end, and he refused to equate the end of the Western Roman Empire with the end of the office of emperor in Italy.
_	Moving on to the 1980s, Jeffrey "Mantas" Dunn, guitarist and founding member of Venom, considered to be the band who coined the term "black metal" in their 1982 album of the same name dispels the notion that his former band's lyrics dealt exclusively with Satanism:
_	At the same time, he is also tackling the notion that he is a “prisoner” of the conscious rapper label by balancing the insular brand of Hip Hop championed by many of his early fans, with newer, more radio-friendly content.
_	Through it all, Fitzmorris retained his indomitable spirit, clinging to the notion that the measure of the man is not how high he climbs but how many times he can get back up after being knocked down.
_	This is the notion that cultures should not be judged by another's values or viewpoints, but be examined dispassionately on their own terms.
_	The Center was founded in September 2004 and formally launched in October 2005 under the notion that "improving understanding of China's evolving prominence in the world will be of key importance both in China itself and abroad for many years to come".
_	An appeal to the U.S. Supreme Court failed in a majority decision with a strong dissent to the notion that a series of beatings, long interrogations and threats to induce a confession do not render a second confession 11 hours later involuntary.
_	While VPPists entertain the notion that only the KJV should be used for the English Bible for both private and public readings, which is also the declared position of Life B-P Church as far as the KJV is concerned, there was no notion on the part of the FEBC or Khoo that the CUV should be discriminated, disparaged or undermined as Khoo, despite being upfront with the CUV text, had also given assurances regarding the CUV so as not to undermine the faith of the Chinese Service brethren.
_	Wethey and other scholars rejected the notion that Crete took any part in his formation and supported the elimination of a series of works from El Greco's "oeuvre".
_	But the notion that "Disney Aladdin" somehow resurrects the spirit of the late Howard Ashman, who had the original inspiration for the movie and contributed most of its clever lyrics, is a joke.
_	Various programs operate in the US that promote the notion that animals raised for food can be treated humanely.
_	The researchers found support for the notion that when the aid workers held more positive perceptions of their local colleagues, higher levels of organizational performance were observed.
_	The name originates from the notion that the Western Mongols are on the left-hand side when the Mongol Empire began its division into East and West Mongols.
_	The concept of friction of distance is based on the notion that distance usually requires some amount of effort, energy, time, and/or other resources to overcome.
_	In 2006 the Wests Tigers on advice from Tim Sheens pushed the notion that the NRL side would be better served with a single NSW Cup side.
_	Previous studies enhance the notion that leadership along with effective management can increase employee mission valence through its ability to promote public service motivation.
_	Donald Zimmerman started the band, with the notion that music could challenge the corporate church.
_	N.O.N was formed to advance the notion that people could choose not to have children--to be childfree.
_	Central to Kollar’s philosophy is the notion that architecture has a responsibility to facilitate human delight and spiritual awareness.
_	As the economy has become increasingly global, EPI supports the notion that students must be armed with skills that set them up for success in a competitive and technologically savvy market.
_	While electrifying the streetcars of Richmond, the increased passenger capacity and speed gave Sprague the notion that similar results could be achieved in vertical transportation — electric elevators.
_	In her opinion, the concept of “Living, Breathing Building” is synonymous with a move away from the notion that buildings should be built as machines for inhabitation and towards biomimetics (the art and science of using nature and natural systems as the source of inspiration for creating buildings and building systems).
_	This reflects the notion that survival to a later age is only possible if all younger ages are attained.
_	Throughout 1999, Moghadam "made a series of moves that pared the company of most of its retail holdings, following the notion that e-commerce would become the high-margin road of the future."
_	This part of the story challenges the notion that anything involving physical labor is exclusively for men.
_	The committee found "no reliable, empirical evidence to support the notion that there is a higher prevalence of antisemitic attitudes within the Labour Party than any other political party".
_	The committee found "no reliable, empirical evidence to support the notion that there is a higher prevalence of antisemitic attitudes within the Labour Party than any other political party.
_	J also attacked the notion that legal equality might arise from the Constitution as a free agreement of the people; he noted that there was a degree of equality lacking, with regards to women and Aboriginals.
_	He works closely with Iso to discover a solution that benefits everyone while Medusa becomes increasingly worried of the notion that official full-on war with the X-Men may become inevitable.
_	It resists the isolation and insularity of literature written in a minority language; it resists the idea that culture in diaspora is fossilized, stagnant, or in decline; and it resists the notion that Armenians have only their century-old plight to offer the world outside their national cocoon."
_	As both the defense and prosecutor agreed that gaming meant "gambling", the defense focused upon the notion that "this case ... turns entirely on whether poker is gambling."
_	Wenham had the distinction of being a conservative theologian, a defender of Biblical inerrancy, and one who held to the position of "conditional immortality" – or the belief that the human soul is not by default eternal in nature; this belief goes hand in hand with the notion that sinners, once cast into hell, are at some point burned up and essentially no longer exist.
_	The Working Group on Equal Rights, composed of experts on government and law from the East German Academy of Sciences, Humboldt University and Socialist United Party Central Committee rejected the notion that women's rights should fall under a separate area designated by gender, but instead should be governed by the United Nations Human Right's position.
_	Adherents of this movement support the notion that the LGBT community forms a distinct people due to their unique culture and customs.
_	Then they get the notion that sexual love is a sacrament of God's love, that sexual love tells us something about God."
_	There is a feeling among some Circassians that the notion that Kabardins, Adyghe, Cherkes and Shapsugs (all four are separate on the Russian census) are different nations is a Kremlin strategy designed to divide the Circassian nation.
_	But he agreed with the Left Communists that a separate peace treaty with an imperialist power would be a terrible morale and material blow to the Soviet government, negate all its military and political successes of 1917 and 1918, resurrect the notion that the Bolsheviks secretly allied with the German government, and cause an upsurge of internal resistance.
_	In the midst of this political involvement, Congregationalists held firmly to the notion that each local church was ruled directly by Jesus Christ, as testified to in the Bible and preached to those convicted by the Holy Spirit.
_	The recognition of an inherited vulnerability common to all phobias is consistent with the notion that elevated trait anxiety predisposes one to anxiety disorders.
_	Her first book, The Art of Oriental Embroidery (published in 1979), became a standard reference in the field, and in it she emphasized embroidery's antiquity, and challenged the notion that textiles are "minor arts."
_	Despite these assertions, however, it is largely recognized and accepted by practitioners and researchers that leadership is important, and research supports the notion that leaders do contribute to key organizational outcomes (Day & Lord, 1988; Kaiser, Hogan, & Craig, 2008).
_	When the three-part TV film saw a limited theatrical release in the United States as a four-and-a-half-hour two-part film on January 15, 2014, "The New York Times" reviewer A.O. Scott stated that by not showing the Nazi death camps, "Generation War" perpetuates "the notion that ordinary Germans were duped by the Nazis and ignorant of the extent of their crimes."
_	Further findings of perchlorate and chlorate in the Martian meteorite EETA79001 and by the Mars "Curiosity" rover in 2012-2013 support the notion that perchlorates are globally distributed throughout the Martian surface.
_	However, there is a growing body of evidence to support the notion that women can perpetuate relational cycles of violence.
_	The second was the notion that circumcision would lessen the urge towards masturbation, or "self abuse" as it was often called.
_	Despite Islam's unequivocal teaching that God is one and that no being resembles him in sanctity, some people accepted the notion that certain persons (saints) have baraka, a special quality of personal holiness and affinity to God.
_	But the notion that our public school systems are in disarray and failing, I don't buy that.
_	In a country that promoted the notion that the majority rules, this effectively silenced minorities by what Tocqueville termed the "tyranny of the majority".
_	The creative idea was "founded upon the notion that all communications should be as effortlessly enjoyable as eating the bar itself."
_	The availability heuristic operates on the notion that, "if you can think of it, it must be important."
_	This was the genesis of the ideas of a 'China card,' the notion that the United States might use China to gain Cold War advantage over the Soviet Union.
_	Spinoza's philosophy contains as a key proposition the notion that mental and physical (thought and extension) phenomena occur in parallel, but without causal interaction between them.
_	Most theories of syntax reject the notion that these strings are constituents, though.
_	The NYPD was unable to provide any evidence to support the notion that the police received a report of a gun in Ourlicht's vicinity on June 6 or June 9, 2008, or that a gun was ever recovered from the area.
_	Meanwhile, when Sita tells Kailash that she is pregnant, he rejects the notion that he is the father, claiming that Kamal fathered the child.
_	Antonoff agreed with the notion that the song was their de facto anthem:
_	You might advance the notion that Uma and Anamika are betrayed by their parents in that they treat them very badly when it comes to marriage and relationships.
_	This is the notion that the history and the geography of Latin America are both so extreme as to appear fictional or even magical to outsiders.
_	This sets up the notion that "they" were "evil" and we are "good" because God is on our side.
_	Andrea Horwath, the current leader of the Ontario New Democratic Party, has noted that she faced not just indifference, but active discouragement, from both men and women – based around the notion that at age 35, she was too young and hadn't earned the right to get into politics – when she first ran for Hamilton, Ontario City Council in 1997:
_	David Chalmers considers the consciousness of rocks as well as thermostats, although he eschews the notion that rocks are conscious:
_	Compared to models of planetary atmospheres, this first spectrum of planet b is best matched by a model of enhanced metallicity (about 10 times the metallicity of the Sun), which may support the notion that this planet formed through core-accretion
_	Some scholars disagree with this interpretation, however, as Arawn seems to have accepted the notion that Pwyll may reciprocate with his wife, making it less of a "seduction test" per se, as seduction tests typically involve a Lord and Lady conspiring to seduce a knight, seemingly "against" the wishes of the Lord.
_	The entire series of "Confessions" can be understood as a showcase for a simple notion, the notion that sexual freedom can be achieved by people of all classes and genders.
_	Roger Wilmut, in his 1978 biography of Tony Hancock as a performer, credits two British radio comedy shows, already running in 1954, with establishing an uninterrupted 30-minute sitcom format: "A Life of Bliss", written by Godfrey Harrison and starring George Cole, and "Life with the Lyons", a programme heavily based on the US tradition of sitcoms; he therefore dismisses the notion that Galton and Simpson invented the genre.
_	In 2008, Little Richard appeared as a guest artist on "The Imus Ranch Record" to help raise funds to benefit sick and dying children, as well as to attempt to debunk the notion that Imus was racist.
_	Although he stated that the Fillmore administration had no interest in annexing Cuba, he made it clear that the U.S. did not want to foreclose the option by engaging in an essentially political alliance, and reinforced the notion that the U.S. saw Cuba as its concern and not a matter for outside interference.
_	As for the notion that Parliament alone must pay for the pension, Dickson replied under section 100, Parliament must pay a pension, but section 100 did not say what percentage of a total pension.
_	Third, he alludes to the notion that the capabilities of literature have been exhausted, and thus to the idea of the death of the novel (all of this is explicit, critical indirect metafiction).
_	On March 1, 2013, Obama, speaking about "Hollingsworth v. Perry", the U.S. Supreme Court case about Proposition 8, said "When the Supreme Court asks do you think that the California law, which doesn't provide any rationale for discriminating against same-sex couples other than just the notion that, well, they're same-sex couples—if the Supreme Court asks me or my attorney general or solicitor general, 'Do we think that meets constitutional muster?'
_	Other rabbinic sages object to the notion that Mashiach will be someone who had once lived, died and was then resurrected.
_	R. Eno of Indiana University writes that "If one were to trace the origins of Legalism as far back as possible, it might be appropriate to date its beginnings to the prime ministership of Guan Zhong (720–645 BC)", who "may be seen as the source of the notion that good government involved skilled systems design."
_	In this vein, Hobbes' concept of negative liberty was built upon the notion that the state would not act upon its subjects because its subjects had willingly relinquished their liberties.
_	On April 23, vocalist Craig Mabbitt stated via Twitter, "off to vegas today to finish out last minute badass demos with monte, then off to bamboozle, then studio time", giving the notion that the band will begin recording their studio album directly after The Bamboozle, and release it mid/late Summer 2010.
_	The entropy explanation also supports the notion that words with a 'k' in them tend to be more funny, as the letter 'k' is one of the least frequently used letters in the English language.
_	To make matters worse, most people within my community had the notion that educating a girl was like watering someone else's field, so boys were given the first priority.
_	This process often re-semanticizes the building as a consequence, and is predicated on the notion that buildings can never really be complete and unalterable.
_	He is a proponent of the notion that, for the person with a serious problem, loving peer groups and family members are vitally important for effective personal change.
_	The Cauchy–Schwarz inequality proves that this definition is sensible, by showing that the right-hand side lies in the interval [−1, 1] and justifies the notion that (real) Hilbert spaces are simply generalizations of the Euclidean space.
_	Although the area was indeed under the control of the Roman empire two thousand years ago, evidence does not support the notion that Bad Bergzabern had its own origins so far back.
_	He was of the notion that if he sang in other languages, he should have known well the nuances of other languages.
_	While stressing it is of the same kind, she entertains the notion that women might not be able to attain the same degree of knowledge that men do.
_	Morrison later dismissed the notion that his interest in Gabor was serious though Jimmie Davis questioned the relationship in the 1959 gubernatorial race.
_	According to Le Fanu: "Darwinism is the foundational theory of all atheistic, scientific and materialist doctrines and of the notion that everything is ultimately explicable and that there is nothing special about it – the self-denigration and self-hatred, the great ‘nothing but’ story.
_	The relationship between words and what they symbolize is constantly evolving which creates the notion that identity and the self is "a product and effect of competing, fragmentary and contradictory discourses."
_	Creative director Bogusky had the notion that the homeless "live in separate culture, where things take on new meanings- a bench becomes your bed; a shopping cart becomes your closet".
_	Bermudo out to be a deacon at his succession, this fact would only reinforce the notion that his election was a determined move to oppose Alfonso.
_	He drafted a great many communications during this period, some of the more notable ones being rejections of the notion that the "shōgun" should be referred to as a "king" (, ""), as this would imply subordination to the Emperor of China and tributary status within the Sinocentric world order.
_	While more recent research has disproved the notion that the practice of "ijtihad" was abandoned in the 10th century — or even later — the extent of legal change during this period and its mechanisms remain a subject of scholarly debate.
_	Her views on public image in the fashion industry were bothersome; she said she was opposed to the image that all woman should be "rail-thin" and the notion that they must wear certain outfits and be "super-young to be beautiful".
_	Radical Humanism rejects the notion that there is only one way to be black or Latino, and that women and the LGBT community are marginal and morally aberrant.
_	The fact that Casas' brother El Felino had forced Rey Bucanero to be shaved bald after September's 78th Anniversary Show built the notion that perhaps the "Rudo" team was not going to co-exist without problems.
_	Bariso wrote that "the theory that homosexuality is a disorder is not novel but — like the notion that the earth is flat and the sun revolves around it — instead is outdated and refuted".
_	The resolution dismissed the notion that "the word 'person' must invariably precede the word 'blind' to emphasize the fact that a blind person is first and foremost a person" as "totally unacceptable and pernicious" and resulting in the exact opposite of its purported aim, since "it is overly defensive, implies shame instead of true equality, and portrays the blind as touchy and belligerent".
_	Several articles alluded to the notion that fungi could overcome some rather toxic compounds, such as arsenic.
_	In the run-up to 2000, the media amplified the general euphoria, with reports of rapidly rising share prices and the notion that large sums of money could be quickly earned in the so-called new economy stock market.
_	One of indirect consequences of the awakening is the notion that without this revival of a Muslim self-consciousness and self-confidence, directly attributable to the Movement, there could or would have been no Pakistan Movement in the run up to Indian Independence.
_	In short, the relationship of satisfaction to productivity is not as straightforward as often assumed and can be influenced by a number of different work-related constructs, and the notion that "a happy worker is a productive worker" should not be the foundation of organizational decision-making.
_	On the other hand, in 1875 the "Irish Sportsman" editorialised on the desirability of learning to swim in order to prevent tragic drownings and scorned the notion that worries over "nakedness" should prevent one from swimming.
_	Moreover, research on leg length and leg-to-body ratio conflicts with the notion that there is a distinct preference for taller mates.
_	It discussed twenty-five UFO sightings reported during 1952, and concluded with the notion that "extraterrestrial space vehicles" are probable.
_	You rebel against the notion that you could become accustomed to all this, yet you do become accustomed to it.
_	Kohlberg's theory centers on the notion that justice is the essential characteristic of moral reasoning.
_	Working through Women's Co-operative Guilds and the Labour Party, the ALRA sought to pressure politicians to support the notion that women should have the power to decide if their own pregnancies would be terminated.
_	I.e., it is art about the black experience that attempts to dispel the notion that race matters.
_	Alexander Wylie, Christian missionary to China, in 1853 already refuted the notion that "the Chinese numbers were written in words at length", and stated that in ancient China, calculation was carried out by means of counting rods, and "the written character is evidently a rude presentation of these".
_	The editorial board of "The Globe and Mail" echoed Mercer's sentiment, pointing out that Harper's statements on the legality of the coalition were "knowingly erroneous" and, in June 2012, Peter H. Russell said the Conservative's attacks on the legitimacy of the coalition proposal were "deliberately misleading" and that the notion that "a multiparty government must be approved by voters beforehand is 'absolutely B.S.'"
_	This marked decrease in dependency needs as an individual gets older can be largely attributed to the notion that, as an individual gets older, he or she becomes capable of providing these things for him or herself.
_	Schweizer supports the notion that the idea of false prophets is closely attached to eschatology, and that this passage refers to events expected to occur in the end times, not to any current rivals.
_	It sanctions the notion that it is meritorious to be violent toward our children, thereby devaluing them in society's eyes.
_	A supply current for a typical 741 of about 2 mA agrees with the notion that these two bias currents dominate the quiescent supply current.
_	Citing "Givhan v. Western Line Consolidated School District" (1979), Justice Stevens emphatically disagreed with the notion that there was a categorical difference between speech uttered by a citizen or by an employee in the course of his duties.
_	This is supported by the notion that all citizens are obligated to serve their nations if the need arises.
_	Rejecting the notion that the Internet was an elitist gadget developed by the U.S. military and destined to be monopolized by commercial interests, Greeman saw the expanding Web as a potential class struggle weapon: one that would transform an revolutionary dream—the international general strike—into a technical possibility.
_	Goal-setting theory is based on the notion that individuals sometimes have a drive to reach a clearly defined end state.
_	The book mentions that certain Western scholars subsequently "began to amplify" the notion that "contemporary Hinduism was an attempt to fabricate an identity that had never before existed"
_	The Maudsley Approach opposes the notion that families are pathological or should be blamed for the development of AN.
_	The Talmud entertains the notion that the Kohanim are "different" from the nation of Israel in the sense that they are called "Children of Knowledge" (Bnei Deah), with the Kohen possessing an ability to instruct Torah even in his stage of youth.
_	Leo borrows the notion that Mary, in the hour of Annunciation, assumed the role of a helper in the mystery of redemption.
_	refers to "God the Judge of all" and the notion that all humans will eventually "be judged" is an essential element of Christian teachings.
_	This understanding has led to the notion that all the information needed for proteins to assume their native state was encoded in the primary structure of the protein, and hence in the DNA that codes for the protein, the so-called "Anfinsen's thermodynamic hypothesis".
_	His emphasis on only the public and external aspects of life--the street, the land, the State television broadcast--reinforces the notion that one's thoughts and feelings are (still) one's own.
_	Additionally, some political scientists question the notion that majority rule is an "uncontested good."
_	In the 1950s and 1960s, in the absence of any biomedical explanation of autism's cause after the telltale symptoms were first described by scientists, Bettelheim as well as actual psychoanalysts championed the notion that autism was the product of mothers who were cold, distant and rejecting, thus depriving their children of the chance to "bond properly".
_	Moore and Scott showed that the radiation reaction can be alternatively derived using the notion that, on average, the net dipole moment is zero for a collection of charged particles, thereby avoiding the complications of the absorber theory.
_	Sigmund Freud, before adopting the Edward de Vere identification, toyed with the notion that Shakespeare may not have been English, a doubt strengthened in 1908 after he believed he had detected Latin features in the Chandos portrait.
_	They described it as the notion that "welfare services should be restricted to our own".
_	In a book published in 1984, the three authors proposed an alternative view on the ethnogenesis of the Slovene people: they rejected the notion that the Slovenes were descended from Slavs that settled the area in the 6th century, claiming that the ancestors of the modern Slovenes were in fact a pre-Roman people they call Veneti (which would include the Adriatic Veneti, the Baltic Veneti, the Pannonians, the Noricans and some other peoples that traditional historiography identified either as Celts or Illyrians).
_	McCants stated that while terror groups were actively using social media platforms to further their goals, research did not support the notion that the social media strategies they adopted were proving effective:
_	A recurring theme in Clarke's works is the notion that the evolution of an intelligent species would eventually make them something close to gods.
_	The idea behind the concept is the notion that even a majority rule of the people cannot be allowed to install a totalitarian or autocratic regime such as with the Enabling Act of 1933, thereby violating the principles of the German constitution, the Basic Law.
_	Implied in this is the notion that the army, temporarily "demobilized" or not, did in fact continue to exist as a coherent entity, indeed coherent enough that it could be consulted and negotiated with.
_	With this new album, I really liked the notion that we would create a wider scope in which to put other kinds of material we were writing."
_	This works on the notion that every substance interacts with radiation in different ways, and these differing ways if measured can help identify the substance without having to take a sample.
_	More recently, S-D logic has begun to use to term "value-in-context" to capture the notion that value must be understood in the context of the beneficiary's world and the associated resources and other actors (Vargo et al. 2009).
_	The offer would reinforce the notion that only women were responsible for home care.
_	African Americans "contributed to colorism because they have benefited from the privilege of having a skin color closer to that of Whites and have embraced the notion that privilege comes with having light skin in America".
_	On the other hand, the thick conception of the rule of law entails the notion that in addition to the requirements of the thin rule, it is necessary for the law to conform with certain substantive standards of justice and human rights.
_	Communication ethics is the notion that an individual's or group's behavior are governed by their morals which in turn affects communication.
_	He rejected the notion that evil exists in itself, proposing instead that it is a privation of (or falling away from) good, and a corruption of nature.
_	Implicit in his vision is the notion that the natural rate is "Unique": there is only one level of output and employment that is consistent with equilibrium.
_	In general the Colonial Office allowed Lugard's expeditions to continue because they were framed as retaliatory and, as Olivier commented in 1906, "If the millions of people [in Nigeria] who do not want us there once get the notion that our people can be killed with impunity they will not be slow to attempt it."
_	He found that precedent did not dictate the result, and he noted that "Ross" "categorically rejected the notion that the scope of a warrantless search of a vehicle might be 'defined by the nature of the container in which the contraband is secreted.
_	And in 2013 he was praised for his "unexpected progressiveness" at the hearing of "Teddy Bear Clinic v Minister of Justice", where his questions from the bench showed "he was clearly moved by the notion that consensual sexual behaviour between minors should not be criminalised".
_	He kept the notion that the poet must write for and in the interests of the working class, his mission is clear in the poem, "The Song of Toil".
_	Fausold rejects the notion that the two nominees were similar ideologically, pointing to differences between the two on federal spending on public works, agricultural issues, Prohibition, and the tariff.
_	No current statistical evidence supports the notion that the U.S. Green Party might serve as an organizing mechanism for vegetarians or vegans in the United States.
_	It is the notion that our lives offer choice like a representative democracy.
_	Though contested by some, their five-year winning streak in the championship between 1984–85 and 1988-89 corroborates the notion that the team was really the best during this period.
_	Leonard Fein, wrote in regards to the tent of Jewish thought and opinion on March 31, 2011 in "The Forward", "I remain quite uncomfortable with the notion that JVP should be barred from the communal tent."
_	It was also intended to suggest both a reference to the entire fabaceae legume family from which aquafaba is made as well as the notion that the discovery was also ""faba""-lous .
_	The Greek word "adikia" (injustice) transmits the notion that someone has operated outside of his own sphere, without respecting the one of his neighbour.
_	Yang rejects the notion that constitutionalism "is a good word", and rejects the introduction of a term "socialist constitutional governance" (or another formulation of it) into Chinese ideological discourse.
_	This brings up the notion that if we are all seen as the same, then by common sense we are not.
_	This evidence is supportive of the notion that tropomyosin isoforms are subject to temporal regulation.
_	Topological order is the notion that describes the long range entangled states: topological order = pattern of
_	In Jubilees 1:20, Belial's appearance continues to support the notion that sin is a direct product of his influence.
_	MacGillivray was also lead author of the research report, "Low Flying Heroes", whose title stems from the notion that social entrepreneurs and community activists operate mostly under the official radar that monitors community development.
_	"It's all very silly, though played very sincerely by most of the cast, and none of the plot described is less plausible than the notion that Glenn Ford and Erin Gray could ignore the 36-year difference in their ages."
_	The notion of gender-sensitive curriculum acknowledges the current reality of our bi-gender world and attempts to break down socialized learning outcomes that reinforce the notion that girls and boys are good at different things.
_	This assertion was based on the notion that the chimpanzee vocal tract ratios that prevent speech are a result of growth factors associated with puberty—growth factors absent in "A. ramidus" ontogeny.
_	By rejecting the notion that voters hold single preferences (or, in fact, that individuals possess structured belief systems from which they can derive policy preferences), the book challenges the usefulness of public opinion surveys.
_	When "Star Wars" was released it reaffirmed the notion that there is such a thing as good versus evil and evil must be defeated.
_	At least one prominent official within the SEC has rejected the notion that the 2004 SEC changes caused the banks to reduce their capital reserves.
_	Their daughter, Scottie, wrote after their deaths: I think (short of documentary evidence to the contrary) that if people are not crazy, they get themselves out of crazy situations, so I have never been able to buy the notion that it was my father's drinking which led her to the sanitarium.
_	The democratic style encompasses the notion that everyone, by virtue of their human status, should play a part in the group's decisions.
_	At the heart of this conceptualisation of reality lies a commitment to what Possamai has dubbed "perennism", the notion that a holistic understanding of truth is accessible in esoteric wisdom or gnosis that is unfettered by the dogmas of the world's religions.
_	She rejects the notion that her song lyrics are autobiographical, telling "The Times" in 1998: "the tortured artist myth is rampant.
_	Althusser believes these errors result from the notion that Marx's entire body of work can be understood as a coherent whole.
_	Simply stated, we are six who have chosen to embrace the notion that there exists something far beyond ourselves.
_	Some early scholars, such as George Coedès and Lawrence Palmer Briggs, have established the notion that it refers to the island of Java in present-day Indonesia.
_	For example, an instructional coach that is working with a math teacher should know "current mathematics education reform efforts are built on the notion that the ideas in a subject, and the ways in which students and teachers work with the ideas, matter."
_	The duo knocked out two tracks in two days, but the notion that the album would be finished in a timely fashion soon evaporated.
_	The court also highlighted the notion that the reasonableness of the expectation of privacy in this case is dependent upon the evolution of technology.
_	Sharma wrote two books, "Looking for the Aryans" (Orient Longman, 1995) and "Advent of the Aryans in India" (Manohar, 1999), to argue against the notion that Indo-European languages speakers were original inhabitants of India and Indus Valley Civilisation was their creation.
_	This is based on the notion that somehow all things, and more importantly all living things, originate in water and therefore water is the basic starting-point of everything.
_	Under questioning from committee member Jay Inslee, Inhofe dismissed the notion that he was less knowledgeable than climate scientists, saying that he'd already given "five speeches on the science."
_	United States president (1801–1809) Thomas Jefferson was a representative agrarian who built Jeffersonian democracy around the notion that farmers are “the most valuable citizens” and the truest republicans.
_	In 1977, it issued an important volume of essays, "Conservative Judaism and Jewish Law," edited by Seymour Siegel with Elliott Gertel, to dispel the notion that "there really is no philosophy of Jewish law within the Conservative movement."
_	"Humanum genus" specifically condemned certain practices of the Freemasons, including: religious indifference; the promotion of public education that denied the Church's role and where "the education of youth shall be exclusively in the hands of laymen"; the approval of the notion that the people are the "only" source of sovereignty, and that those who rule have no authority but by the commission and concession of the people.
_	And even though the catfighting goes over the top, the notion that a passionate female friendship can turn ugly in a heartbeat is, sadly, realistic."
_	The Causby case rejected the notion that property ownership extended upward 'indefinitely', while still recognizing a landowner retains complete domain over the lower altitudes above their property.
_	BGMA supported the Stop Murder Music campaign against certain artists at the Mobo Awards, with Carney arguing that, "we reject the notion that homophobia is integral to black culture."
_	Narrative modelling relies on the assumption that human beings frame their experiences in terms of various classes of “story”, and the notion that people will respond more positively to a story which they can easily recognise and follow.
_	"Your record taken in its totality does not support the notion that you have respect for the law," he said.
_	Luthria and Kapoor have "repeatedly drilled home the notion that Shoaib Khan could be any gangster and not necessarily Dawood" a position that Kumar has also stated.
_	From their point of view schools reproduce existing inequalities and they reject the notion that there are equal opportunities for all.
_	The question of world political unification is returned to: here, the authors make clear that the idea itself is not being dismissed, but rather the notion that such a unification will be a united states of the presently-existing nation-states, e.g. world government.
_	Abrams told MTV, "[Khan and Kirk] exist—and while their history may not be exactly as people are familiar with, I would argue that a person's character is what it is," Abrams said of the notion that his Khan could be just as evil, even if Kirk never stranded him on Ceti Alpha V.
_	This truly reinforces the notion that Rabindrasangeet has at its heart some unbelievably powerful poetry.
_	The French Communist Party, co-sponsors of the meeting together with the Polish United Workers Party, rejected the notion that the Paris meeting would have been of a similar kind as the Berlin conference as no common positions on strategy had been approved.
_	An important aspect in Popper's thinking is the notion that the truth can be lost.
_	In accordance with the notion that suppression of SHBG is involved in the androgenic effects of danazol, the drug has synergistic rather than additive androgenic effects in combination with testosterone in bioassays (which is most likely secondary to the increased free testosterone levels).
_	The authors claim that "most DSGE models in the literature would struggle to explain the principal-component space of the data in a satisfactory manner” and, on the basis of their findings, reject the notion that when "investment plummets private consumption remains resilient or [even] rallies during a recession."
_	To refute the notion that the executive branch would become a monarchy, allowing the President to put a person in any office, Hamilton wrote, "To nominate, and by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, to appoint ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls, judges of the Supreme Court, and all other officers of United States whose appointments are not in the Constitution otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by law."
_	Gravitation can be described via a "scalar theory of gravitation", using a "stratified conformally flat metric", in which the field equation arises from the notion that the vacuum behaves like an optical polarizable medium.
_	More recent research has challenged the notion that it underwent decline even at that time, citing a revival of works produced on rational scientific topics during the seventeenth century.
_	The initial sales pitch was the notion that one could control an entire city with the push of a button.
_	"Suffer the Children", a documentary highlighting some of the teachings of the Word of Faith movement, has a video clip of Creflo Dollar teaching the "little gods" doctrine to his congregation based on the notion that "everything reproduces after its own kind":
_	Chang of the "Times Picayune" said "Administrators quickly refute the notion that they are "creaming" the top students and denying admission to others" and that the school says that it takes "anyone who comes through the door [...] including special-needs students".
_	This inspired the notion that such birds bring home a final message of love from a sailor who is lost at sea.
_	The historical analysis used to justify the concept of Fifth Dimensional Operations being developed, was the notion that:
_	The historic win of the FIBA Korać Cup in the 1996–97 season in particular, bolstered the notion that Aris has a unique place in the history of Greek basketball, and in the history of Greek sports in general.
_	Although, there are statements in Buddhist scripture that appear to be misogynist, such as the presentation of women as obstructers of men's spiritual progress or the notion that a woman's birth is an inferior one with less opportunity for spiritual progress.
_	The vicious cycle tends to benefit large corporations and wealthy individuals that can afford the professional fees that come with ever more sophisticated tax planning, thus challenging the notion that even a marginal income tax system can be properly called progressive.
_	Dependency thinking starts from the notion that resources flow from the ‘periphery’ of poor and underdeveloped states to a ‘core’ of wealthy countries, which leads to accumulation of wealth in the rich states at the expense of the poor states.
_	Early workers in the field of education were influenced by the notion that the preservation of the social privileges, interests, and knowledge of one group within the population was worth the exploitation of less powerful groups.
_	Organizers compared the February protest with the SOPA protest two years prior, saying, "Today we face a different threat, one that undermines the Internet and the notion that any of us live in a genuinely free society".
_	Like Hegel, C.S.Peirce attempted to develop a system of categories from a single indisputable principle, in Peirce’s case the notion that in the first instance he could only be aware of his own ideas.
_	"PCWeek" was formed under the notion that computers could be used as business tools.
_	Hess despised Nixon almost as much as he admired Goldwater and could not tolerate the notion that Goldwater would defer to Nixon.
_	Hoover urged voters to hold to the "foundations of experience," rejecting the notion that government interventionism could save the country from the Depression.
_	Joe Salkowski of the "Chicago Tribune" wrote, "You have to wonder about a business plan based on the notion that people want to interact with a soda can," while Debbie Barham of the "Evening Standard" quipped that the CueCat "fails to solve a problem which never existed."
_	The first speaker in this example has confused the meaning of the phrase, apparently believing that any exception to any rule "proves" the rule true; in this case, the notion that "the exception proves the rule "in cases not excepted"" is neither implied nor understood by the speaker.
_	This will cause each person engaged in the interaction to arrive at the "presumption of relevance", which is the notion that "(a) implicit messages are relevant enough to be worth bothering to process, and (b) the speaker will be as economical as they possibly can be in communicating it".
_	It was not a commercial success but reinforced the notion that Van Zandt was one of the premiere singer/songwriters of his generation.
_	It challenges the notion that to hear voices is necessarily a characteristic of mental illness.
_	He had, writes Stroud, "helped change the notion that the desert was a hopeless place for camouflage, where the only thing to be done was to disperse vehicles.
_	Bryan chastised evolution for teaching children that humans were but one of 35,000 types of mammals and bemoaned the notion that human beings were descended "Not even from American monkeys, but from old world monkeys".
_	This win brought the club's tally in the Divisional Senior Football Championship roll of honour to 11, including the often disputed victory of 1942 which the club always claim to have won, though a scarcity of records give credence to the notion that they were the only team affiliated at senior level in that season.
_	Evidence has also supported the notion that women may be better providers of social support.
_	Harris and Pinker have put forward the notion that the influence of parents has been much exaggerated and that socialisation takes place primarily in peer groups, although H. Rudolph Schaffer concludes that parents and peers fulfill different functions and have distinctive roles in children's development.
_	Based on its interpretation of British law, the court rejected the notion that labour and skill was enough to grant protection to a work, since "unless the procedures for creating the lists concerned as described by the national court are supplemented by elements reflecting originality in the selection or arrangement of the data contained in those lists, they do not suffice for those lists to be protected by the copyright laid down in the directive."
_	Thus, the notion that individuals are simultaneously supporters and victims of the system-instilled norms is a central idea in system justification theory.
_	The typeface of Dyslexie was created with the notion that many of the letters in the twenty-six lettered ISO basic Latin alphabet are visually very similar, thus more confusing for people with dyslexia.
_	General Claude Auchinleck distributed a directive to his commanders seeking to dispel the notion that Rommel was a "superman".
_	The intervallic structure alone is a dynamism that turns back the notion that interval is merely a device for enhancing or restricting improvisation.
_	During 1943, the war in the Atlantic turned against the Germans, but Dönitz continued to push for increased U-boat construction and entertained the notion that further technological developments would tip the war once more in Germany's favour, briefing the "Führer" to that effect.
_	As reproductions became popular, so did the notion that it contained a hidden figure.
_	This view rejects the notion that race is biologically defined.
_	The full role of the gas channel in regulating the rate catalytic activity is still a subject of investigation, but several studies support the notion that molecules of CO do in fact travel directly from the C-cluster to the ACS active site without leaving the enzyme.
_	Kennedy also faced the notion that with one brother President and another U.S. Attorney General, "Don't you think that Teddy is one Kennedy too many?"
_	At the core of this thesis is the notion that when the rate of return on capital (r) is greater than the rate of economic growth (g) over the long term, the result is concentration of wealth, and this unequal distribution of wealth causes social and economic instability.
_	The battle once again confirmed the notion that Polish cavalry was unable to defeat well-positioned Swedish infantry.
_	Brian's bandmates resented the notion that he was the sole creative force in the group.
_	‘Neumann's approach is . . . a double-edged sword since it reinforces the notion that Israel/Zionism -- not Jews/Judaism -- is the source of the problems facing the Mid-East.
_	He entertains the notion that he is the most cunning and intelligent creature in the Abyss; indeed, there are few who could possibly contest such a claim.
_	Powell also disagreed with the notion that the British Army were "glorified policeman" solely designed to keep order between two warring sides.
_	What pluralists certainly do have in common is the notion that a single vision or ideological schema, whether Marxism or unbridled neoliberalism, is likely too simplistic and rigid to advocate human beings' natural plurality of values.
_	"Linking back to the debates of the Women's Liberation Movement the collective rejects the notion that feminism is "about a group of ‘experts’ telling other women how to live; or about a handful of rich and powerful women getting to ‘the top’".
_	The principle of Adhikari-bheda has also been made to refer to the notion that each caste and sect has its own rituals and beliefs, in a unified, but hierarchically differentiated structure within which each knows its place.
_	Others agree with the notion that there has been an increase in net jobs due to NAFTA's implementation, but also believe that these net gains are coming at the price of worker's wages.
_	Heather has had a number of books published which present evidence and theories that intend to disprove the notion that alcoholism exists as a disease.
_	I admit not being entirely sympathetic to the wry fatalism she proposes, to the notion that we travel enough in our heads to make leaving home almost redundant.
_	According to MFI's website, Shahi is the Awaited Messiah, but they deny the notion that Shahi is another form of Jesus and claim that Jesus has also returned to support the Mehdi.
_	We rebuked the notion that the voice of the paper should be trivial," Tiner told the "Monroe News Star".
_	She espoused the notion that Catholics and Huguenots could reason together on their doctrinal differences, and live together in loyalty and service to the Crown.
_	Although the Pope upholds the sanctity of the sacrament of marriage, he rejects the notion that it is the only reasonable path available to a person.
_	Celibacy is based on the notion that the priest is "In persona Christi" and that Jesus Christ was himself celibate all his life.
_	Renault also posits the notion that Alexander's relentless drive to conquer the world stemmed in part from his troubled relationship with his domineering mother, and his desire to "escape" from her influence by leading his army ever eastward.
_	Thirdly, legalising physician assisted suicide/euthanasia infers acceptance of the notion that 'some suicides are okay'.
_	Since its erection in 1986, however, the validity of this subfamily designation has been the subject of much debate, although most phylogenetic studies support the notion that the pygmy chameleons of the subfamily Brookesiinae are not a monophyletic group.
_	In the following years, Carter rebutted the notion that Pine was a homophobe, saying that "I think he was strictly following orders, not personal prejudice against gay people".
_	At the end of the episode, Kyle and Stan conclude big corporations are good because of the services they provide people, and uphold the notion that the businesses providing the best product deserve to succeed in the marketplace and grow to become larger.
_	They were later replaced by "regular" formations ("ukṣāṇaḥ" and so on, some as early as the Rigveda itself), but the notion that the short stem vowel might have been from an -stem is supported by the unique morphology of the Germanic forms:
_	DeMott refuted the notion that it was his idea, stating that the other trainees came up with because they wanted to skip the session.
_	The Pharaoh honored their stay and even made the notion that if there were any competent men in their house, then they may elect a chief herdsman to oversee Egyptian livestock.
_	Supporters of neuroconstructivism, such as Annette Karmiloff-Smith, argue against innate modularity of mind, the notion that a brain is composed of innate neural structures or modules which have distinct established evolutionarily developed functions.
_	`Abdu'l-Bahá and Shoghi Effendi made occasional comments favorable to the notion that potential auxiliary languages be simple and easy to learn.
_	Eighteen days after infection, the worm burden in antibiotically-treated mice was drastically reduced ("P"<0.001), further supporting the notion that bacteria are essential to the worms' establishment.
_	The Ultimate Resource is a 1981 book written by Julian Lincoln Simon challenging the notion that humanity was running out of natural resources.
_	His ingenious use of these viewpoints later enabled him to promote in his books the notion that there was a shared experience between the people of Britain and this community in a distant, relatively unexplored area of the empire.
_	As of 2008, the courts have generally rejected the notion that cash balance plans discriminate based on age, while the Pension Protection Act of 2006 offers relief for most hybrid plans on a prospective basis.
_	BBC executives stated that the series would "look at the way one non metropolitan, urban police force comes to terms with economic regeneration by reorganising it's City Division, in turn creating a separate Inner City Waterfront Division", and that the series would explore "aspects of police work not normally featured and disabuse us of the notion that TV crime is always cracked in 50 minutes."
_	In a final letter in this exchange from Scott to Lauder, dated 19 November 1829, Scott rejected again the authenticity of the "Vestiarium Scoticum" and further rejected the notion that Lowlanders ever wore clan tartans.
_	Some of the higher end predictions we have been hearing recently, such as the notion that it will take several hundred thousand U.S. troops to provide stability in post-Saddam Iraq, are wildly off the mark.
_	Hume has contended and defended the notion that "reason alone is merely the 'slave of the passions'."
_	Both of these notable works lent great initial support for the notion that leadership is rooted in characteristics of a leader.
_	Having established this expansive objective as the starting point, Yong C.J. dismissed the notion that the over- and under-inclusiveness of section 37(1) meant it was unconstitutional.
_	Thus, the statement of Syncellus supports the notion that Antiochus XII's second Nabataean campaign was also aimed at Judea; perhaps Antiochus XII sought to annex the coastal cities of Alexander Jannaeus as a retribution for the defeat mentioned by Syncellus.
_	Lastly, the study regarding face recognition and identification reinforces the notion that articulatory suppression interferes with an individual’s ability to encode information.
_	Nataf has promoted the notion that mercury toxicity may be a cause of autism at various conferences, such as at the United States Autism and Asperger Association's annual conference.
_	He dismisses the notion that the state is the natural outcome of the evolution of human societies.
_	Both succeed, by committing to the notion that a yearning to be reborn within a hopeless, brittle soul is worthy of drama—as well as a deeper, gentler humor."
_	During the course of its evolution, TELACU has developed an approach that emphasizes economic development based on the notion that this approach is a more effective means of impacting the community compared to its initial approach dedicated to community organization.
_	Consequently, the notion that how well a brain can reorganize itself after damage as a function of the developmental stage is now known as the "Kennard principle".
_	Those on the social-democratic left consider themselves Trudeau's heirs and vigorously denounce any policy that would harm the Just Society legacy, while the neoliberal right attacks the notion that Trudeau's Canada was more "just" than other eras.
_	Nonetheless the notion that the women lied persists in some quarters and 'secret women's business' is used as a term of derision and disrespect.
_	This nearly ubiquitous appearance in species with an adaptive immune system demonstrates that IgD is as ancient as IgM and suggests the notion that IgD has important immunological functions.
_	The actual titles are in question (as is the notion that these were album-length recordings), but the first title has been confirmed by a former head of the now defunct Smelly Tongues fan club.
_	There is evidence that these benefices were held within the sept for a number of generations, supporting the notion that the family had developed a political hold on the offices without having even been ordained as priests.
_	In his keynote address to the American Quilt Study Group in 2000, James credits Laury’s book as his “first introduction to the notion that quilts didn’t have to conform to some historical prescription” and with his “first awareness that there might be a place for experimentation and individual expression.”
_	Sach, however, challenges the notion that the Hebrew word "Yom" (Hebrew: יום) in the creation account, according to Genesis, refers to a literal day (24 hours), therefore denying that creation occurred in a period of six days (6 x 24 hours).
_	The statistic is premised on the notion that the total number of outs in which a player participates is more relevant in evaluating that player's defensive play than the percentage of cleanly handled chances as calculated by the conventional statistic fielding percentage.
_	For example, the notion that humans engage in acts of choice implies that they have preferences, and this must be true for anyone who exhibits intentional behavior.
_	This contradicts the notion that Brazil's race problem is one of wolf crying or racial democracy.
_	He mocked the notion that the Government would make no more territorial demands of other newspapers if they allowed the "Mirror" to be censored.
_	In particular, the notion that human beings were driven by the same impulses as "lower animals" proved to be difficult to reconcile with the idea of an ennobling spirituality.
_	"Contrary to the notion that heavy metal music glorifies or encourages substance use…, Black Sabbath’s lyrics…
_	Vlad III was also said to have had acute porphyria, which may have started the notion that vampires were allergic to sunlight.
_	The order is also premised on the notion that liberal trade and free markets will contribute to global prosperity and peace.
_	"We reject the notion that millions of Germans are not to be designated as national.
_	Devizes serves as a mouthpiece for many of H.G. Wells's social ideas in the latter half of the novel, such as the notion that "True education [is] self-subordination to a greater life, to the social self."
_	Cognitive therapy was also based on the pioneering work of Albert Ellis, who popularized the notion that our thoughts and beliefs create our moods during the 1950s.
_	His pamphlet "Body & Genital Piercing in Brief" included such commonly reproduced urban legends as the notion that Prince Albert invented the piercing that shares his name in order to diminish the appearance of his large penis in tight trousers, and that Roman centurions attached their capes to nipple piercings.
_	The JR and Babe relationship was written as exemplifying the notion that love endures all, which became evident through their dysfunction.
_	Citing the biblical verse "the matter is very near to you, in your mouth, your heart, to do", the philosophy is based on the notion that the human is not inherently evil; rather, every individual has an inner conflict that is characterized with two different inclinations, the good and the bad.
_	This voyage defined most of the southern coast of Australia and discouraged the notion that "New Holland" as it was then known, was linked to Antarctica.
_	Regarding the Person of Christ and the Hypostatic union, Chalcedonian Creed affirmed the notion that Christ is "One Person", having "One Hypostasis".
_	In addition, it describes them as possessing large flocks of sheep, supporting the notion that they were at least partly nomadic.
_	The U.S. approach was premised on the notion that all technology of value to the United States was in the United States, that the most effective means to have the technology was to execute internal research and development (R&D), so therefore, the only necessary national technology policy was to prevent its flow out of the country.
_	Common, although erroneous, is the notion that black holes "vacuum up" material in their neighborhood, where in fact they are no more capable of seeking out material to consume than any other gravitational attractor.
_	Luke Tsai of the "East Bay Express" said Taylor was "doing God's work in helping dispense with the notion that wine shops are all stuffy, intimidating places frequented only by the rich."
_	This theory evolved into the idea of cradle-to-cradle design, which adds the notion that at the end of a building's life, it should be disposed of without environment impact.
_	Research has continued to support the notion that although incentive systems may be effective and efficient in one organizational context, they can be ineffective or even counterproductive in others.
_	A related line of evangelical argument addresses the notion that Jesus Christ was a great philosopher and ethicist, but not God.
_	Minimalist reasoning centres around the notion that the application of a term like "true" to a statement does not assert anything significant about it, for instance, anything about its "nature".
_	This is consistent with the notion that being treated fairly satisfies a basic need".
_	On his blog LePan has defended the notion that the aesthetic and moral need not be regarded as mutually exclusive—in his words, “it should not be assumed that a work that tries to "do" good cannot also "be" good.
_	Historian Ken Mondschein ridiculed the notion that the bloodline of Jesus and Mary Magdalene could have been preserved:
_	Supported by empirical research, Zero-to-Three and WAIMH have both advocated for the notion that just because babies can not tell you their symptoms, does not mean that they do not suffer from mental health problems.
_	More recent studies, in October 2017, support the notion that life may have begun right after the Earth was formed as RNA molecules emerging from "warm little ponds".
_	Heathcote attempted to disabuse Richardson of the notion that he was like a father to the player.
_	Perpetuating the family cult with many descendants was coupled with the notion that producing more children offered the family a layer of protection, reinforcing its power in the community.
_	This definition of plant perception differs from the notion that plants are capable of feeling emotions, an idea also called plant perception.
_	Although Fra Antun Knežević was not a unique phenomenon in this sense (he took the idea directly from his fellow friar, Fra Ivan Franjo Jukić who was his teacher and mentor earlier in his life, but also many other members of Franciscan order in Bosnia, since the 17th century, accepted the idea of a Bosniak identity and transferred within the brotherhood into 18th and 19th century), he certainly had strongest impact, next to Fra Jukić, left deepest mark on Bosnian culture and history, both of them as champions of the notion that Catholics, Orthodox and Muslims are one nation, and Bosnia and Herzegovina country with deep cultural and historical roots.
_	The statement, then known as a 'Statement on Violence', was designed to refute "the notion that organized human violence is biologically determined".
_	However the notion that the CIA had any contact with non-Afghan mujahideen and specifically bin Laden is disputed by a number of sources.
_	In addition, it is linked to the notion that simple forms will free people from the everyday clutter, thus contribute to tranquillity and restfulness.
_	Into the 21st century, the notion that Presley had "stolen" black music still found adherents.
_	This eyebrow frown is associated with the perception of goal obstacles, supporting the notion that determination is associated with the action tendency of preparing to overcome difficult obstacles in goal pursuit.
_	Verdi was distraught, for he held on to the notion that the opera could be staged in modern dress—as "Stiffelio" had been done—
_	recommended "a need for further educating the public on the division of cognitive labor and its implications for making judgments" and adding to formal science education the notion that "making reliable judgments often requires deference to scientific experts".
_	In addition, McCain returned to his long-standing practice of granting almost unlimited media access to him on this bus; this as well as the notion that he engages in "straight talk" free of political calculation gave him a positive personal sentiment in the press.
_	He rejects the notion that Article V excludes other modes of constitutional change, arguing instead that the procedure provided for in Article V is simply the exclusive method the government may use to amend the Constitution.
_	Isocrates concludes with the notion that, in finding the happy mean, it is better to fall short than to go to excess.
_	Sampson et al criticize the notion that “academic researchers can be insulated from ethical guidelines on the protection for human research subjects because they are working with a social media business that has ‘no obligation to conform’ to the principle of ‘obtaining informed consent and allowing participants to opt out’.”
_	The Syndicate, which divided its shares equally amongst M. Guggenheim & Sons and J.P. Morgan & Co., continued to buy up hundreds of thousands of acres of wilderness, which gave rise to the notion that Alaska was “First a Colony of Russia, then a colony of Guggenmorgan”.
_	Also, the notion that "humans will discriminate social behaviors towards genetic relatives" is again not entailed by the theory.
_	The "General Stud Book" entry for his dam does not support the notion that he was foaled outside of the United Kingdom.
_	If Margaret Ogilvy [Barrie's mother as the heroine of his 1896 novel of that title] drew a measure of comfort from the notion that David, in dying a boy, would remain a boy for ever, Barrie drew inspiration."
_	NYF and Museveni advocate abstinence-only education in its most exclusive form, even pushing the notion that condoms are inadequate in preventing HIV and education involving them promote sexual activity among youth.
_	Many black advocacy groups have disputed the notion that homophobia is more prevalent in the African American community than other groups, and claim that surveys have shown that their attitude towards homosexuality are similar to the rest of the population.
_	Critics argue that this ideology accepts the notion that identities are singular and disparate, rather than multiple and intersecting.
_	A second aspect of feminist critique centers upon the notion that even where women have become criminologists, they have adopted 'malestream' modes of research and understanding, that is they have joined and been assimilated into the modes of working of the masculine paradigm, rendering it simultaneously gender blind and biased (Menzies & Chunn 1991).
_	Both St. Clement of Alexandria ("c". 150-215) and his pupil, Origen of Alexandria ("c". 185-254), developed a view of purification after death; this view drew upon the notion that fire is a divine instrument from the Old Testament, and understood this in the context of New Testament teachings such as baptism by fire, from the Gospels, and a purificatory trial after death, from St. Paul.
_	The Popular Front of Latvia supported the notion that long-term residents of Latvia who declare their will to obtain citizenship of Latvia and clearly connect their destiny with the state should become citizens.
_	Inspired by the notion that the political intrigues behind the Wars of the Roses often seemed like playground squabbles, Howell and production designer Oliver Bayldon staged the four plays in a single set resembling a children's adventure playground.
_	The agency quickly became disillusioned with the many societal implications of the case, most notably the notion that Frank was able to evade prosecution due to his being a rich Jew, buying off the police and paying for private detectives.
_	Her book partially perpetuated the notion that Webster was guilty, although, she too had reservations about the testimony and verdict.
_	The notion of the set "S" being absorbing is different from the notion that "S" absorbs some other subset "T" of "X" since the latter means that there exists some real number "r > 0" such that formula_4.
_	Fundamental to the concept of public sector ethics is the notion that decisions and actions are based on what best serves the public's interests, as opposed to the official's personal interests (including financial interests) or self-serving political interests.
_	Convinced that the most unusual stories had the best chance of reaching the front page of a newspaper, he was "quickly weaned off the notion that [he] should be interested in the mundane".
_	The Victorian scholar Herbert Sussman has suggested that although Butler's exploration of machine evolution was intended to be whimsical, he may also have been genuinely interested in the notion that living organisms are a type of mechanism and was exploring this notion with his writings on machines, while the philosopher Louis Flaccus called it "a mixture of fun, satire, and thoughtful speculation."
_	One often encounters the notion that telic verbs and verb phrases "refer" to events that "have endpoints", and that atelic ones "refer" to events or states that "don't have endpoints".
_	Thus, it is doubtful that one can define telic expressions by means of properties of the events or states that they "refer" to (a very similar problem arises with the notion that mass nouns refer to "things that can't be counted").
_	Koppel then posited the notion that others critical of Scientology were less apt to come forward and speak publicly due to fears of potential recrimination from the Church.
_	This overlap was not consistent with the notion that section 28(1)(c) created separate and independent rights for children and their parents.
_	Feminist critics of the notion that Islam significantly bettered the status of women include Leila Ahmed, who states that Islamic records show that at least some women in pre-Islamic Arabia inherited wealth, ran businesses, chose their own husbands, and worked in respected professions.
_	These interpretations of camera angles, however, ultimately derive from the notion that bigger is better.
_	The primary feature that characterizes a tendency as gnostic for Voegelin is that it is motivated by the notion that the world and humanity can be fundamentally transformed and perfected through the intervention of a chosen group of people (an elite), a man-god, or men-Gods, "Übermensch", who are the chosen ones that possess a kind of special knowledge (like magic or science) about how to perfect human existence.
_	Consequently, this challenges the notion that the potential to commit a crime necessarily correlates with actually committing the crime.
_	Within a week of the crash, serious considerations were given to the notion that the plane had been intentionally brought down.
_	Common sayings such as "the harmony of the spheres" and "it is music to my ears" point to the notion that music is often ordered and pleasant to listen to.
_	Externals, however, take more chances and, for example, bet more on a card or number that has not appeared for a certain period, under the notion that this card or number has a higher chance of occurring.
_	Over the years, both the novel and the movie were well received for their depiction of a nuclear crisis, despite many critical reviews rejecting the notion that a breakdown in communication could result in the erroneous go-command depicted in the novel and the movie.
_	They found that European leaders rejected the notion that "imperialism" had to be based upon formal, legal control by one government over a colonial region.
_	During the 1988 presidential election, the Willie Horton attack ads run against Democratic candidate Michael Dukakis built upon the Southern strategy in a campaign that reinforced the notion that Republicans best represent conservative whites with traditional values.
_	Citing Chapter 19 of the Gospel of Matthew, he disputed the notion that anyone, including the pope, had the authority to accept divorced and remarried Catholics as full members of the Church.
_	Bell’s presentation maintains the notion that ritual, political power and legitimation of power are three interdependent theories.
_	His love for graffiti has been a spiritual journey, rather than the notion that it is a form of vandalism.
_	Critics reject the notion that "Hordeum pusillum" was the "barley" referred to in the Book of Mormon.
_	Industrial ecology is the notion that major manufacturing and industrial processes need to shift from open loop systems to closed loop systems.
_	He published a book entitled "Who Is A Jew?" on the subject, wherein he rejects the notion that Jews are a part of one race or that Jewishness is a nationality.
_	They accentuate the notion that the powers of discernment associated with connoisseurship are socially superior to or more desirable than other forms of knowing.
_	There are religious, cultural, and ancestral components to Jewish identity due to its fundamental non-proselytizing nature, as opposed to Christian or Muslim identity which are both "universal" religions in that they ascribe to the notion that their faith is meant to be spread throughout all of humanity, regardless of nationality, (and still are, though to a far lesser extent than throughout its history in the case of Christianity).
_	In doing so, he challenged the notion that the number of grains of sand was too large to be counted.
_	However, a lot of chemists , including Antoine Lavoisier, continued to view fermentation as a simple chemical reaction and rejected the notion that living organisms could be involved.
_	In contrast, a January 2014 poll found 61% of Republicans, 68% of Democrats and 67% of independents accept the notion that income inequality in the US has been growing over the last decade.
_	Some contemporary scholars uphold the notion that Becerra Tanco, Florencia, and Sigüenza y Góngora endeavored to authenticate the events of the narrative by placing its original authorship in hands that were both native to Mexico and of greater antiquity than the mid-17th century.
_	Primarily this included the notion that the historian reconstructed events and phenomena that had actually occurred in objective reality through the process of rigorous analysis of documentary sources.
_	More recent research results confirm the notion that human occupation in Szelim dates back as far as 200,000 years BP.
_	Ahimsa has also been related to the notion that any violence has karmic consequences.
_	He also commented on the notion that Francis Galton later called eugenics:
_	The media seemed equally fascinated by the notion that a Caucasian woman had converted to Islam and chosen to wear the full abaya and niqab.
_	This concept originated in common law out of the notion that an invention must be inventive.
_	There is little or no evidence to support the notion that Akhenaten was a progenitor of the full-blown monotheism that we find in the Bible.
_	In a newspaper interview, Mohler accepted that he was a fascist but only in the tradition of José Antonio Primo de Rivera and with the acceptance of the notion that fascism had its roots in the far left, as argued by Zeev Sternhell.
_	An older article by the same reviewer disagreed with the notion that "Yu Yu Hakusho" was similar to "Dragon Ball", stating that the former franchise has better developed characters, more interesting action sequences, and more humor.
_	"The politics of our time"..."are deeply embedded in the ideas of individualism...but it's not the be-all-and-end-all...the notion that you only achieve your true self if your dreams, your desires, are satisfied...it's a political idea."
_	In one of his eugenic tracts for that year, he circulated the notion that genes "do not produce characteristics per se, but rather provide certain evolutionary guidelines", which suggested to his readers that pedagogy had a major role in cultivating innate qualities.
_	"[...] the notion that probabilistic theories must be about ensembles implicitly assumes that probability is about ignorance.
_	His gallery paintings thus were a medium to accentuate the notion that the powers of discernment associated with connoisseurship are socially superior to or more desirable than other forms of knowledge.
_	Needham thought the notion that the Chinese script had inhibited scientific thought was "grossly overrated".
_	Films may resort to the notion that romance is a solution to life's problems or is unchangeable, tapping into a "love conquers all" appeal; for example, in "doomed" romances where the underlying message is that the love the couple shared endured even though their time together was cut short.
_	Implicitly Nirex feels unable to credit the notion that this barrier would fail; but the lack of any calculation based on an adverse, as distinct from a conservative, interpretation of this chemical containment seems to me to be an unfortunate omission from the emerging safety case, particularly having regard to FOE's impressive critique of the concept."".
_	Nevertheless, the CCP leadership during this period espoused the notion that the Chinese approach to ethnic and national liberation must closely observe and corroborate the orthodoxy of the "New Philosophy" in the Soviet Union, which were later canonized in the Constitution of Chinese Soviet Republic in 1931.
_	This research argues that most people recoil from the specter of relativism: the notion that the deepest moral-political values are arbitrary inventions of mere mortals desperately trying to infuse moral meaning into an otherwise meaningless universe.
_	It is "the notion that everything one perceives in the world relates to one's own destiny", usually in a negative and hostile manner.
_	He is particularly scathing about deep ecology and its "fatuous pronouncement" that Green politics is "neither left nor right, but ahead", which, for him, ignores the notion that "that which does not confront the system becomes its instrument".
_	Both work with the notion that propositions can be mapped to sets of possible worlds, that is, a proposition can be defined as the set of worlds in which that proposition is true.
_	Rudbeck conceives the notion that a road linking Fada to the main highway and larger population centers will be of great benefit to the region.
_	Lord Morpeth thought it had "much that is able, startling, striking" and progressive development did not conflict with Genesis more than then current geology, but did "not care much for the notion that we are engendered by monkeys" and objected strongly to the idea that the Earth was "a member of a democracy" of similar planets.
_	Club operators dispute the notion that strippers are unwilling victims.
_	The scheme capitalized on the notion that anyone could make money on the internet without much effort.
_	One recurrent aspect of Arthurian literature was the notion that he would one day return in the role of a messiah to save his people.
_	The operation strengthened the notion that the Israeli navy could not be solely a conventional one, and had instead to incorporate naval commandos and other small weapon systems as an integral part of its doctrine.
_	Politically, for example, the Rainbow Serpent was adopted as the symbol of an anti-uranium mining campaign in Australia, using the notion that the mining would disturb the Serpent and cause it to seek revenge as a metaphor for environmental destruction.
_	Naughton challenges the notion that the United States is experiencing an obesity epidemic by pointing out that the Centers for Disease Control, which made that assertion in 2004, recanted it the following year.
_	Berlin saw Hamann as having recognised as the rationalist's Cartesian fallacy the notion that there are "clear and distinct" ideas "which can be contemplated by a kind of inner eye", without the use of language – a recognition greatly sharpened in the 20th century by Wittgenstein's private language argument.
_	His writing is grounded in the notion that one's work ought to be rooted in and responsive to one's place.
_	Carroll does not disagree with the notion that women are objectified in film; rather, his stance says that women are not the only ones affected by the erotic gaze of viewers.
_	This is the notion that, as Diner’s subtitle has it, American Jews were initially 'silent' about the Holocaust—that the greatest catastrophe in Jewish history was somehow swept under the rug of American Jewry’s collective consciousness."
_	Yet in their decision the court reinforced the notion that "should inmate requests for religious accommodations become excessive, impose unjustified burdens on other institutionalized persons, or jeopardize an institution's effective functioning, the facility would be free to resist the imposition."
_	Van der Walt and Michael Schmidt criticise the "standard" works on the overall history and theory of anarchism and syndicalism for focusing on the North Atlantic region, and for insisting upon an indefensible "Spanish exceptionalism," the notion that in Spain alone were anarchism and syndicalism mass movements.
_	Martin advanced the notion that heat exhaustion and heat stroke were not the result of defective evaporation, as had previously been believed, but simply a matter of failing to drink enough water.
_	This system explicitly contrasts with the notion that elected representatives should be the primary decision-makers in government, though it does not necessarily imply eliminating elected representatives.
_	Observing the formation of "ai"- and "sr"-cyclopentene products would support the notion that a stepwise, non-concerted mechanism is operative whereas their absence would point towards a fully concerted mechanism.
_	It is justified by the notion that there exist some questions best resolved through the political process, voters approving or correcting the challenged action by voting for or against those involved in the decision.
_	In a November 2017 survey of leading economists, only 2% agreed with the notion that a tax bill similar to those currently moving through the House and Senate would substantially increase U.S. GDP.
_	Many legal scholars in China believe that the Three Supremes serves to "enshrine the notion that the law must serve the basic strategic interests of the CCP by taking into primary consideration the CCP’s own notion of pressing national priorities, interests and realities."
_	In the letter, Mixon challenged the notion that the majority of service members support a change in the policy and advocated both service members and their families to speak out in opposition to any change.
_	The video pretends to debunk the notion that how you look always seems to be more important than who you are.
_	This further support the notion that CCL2/MCP-1, CCL5/RANTES and CCL17/TARC play a crucial role.
_	Of particular interest to Inness was the notion that everything in nature had a correspondential relationship with something spiritual and so received an "influx" from God in order to continually exist.
_	In the work, Gilbert and Gubar examine the notion that women writers of the nineteenth century were confined in their writing to make their female characters either embody the "angel" or the "monster."
_	Farrow writes that either Canada "is, or is not, committed to the notion that divine worship is linked- one way or another- to 'a love of the laws,' and a love of the laws to divine worship".
_	Montalembert's study, among others, gives claim to the notion that we perceive these types of illusions utilizing the left hemisphere of our brain.
_	In 1989, the notion that the missionary efforts of the Witnesses would culminate before the turn of the century was first reaffirmed, then abandoned.
_	Jelly Roll Morton disputed the notion that Hickman's orchestra was one of the first big bands.
_	The estrangement between Aaron and Buddyhead, which both releases are on, would only solidify the notion that the band would prefer that these releases were unavailable.
_	The term "" (Aum is his form), when identified with Ganesha, refers to the notion that he personifies the primal sound.
_	Some magicians today, such as Guy Hollingworth and Tom Stone have begun to challenge the notion that all magic effects fit into a limited number of categories.
_	He was also responsible for the notion that case-control studies test effectiveness, not efficacy, of interventions.
_	Bayly mentions that the chapters in "The Peasant Armed", demonstrate a slow modification of the notion that caste was the key category of revolt or, in any simple sense, the basic unit of Indian rural society.
_	Results generally support the notion that Aché hunters pursue only those prey types that would increase their energy return rates, and pass by some species (many small birds, rodents, reptiles, etc.) that would probably lower overall foraging returns if pursued.
_	Supporters of nonsubordination theory use these examples to dispel the notion that battering is always the result of heat of the moment anger or intense arguments.
_	Rather than subscribe to the notion that "highly influential individuals" to whom "monuments" are built shape historical developments, the band name posits that it is actually the "masses" struggling for change who make history.
_	Michael Psellos, however, rejected the notion that human beings could transform into demonic beings, and so there would be no need for a particular penance; the official position of Orthodoxy was that such creatures did not exist.
_	Indeed we get carried away with the notion that we are already close to the gift of foreknowledge."
_	Thus, he and others arrived at the notion that their churches should bear simply the name of "Christian."
_	Furthermore, several academic articles have challenged the notion that 1 arcminute of resolution is the typical resolving power of the human eye, suggesting that on average, we can resolve detail smaller than that.
_	Critics say that this gendered split of the workforce only perpetuates the notion that women are meant to be homemakers and men the breadwinners.
_	According to Michael Horton, an expert on Yemeni affairs, the notion that the Houthis are an Iranian proxy is "nonsense".
_	"The New York Times" reported that the film could be considered "the silliest picture ever made", yet implements "a very shrewd silliness, perpetrated by a good director in the best traditions of cinematic horror, so that even while you laugh at its nonsense you may be struck with the notion that perhaps that's as good a way of enjoying oneself at a movie as any".
_	On February 9, 2006, the injunction against Wikimedia Deutschland was overturned, with the court rejecting the notion that Tron's right to privacy or that of his parents were being violated.
_	They are more likely to support the notion that ‘God doesn’t make junk’ and that students are often capable of achieving more than they realize.
_	While this is consistent with neuroscience, it is difficult to confront the notion that we are preprogrammed.
_	The ethos surrounding her latest work, as stated by Ferreira, is the notion that our dreams can effectively be transformed into a reality granted we take advantage of the circumstances at our disposal; these circumstances, as she delineates them, are freedom, choice and desire.
_	Support for the notion that at least a few of these cars were produced in 1943 would come from a photograph (obtained from Toyota Motor Co. Ltd.) of a BA captioned as "1943 Totoya Model BA 4-cylinder saloon" in at least one source.
_	Finally, the modern relevance of Confucianism was centered on the notion that Confucian values were better than Western ones.
_	This discovery reinforced the notion that Onuf's nucleus controlled the muscles related to sphincter function in the anus and urethra.
_	C bond angles are consistent with the notion that phosphorus predominantly uses the 3p orbitals for forming bonds and that there is little sp hybridization of the phosphorus atom.
_	However, the philosopher Donald Davidson published a highly regarded essay in 1974, ""On the Very Idea of a Conceptual Scheme"" ("Proceedings and Addresses of the American Philosophical Association", Vol. 47, (1973–1974), pp. 5–20) arguing that the notion that any languages or theories could be incommensurable with one another was itself incoherent.
_	Thus, the affordance approach challenges the traditional view of perception by arguing against the notion that computation and introspection are necessary.
_	In his book, “Preparing Anti-Oppressive Teachers in 6 Disciplines”, Kevin Kumashiro dispels the notion that anti-oppressive teaching is limited to social studies such as politics and history.
_	Humphries originally defined audism as, "the notion that one is superior based on one's ability to hear or behave in the manner of one who hears."
_	Bianca and Maggie's romance received criticism in addition to praise; there was a part of the audience that saw the romance as detrimental to both characters; they cited that it reinforced the notion that straight women can be "converted" by lesbians, or that lesbians and straight women cannot be friends without sex becoming an issue between them.
_	I have never seen or heard of a submarine disaster that was not accompanied by the notion that the battery blew up and started it all.
_	Developing from the notion that the disabled require interaction with technology, Treviranus goes on to postulate that the alternative technological techniques that are being developed to be used with computers be as easy to use as the control mechanisms they replace such as speech or touch-typing for example.
_	In an age where victims of AIDS and HIV continue to face moral condemnation, "The Sower" twists the notion that morality can be assigned to a disease.
_	This reinforced the notion that the Germans were indeed intending a breakout, and the Home Fleet changed direction from northeast to northwest to again try to intercept.
_	He rejected the notion that, despite Vladimirescu's statements to the contrary, the rebellion had a peasant character, and argued instead that it was evidence of low-ranking boyars and merchants ("the embryo of a class, that was to become the bourgeoisie") attempting to emancipate themselves from Ottoman pressures.
_	Prior to the election, Rove voiced impatience with the notion that his own reputation is on the ballot.
_	Shweder, Mahapatra, and Miller (1987) argued for the notion that different cultures defined the boundaries of morality differently.
_	For example, they reject the notion that men should attempt to woo women by spending money on them (e.g. buying drinks, presents, jewelry), calling it "supplication".
_	The site promotes a number of alternative health ideas, including the notion that homeopathy can treat autism, and that vaccinations have hidden detriments to human health.
_	Wink's analysis is predicated on the notion that Babylonian society and pagan religion, as well as Western society and popular culture, are intrinsically less valid than his notion of first century Christian society and "pure" monotheism.
_	The inspiration for this search has been summed up on the blog of one of these searchers: "I am finding it extremely difficult to let go of the notion that the Nighthawks diner was a real diner, and not a total composite built of grocery stores, hamburger joints, and bakeries all cobbled together in the painter's imagination."
_	Challenging the notion that a minority candidate could not run in a non-minority district, Reddock surprised many by garnering more than 14% of the votes, thereby establishing a name for herself in Los Angeles politics.
_	For the Incidental Tango album, Masri envisioned the notion that music is always the soundtrack of everyone's life, and thus Tango in all of its forms is the 'incidental music' of life in Buenos Aires..
_	Peart states: "All those paeans to American restlessness and the American road carried a tinge of wistfulness, an acknowledgement of the hardships of the vagrant life, the notion that wanderlust could be involuntary, exile as much as freedom, and indeed, the understanding that freedom wasn't free.
_	Elli is not mentioned in any other extant source but the notion that not even the gods are immune to the effects of aging is supported by the fact that they must consume the apples of Iðunn regularly to stay young.
_	However, independently of the emergence of inclusive fitness theory, from 1960s onwards many anthropologists themselves had reexamined the balance of findings in their own ethnographic data and had begun to reject the notion that human kinship is 'caused by' blood ties (see Kinship).
_	In Gorgias he defends the notion that it is better to suffer injustice than to do it.
_	More generally, it described the notion that all forms of writing could only "offer particular versions of reality rather than actual descriptions of it," and that a story need not offer a clear resolution at its end.
_	The idea comes from a perceived need to reconcile Edwin Hubble's observation of an expanding universe (which was also predicted from Einstein's equations of general relativity by Alexander Friedmann) with the notion that the universe must be eternally old.
_	In an interview with Caucasian Knot on 3 September Lakoba stated that he would not participate in the December 2009 presidential election and he called absurd the notion that he would join the opposition.
_	Ganilau said that the notion that politically motivated crimes could be justified was ""insulting to the intelligence of ordinary people,"" and that it represented a naive and uncaring attitude toward the hurt suffered by many during the 2000 coup.
_	Zion Organization, whose theological beliefs challenged the notion that African Americans were second-class citizens.
_	The genre of gallery paintings had by that time become a medium to accentuate the notion that the powers of discernment associated with connoisseurship are socially superior to or more desirable than other forms of knowing.
_	Calling this new development Springdale, Prew developed the area as living quarters for workers at the mills in South Holyoke, with the notion that many of those previously living in tenements could become new homeowners.
_	An argument against this states the notion that such manipulation may be possible but barred from the conscious self via the subconscious self, a 'locked' portion of the mind that is still nevertheless the same mind.
_	The collection was often dismissed as a poetic version of Women's Lib although Atwood herself rejected the notion that the Women's Movement influenced the conception of "Power Politics".
_	This supports the notion that moral reasoning is related to both seeing things from other persons’ points of view and to grasping others’ feelings.
_	When Frollo is about to kill Quasimodo and Esmeralda, he quotes a biblical verse (supporting the notion that he justifies his wrongdoings as God's will):
_	These two Faculties were then the only specialist centres outside America, in itself an interesting point since it could be said that it was the Americans who created a demand on a broad scale for the best available in Interior design; and it was the American concept of contemporary lifestyle which prompted the notion that the small garden should be prioritised as an important facility in exactly the same way as the Interior of the house.
_	Although James Curtis, Whale's biographer, rejects the notion that Whale would have identified with the Monster from a homosexual perspective, scholars have perceived a gay subtext suffused through the film, especially a camp sensibility, particularly embodied in the character of Pretorius and his relationship with Henry.
_	There is growing support for the notion that unfair labour practices should include not only disputes of right, but also disputes where there is an expectation of a right.
_	A senior US official disputed the notion that Panetta's criticism of Pakistan had set back the talks.
_	"Dragon Lady" challenges the notion that the Empress Dowager Cixi used the Boxers in the Boxer Rebellion.
_	Also in 1978, Celender created "Destiny of a Name", a survey dealing with the notion that a person's name may determine their profession.
_	The political scientist Andrew Parkin said that one of Dunstan's main achievements was to debunk the notion that state governments and parliaments lacked the ability to make significant reforms with profound impacts.
_	A single mother's contribution to society is not based on formal employment, but on the notion that provision of welfare for children is a necessary social expense.
_	Lee collaborated with Howell on the video and they both imagined it as a "parallel and backstory to the film" which explores the relationship between the main protagonist and her son and the notion that "love is stronger than death".
_	In spite of Sentinel's pleas, Optimus was forced to leave Elita-1 on the notion that she was killed in the explosion, both unaware of her transformation to Blackarachnia.
_	Included in this agreement was the notion that the goal of the ecumenical process is unity in diversity, not structural reintegration.
_	A similar approach has been suggested by physicists David Bohm, Basil Hiley and philosopher Paavo Pylkkänen with the notion that mind and matter both emerge from an "implicate order".
_	More serious was the demand for a huge payment to cover the damages caused, on the notion that British involvement had lengthened the war.
_	Moreover, Burbank argues, Socialist ideas had found its mark in Oklahoma, with many poor farmers earnestly believing from their experiences in daily life in the reality of "exploitation" and accepting the notion that the European war was little more than capitalist business enterprise writ large.
_	I like the notion that comas can allow a person to radically reinvent themselves upon awakening.
_	Evolutionary psychologists have tried to answer why individuals who are more physically attractive should also, on average, be more intelligent, and have put forward the notion that both general intelligence and physical attractiveness may be indicators of underlying genetic fitness.
_	You can call Gringo a statement, a step forward, a step backwards, or just the right step but the Circus Devils finalize the notion that trying to put a label on them remains impossible and that is what makes them worth seeking out!"
_	I would hold that AT&T committed a current violation of Title VII when, post-PDA, it did not totally discontinue reliance upon a pension calculation premised on the notion that pregnancy-based classifications display no gender bias.
_	In a 2014 article in "Social Politics" she developed the notion that in seemingly egalitarian workplaces inequality becomes “unspeakable” and perhaps even unintelligible.
_	Unlike "colored", which refers only to blacks and is often considered offensive, "person of color" and its variants refer inclusively to all non-European peoples—often with the notion that there is political solidarity among them—and "are virtually always considered terms of pride and respect".
_	When the big man let rip on the notion that all "song" in the natural word is about sex, and so, therefore, is popular music, Björk reacted as we all did, I suspect, and looked a bit embarrassed."
_	He later commented, "As I spoke words of comfort to our listeners and callers, I struggled to reconcile the notion that the God of Matthew 10, the one who considered us worth 'more than many sparrows,' would design or abide the taking of Mullins’ earthly life in such a pointless, gruesome manner."
_	Whitman was a contemporary of the Fireside Poets who complained that they were too focused on reflecting English styles and themes in American poetry: "Thus far, impress'd by New England writers and schoolmasters, we tacitly abandon ourselves to the notion that our United States have been fashion'd from the British Islands only, and essentially form a second England only — which is a very great mistake".
_	The 'Disassociated' advocated "more aggressive performance management" for the company and espoused the notion that values were in opposition to corporate performance.
_	Frenschkowski allows that there were practical concerns in the question of "how to present Scientology to the outside world", but dismisses the notion that the religious format was just an expedient pretense; Frenschkowski points to many passages in Hubbard's works that document his struggle with this question.
_	By the 17th century, Poland's legal and political tradition was characterized by: parliamentary institutions and a system of checks and balances on state power, which was itself limited by decentralization; the idea of a contractual state, embodied in texts like the Henrician Articles and the "Pacta conventa"; the concept of individual liberties; and the notion that the monarch owed duties to his subjects.
_	Judge Jean-Claude Antonetti, the presiding judge in the trial, issued a separate opinion in which he disputed the notion that Tuđman had a plan to divide Bosnia.
_	Lydia Akinola at The Christian Manifesto felt that the release was "bold, catchy and likeable" of which was "bursting with energy and life, defying the notion that popular Christian music is all show and no substance."
_	Following the appeal to the public, another reference to "Meanderings of Memory" was found in an 1854 Sotheby's catalogue, which rendered less likely the notion that the work might be a hoax by a nineteenth-century miscreant.
_	He later stated in an interview that he was unsure if the evidence was true, inviting the notion that the party was banned because of its increasing chances of winning seats in the July 1995 parliamentary elections.
_	De Palma has, however, been quick to downplay the notion that the movie suffered because of studio interference: "The initial producers, once we had cast Tom Hanks, moved on and went over to Columbia Pictures, so I was sort of left to my own devices and pursued ways in which I thought I could make this movie more commercial and keep some edge of the book...
_	Am exhibited a giant globe that emphasized the notion that we had come to be able to think of distances between major world cities in hours and minutes rather than in terms of chancy voyages over great distances.
_	What is insulting is the notion that you can't speak honestly about Jews without getting into trouble.
_	During the 18th and 19th century, the notion that the problem of squaring the circle was somehow related to the longitude problem seems to have become prevalent among would-be circle squarers.
_	There is little or no evidence to support the notion that Akhenaten was a progenitor of the full-blown monotheism that we find in the Bible.
_	Köhler defended the harsh criticism of Germany and rejected the notion that the IMF was too soft on the US.
_	The book has been described as a "necessary ... corrective" of the assertion that bubbles are inevitable in the market system, and contests the notion that the greed of the American consumer was a primary cause of the problem.
_	Neil Postman endorsed the notion that technology impacts human cultures, including the culture of classrooms, and that this is a consideration even more important than considering the efficiency of a new technology as a tool for teaching.
_	Timothy Good's 1991 book "Alien Liaison" provided inspiration for several of Julian Gollop's revisions, such as the notion that world governments might seize alien technology or secretly conspire with the invaders (a negative result which can occur in-game).
_	In "The Floating Bridge", David Shumate vanquishes once and for all the notion that the prose poem is somehow inherently ‘not a real poem.’
_	He was also motivated by the notion that the Riemann hypothesis is not a brick wall, and one should feel free to make "stronger" conjectures.
_	As an investigator whose cases often take a paranormal twist, he challenges the notion that – as presented by Sherlock Holmes – "when you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth", citing as an example an incident where a young girl is somehow reciting the stock market prices exactly as they change but twenty-four hours behind schedule.
_	During his work for the Japanese government, Baty developed the notion that China was not worthy of recognition as a state under international law, a view that was later used to justify invasion of China.
_	The results support the notion that bottom-up perceptual mechanisms, such as those involving the premotor cortex and cerebellum, can temporarily override top down knowledge therefore resulting in a radical illusion of transfer of body ownership.
_	This is such a powerful idea that as the sun rises in the sky and the air heats up and as, gradually, the puddle gets smaller and smaller, it's still frantically hanging on to the notion that everything's going to be all right, because this World was meant to have him in it, was built to have him in it; so the moment he disappears catches him rather by surprise.
_	Kühn et al. (2011) also posited the notion that expression suppression may be internally controlled and that emotional responses are targeted by suppression efforts.
_	In a campaign video, US Senator Bernie Sanders asserts that the Koch brothers fund think tank position papers, media pundits and politicians to promote three distorted perceptions: the need to raise the age of retirement, the notion that the social security system is going bankrupt, and the idea that social security should be privatized.
_	The Federation of Romanian Associations in Europe (FADERE) protested against the clip, which has lyrics such as ""If I steal your wallet / Or remove all the copper / Don't get angry / I just want to have fun," calling it "racist and xenophobic," claiming that it encourages the notion that "the community of Romanians in Spain is made up of prostitutes, thieves and pickpockets."
_	"The New Yorker" singled out Basehart's performance for praise, saying that he "succeeds in conveying the notion that he is indeed sorely beset."
_	Whereas previous thinkers such as Hegel or Marx backslid at some point and held onto the notion that there was a necessary institutional or historical social development, Unger, in the words of one critic, seeks to "take the idea to the hilt and produce a theory of emancipation that will escape the limitations of liberal and Marxist theories."
_	Previous criticisms of the IAT typically centered around the notion that IAT effects were a product of familiarity with stimulus items, rather than actual implicit attitudes.
_	Others, such as Malcolm Gladwell and Evgeny Morozov, take issue with the notion that the ties formed electronically are "strong" enough to matter in terms of advocacy.
_	Teaching opposes collectivist approaches such as Communism but at the same time it also rejects unrestricted laissez-faire policies and the notion that a free market automatically produces social justice.
_	Criticism from a variety of fronts has challenged the notion that academic study can examine memes empirically.
_	Lyrically, the a-side song deals with the notion that communication is extremely important in any kind of relationship, hence the title "Communication".
_	With his thought-provoking ideals and references to a euro-centric society, he imposes the notion that black Americans should stray from a white aesthetic in order to find a black identity.
_	Critics created the notion that the common themes in these three films made them a trilogy or cinematic triptych.
_	The neuroscientist Simon LeVay, writing in "Queer Science" (1996), observed that the title of "One Hundred Years of Homosexuality", "encapsulates...the notion that homosexuality was brought into existence by the invention, in the late nineteenth century, of the word used to define it."
_	In the book, Felt denies the notion that he was Deep Throat."
_	It worked because Jackie Kennedy had created so much curiosity by censoring the book she authorized – William Manchester's 'The Death Of A President' – because what I wrote was a metaphorical truth about LBJ's personality presented in a literary context, and because the imagery was so shocking, it broke through the notion that the war in Vietnam was being conducted by sane men."
_	Professor Peter Hogg objected to the notion that governments and judges cannot directly negotiate.
_	Gibson rejected the assumption of a poverty of stimulus by rejecting the notion that perception is based upon sensations – instead, he investigated what information is actually presented to the perceptual systems.
_	When Dooku laughs aside the notion that she could be a Sith, Ventress tries to attack Dooku, but the Sith Lord renders her unconscious with Force lightning.
_	In the quest to identify for themselves who or what they wanted to be, women in the liberationist movement rejected the notion that equality could be attained in a society in which they were dependent upon men and challenged societal gender roles.
_	In a 2011 article published in the Taiwanese journal "Issues & Studies", Rockower wrote that "Gastrodiplomacy is predicated on the notion that the easiest way to win hearts and minds is through the stomach."
_	Though contested by some, their five-year winning streak in the championship between 1984–85 and 1988–89 corroborates the notion that the team was really the best during this period.
_	In this same case it was also accepted that "an extensive frame of reference is created by the notion that “property” consists primarily in control over access.
_	Allegations of rape and torture of Irish women imprisoned in the city of Armagh in Northern Ireland are the core content of the song "Armagh", which challenges the notion that "civilized nations" do not torture.
_	However Colonel Edward Lansdale, the man credited with the campaign, rejected the notion that his campaign had much effect on popular sentiment.
_	The album was named in reference to the notion that 1984 was the band's "'sell by date", the year that they had often publicly stated that they would split up.
_	It held incorrect the notion that "illegal conduct" and problems of allegiance were, "so far as relevant here, ... the only [grounds] which it could fairly be argued were adopted by Congress in light of prior administrative practice," "Kent" at 127-128, was not correct because "Kent" also recognized that the legitimacy of the objective of safeguarding our national security was "obvious and unarguable." id at 509 and that the protection accorded beliefs standing alone is very different from the protection accorded conduct.
_	This idea contrasts the notion that duration is the only measure of academic capital, since a student may go to four-year university while another goes to two-year junior college, but if the four-year student isn’t invested in academics he doesn’t utilize the capital.
_	When the kids ask for a president, Spanky elects his pal Alfalfa without his authorization, under the notion that Alfalfa "hates women".
_	This research further supports the notion that determination motivates perseverance, perhaps more so than other positive emotions that have been theorized to be associated with perseverance.
_	In August 2015, he criticized the notion that abortion is necessary to save the life of the mother in certain cases, calling it a "false choice."
_	Luis reinforces the notion that Yolanda’s shattered identity stems largely from the "multiple names used [to refer to her].
_	In much of his later work, Emerson seems to allow the notion that different races will eventually mix in America.
_	The term was coined to avoid the notion that a writing system that represents sounds must be either a syllabary or an alphabet, which would imply that a system like Aramaic must be either a syllabary (as argued by Ignace Gelb) or an incomplete or deficient alphabet (as most other writers have said).
_	In modern physical cosmology, the cosmological principle is the notion that the spatial distribution of matter in the universe is homogeneous and isotropic when viewed on a large enough scale, since the forces are expected to act uniformly throughout the universe, and should, therefore, produce no observable irregularities in the large-scale structuring over the course of evolution of the matter field that was initially laid down by the Big Bang.
_	The Daoist discipline of "daoyin" "guide and pull" is based on the notion that circulating and absorbing "qi" "breath; life force" in the body can lead to longevity or even immortality.
_	In 1835, Calhoun moved to Washington, D.C. to be a copyist for her father, with the notion that she would never marry.
_	But she also rejected the notion that characters should be symbolic rather than realistic." and Rand herself stated, "My characters are never symbols, they are merely men in sharper focus than the audience can see with unaided sight.
_	In his journal article about the portrayal of African American men in "Homicide: Life on the Street", documentary historian Thomas A. Mascaro said the presentation of light-skinned black villains like Luther Mahoney and dark-skinned actors like the one played by James Earl Jones in "Blood Ties", "dispels the notion that black skin color is uniform or determinative with regard to character".
_	The song emphasizes the notion that Joe seems to know all there is to know about the French capital including the whereabouts of all the little bars, all of the Parisian streets, the Seine, and bridges.
_	Too late in the bands life came the notion that throwing yourself around the stage and making a racket was great in a club but maybe didn't translate to an arena or stadium crowd.
_	Activity theory therefore includes the notion that an activity is carried out within a social context, or specifically in a community.
_	Sreenevasan later said that the rally "exploded many myths" in Malaysia, including the notion that people of different ethnic and religious backgrounds could not work together and that the middle class was "too comfortable to step up to the plate."
_	Paul Sereno "et al". (1993), supported the notion that "Eoraptor" was an adult specimen based on the closure of sutures in the vertebral column, and the partial fusion of the scapulocoracoid.
_	Powell also disagreed with the notion that because it was in Africa, different methods were acceptable:
_	But this does not preclude the notion that the name may have its roots elsewhere.
_	In the past four decades, beginning around the publication in 1974 of Thomas E. Skidmore's "Black into White", a revisionist study of Brazilian race relations, scholars have begun to criticize the notion that Brazil is actually a "racial democracy".
_	Many psychologists reject the notion that men actually experience emotions less frequently than do women.
_	In Latin America, the "pink tide" that swept leftist governments into power at the turn of the millennium can be seen as a reaction against neoliberal hegemony and the notion that "there is no alternative" (TINA) to the Washington Consensus.
_	IT builds on the notion that the pervasiveness of narratives in most cultures, from the earliest nursery rhymes to the performances of theater, film, and television, expose us to a variety of characters, situations, and reasons for acting in certain ways.
_	Harris had published the notion that one following his conscience should not have to yield to "any human order amongst men," a position that Williams called "unbounded license for individuals."
_	Eventually, claiming to have an interest in her power, Aizen has Orihime Inoue brought to Las Noches on the notion that he needs her to save the powers of the deteriorating Hōgyoku.
_	The French based this claim on the notion that German soldiers, in an attempt to undermine the loyalty of France’s colonial subjects in Africa, had given the "tirailleurs" favored treatment as prisoners of war.
_	These conclusions of Oestreich have met with some scepticism in the academic community, and the notion that Lipsius' political ideas had a decisive influence on political developments and military reforms in the Dutch Republic has been challenged.
_	Another frequently raised value of federalism is the notion that since the states are much closer to the people, they can be more responsive to and effective in resolving the localized concerns of the public.
_	For example, the notion that events can be ordered into causes and effects is necessary to prevent (or at least outline) causality paradoxes such as the grandfather paradox, which asks what happens if a time-traveler kills his own grandfather before he ever meets the time-traveler's grandmother.
_	This expense, as well as the notion that the debate would activate ideological extremists and that normal electoral rules would not apply, were criticised in Parliament.
_	They intend to frighten people with the notion that the government's overspending leads to the government's default.
_	It has also been suggested that the notion that evolution was removed from textbooks due to religious pressure, only to be reinstated decades later, was an example of "whig history" propagated by the Biological Sciences Curriculum Study, and that the shift in the ways biology textbooks discussed evolution can be attributed to other race and class based factors.
_	Eventually, scholars left the notion that culture evolved though predictable cycles, and the study of material culture changed to have a more objective view of non-Western material culture.
_	Tennessee Assemblywoman Dorothy Brown said black women "should dispense quickly the notion that abortion is genocide", rather, they should look to the earliest Atlantic slave traders as the root of genocide.
_	The Work Foundation is focused on promoting the concept of "Good Work" - the notion that good quality jobs lead to higher productivity, improved quality of working life, improved employee engagement and better workplace health and well-being.
_	Lieutenant T.H Barry, though supports the notion that something was amiss with the engine:"I saw an S.E.5 flying from west to east across the aerodrome at 200–300 feet.
_	Favre disputed the notion that he did not want to play for Green Bay and said that while he understands the organization has decided to move on, they should now allow him to do the same.
_	She started the #VisibleWomen movement on Twitter in March 2016 "to disabuse folks of the notion that women comic artists are rare, to get eyes on said artists & to get them work."
_	Indeed, this integral is strongly suggestive of the notion that the "density" of primes around should be .
_	The Spanish magistrate of Ibarra could not accept the notion that a native could read and write, or write knowledgeably about history.
_	In a Note in the "Washington Law Review" critical of the "Image Technical" remand decision, the author comments that, perhaps, "the Ninth Circuit has certainly come a long way from "Westinghouse" and its rejection of the notion that "an antitrust violation may be found where a patent holder does precisely that which the patent laws authorize."
_	The book is an update to Lessig's book "Code and Other Laws of Cyberspace", which was written in response and opposition to the notion that state governments could not regulate cyberspace and the Internet.
_	The conditions needed for a social movement are the notion that grievances shared by multiple individuals and organizations, ideologies about social causes and how to go about reducing those grievances.
_	Plato and Descartes are prominent philosophers in the development of innatism and the notion that the mind is already born with ideas, knowledge and beliefs.
_	Despite these issues, the somatic marker hypothesis and the Iowa gambling task reestablish the notion that emotion has the potential to be a benefit as well as a problem during the decision-making process in humans.
_	Butler argues the notion of "maternity" as the long-lost haven for females is a social construction, and invokes Foucault's arguments in "The History of Sexuality" (1976) to posit that the notion that maternity precedes or defines women is itself a product of discourse.
_	However the evidence for this is meager at best, and the notion that Aurelian introduced a new cult of the sun ignores the abundant evidence on coins, in images, in inscriptions, and in other sources for a strong presence of the sun god in Rome throughout the imperial period.
_	Calvin strongly opposed the notion that Christ freed prisoners, as opposed to traveling to Hell as part of completing his sufferings (Institutes of the Christian Religion, Book 2, chapter 16, sections 8-10),
_	Even if the city did in fact rely on the alert system at the time it acted, said the court, We...reject the notion that the Department of Homeland Security's threat advisory level somehow justifies these searches.
_	Saying that "we doubt that the police will often choose to further an enterprise knowing that it is contrary to the law", the Court rejected the notion that this case will unleash a wave of new litigation.
_	This gave rise to the notion that folded-unipole antennas had power gains or other wonderful characteristics not supported by radio engineering theory.
_	The Principles are based on the notion that environmental, social and governance (ESG) issues, such as climate change and human rights, can affect the performance of investment portfolios and should therefore be considered alongside more traditional financial factors if investors are to properly fulfill their fiduciary duty.
_	However, the linguist Sorin Paliga challenges the notion that the Romanian word "Zmeu" is of Slavic origin, and hypothesizes that the pan-Slavic forms were an early Slavic loan from the Dacian language.
_	One element of the traditional Chinese criminal justice system is the notion that criminal law has a moral purpose, one of which is to get the convicted to repent and see the error of his ways.
_	He opposed the tendency to turn Judaism into a "world religion", universal and devoid of particularism, arguing for the centrality of the notion that the People Israel shall one day regain its own existence at "a small corner of the earth."
_	Emerging research proposed the notion that successful goal attainment is in part attributable to the manner in which goal setting criteria are framed.
_	The following day, four members of the group, including Guignard, a doctor, and two intelligence agents, paid US$5,900 for a round-trip flight to São Paulo de Olivena under the notion that they were on a hiking trip; others in the group were seen going to the Hotel Tropical with metal cases.
_	Reviewers compared "Crawlspace" to the 1989 Gary Busey film "Hider in the House", and "Shock Till You Drop" commented that while "Crawlspace" was overly familiar, "at the end of the day, it pays respect to the notion that even the safest place in our world may still have secrets."
_	In contrast to most of his contemporaries, Freud rejected the notion that in most cases pathological phenomena are manifestations of physiological dysfunctions (Lanteri-Laura, 2005a).
_	FTO partially co-localizes with nuclear speckles, which supports the notion that in the nucleus, mA can be a substrate of FTO.
_	When Hinamori is manipulated into thinking that Hitsugaya killed Sōsuke Aizen, Hitsugaya attacks Gin on the notion that he tricked her.
_	Israel disputes the notion that the West Bank and in particular East Jerusalem are occupied under international law, though this view is dismissed internationally.
_	Thus, Lincoln's success may have further emboldened belief, on both sides, in the notion that the war would eventually end with the Union's original ambition achieved.
_	By September 1854 his second volume of "Barnacles" had been printed and dispatched, and he turned his attention to Species, telling his cousin William Darwin Fox that he planned to "view all facts that I can master..to see how far they favour or are opposed to the notion that wild species are mutable or immutable".
_	Longerich writes: "We should abandon the notion that it is historically meaningful to try to filter the wealth of available historical material and pick out a single decision" that led to the Holocaust.
_	There is no recognition of the notion that a single specimen system could manifest more than one state at a time, as assumed, for example, by Dirac.
_	According to Elizabeth Gershoff, these findings appear to challenge the notion that corporal punishment is "good" for children, even in cultures with histories of violence.
_	The work defended the notion that genuine human happiness is to be found by using and embracing philosophy.
_	Research has demonstrated that organisms affected by the parasite exhibit a diminished or inverted avoidance response to the scent of predators when compared to uninfested specimens, supporting the notion that the parasite manipulates its host, with the goal of passing itself on to its definitive host, a freshwater fish.
_	When a rival nation to The States decides to take control of the global landscape by tapping into the power of The Blue, Aspen Matthews discovers that a new adversary has risen to challenge the notion that she is the most powerful person on the planet-and humanity may suffer the consequences!
_	He displayed his affinity with regular Singaporean culture and Singaporeans by addressing crowds at rallies with smatterings of Malay and Hokkien to dispel the notion that he was a "foreigner", as he had spent many years abroad.
_	The ordeal would normally be conducted with a rope holding the subject connected to assistants sitting in a boat or the like, so that the person being tested could be pulled in if he/she did not float; the notion that the ordeal was flatly devised as a situation without any possibility of live acquittal, even if the outcome was 'innocent', is a modern exaggeration.
_	Mike McCurry, spokesman for Bill Clinton proclaimed "As the President indicated to some of us, the notion that the United States would lose Winnie is utterly unbearable."
_	Kim has since praised Skrein for dropping the role, stating, "I applaud the producers and, in particular, Ed Skrein for championing the notion that Asian characters should be played by Asian or Asian American actors."
_	It represents the notion that the simple things in life are treasures, alongside the thought that the richness and fullness of a life well-lived is defined by one's view of self-expression.
_	However, bisexual-identified people and scholars may object to the notion that bisexuality means sexual attraction to only two genders, arguing that since "bisexual" is not simply about attraction to two sexes and encompasses attraction to different genders as well, it includes attraction to more than two genders.
_	Howe rejects the notion that Naipaul is an apologist of colonialism.
_	Based on the notion that forgiveness is driven primarily by empathy, the offender must accept responsibility and seek forgiveness immediately following the transgression, as apologies have shown to elicit empathy from the offended partner.
_	Sci-fi fans with a sense of humour will particularly love it, as will readers who endorse the notion that uncomplicated narrative is just not enough for many young people.
_	This stereotypical concept was invented by white slave owners who promoted the notion that male African slaves were animal in nature.
_	Esk and Simon go on to develop a new kind of magic, based on the notion that the greatest power is the ability not to use all the others.
_	At the conclusion of the First World War there was general support for the notion that the tramway system should be owned and operated by a public authority.
_	However, in the intervening years, the notion that supergenes (or more often, simply individual organisms) have evolved "to identify genetic relatives and preferentially cooperate with them" took hold, and became the way many biologists came to understand the theory.
_	He was subsequently sued by the university for libel, with the lawyer representing the university in the case saying that, "Mr. Williams' allegations about McMaster [are] on a par with UFO reports and JFK conspiracy theories...the notion that because there are people on faculty from Egypt that McMaster is then a haven for terrorism is not only logically offensive, it smacks of racism."
_	adds weight to the notion that the major trading centers in these two neighboring provinces should be treated as essentially one market.
_	The latter findings as well as clinical studies in vitro experiments on human tissues support the notion that both parental "GATA2" genes are needed to produce levels of the GATA2 transcription factor sufficient for developing and maintaining normal levels of hematological stem and progenitor cells in humans.
_	Diaconu admits that such an approach could be read as "gratuitously bookish, [where] a line is more important than an event, a pun more important than a murder", but supports the notion that they all display an "existential bearing", accounting for an "intrinsic value."
_	London’s meteorological aberrations were first studied by Luke Howard, FRS in the 1810s, but the notion that this large warm area would produce a significant urban thermal plume was not seriously proposed until very recently.
_	Dalwai was opposed to the notion that religion could help in encouraging modernisation and secularism.
_	He was a critical thinker who went as far as to question the authority of Old Testament quotations and the notion that the emperor's command was unwritten law.
_	Among the possible arguments was the notion that the Indians' actions in Jacobs Field (since renamed "Progressive Field") were a state action according to the symbiotic relationship test established in "Burton v. Wilmington Parking Authority".
_	Although the proclamation echoes the 1948 Conference of Composers in the Soviet Union, and the Zhdanov Doctrine, the notion that the Soviet delegates dictated the outcome has been challenged.
_	"Lyrically, this is me focusing on eventual demise or at least the notion that big rain is coming and at some point I'm going to get pretty fu--ing wet."
_	This is the notion that animals need a more or less constant amount of sleep every day, so that if a subject is deprived of sleep one day, the amount of sleep tends to "rebound" (increase) the next few days.
_	She has disclaimed the notion that she is a "feminist"; in a 2013 interview she rejected the label, stating, "I'm not a feminist.
_	Historically, the Weierstrass function is important because it was the first published example (1872) to challenge the notion that every continuous function is differentiable except on a set of isolated points.
_	If no cDNA is created by RT-PCR, then multiplex PCR is performed on the notion that most or all of the gene is obliterated.
_	The bad blood between the newspaper and the left wing groups deepened and reached a climax with the editorial "Political Prisoners?", published in 1972, in which the newspaper challenged the notion that there were people jailed for their political ideas in Brazil.
_	The economic, political and social crises of contemporary France -terrorism, violence, immigration, unemployment, racism, etc.—and (for some) the notion that France has lost its sense of identity and international prestige—through the rise of American hegemony, the growth of Europe and of global capitalism ()—have created what some critics (like Nancy Huston) have seen as a new form of detached nihilism, reminiscent of the 50s and 60s (Beckett, Cioran).
_	In May 2013, Buchtar Tabuni, the leader of the National Committee for West Papua (KNPB) supported the notion that if West Papua was granted independence, he would support them joining the MSG.
_	Instead, it is inspired by an early passage in which Comus, prior to his meeting with The Lady, muses on the notion that sin is only problematic if others become aware of it, and thus that it is right and natural to surrender to base desires while under cover of darkness, arguing that "What hath night to do with sleep?
_	Content from the website and Ross' opinion surrounding it has been cited in books such as Andrew Breitbart and Mark Ebner's "Hollywood, Interrupted" in which Ross is quoted as forwarding the notion that Hollywood and the entertainment industry is rife with connections to controversial groups, and that celebrities as role models may influence people by their endorsement of such groups.
_	Lord Minto resisted the notion that its action may be the manifestation of political grievance by concluding that:
_	However, some researchers have objected to the notion that mental development can be "arrested" or stopped, preferring to consider mental status as developing in other ways in psychological terminology.
_	However, he rejects the notion that all Muslims are necessarily violent people.
_	Cartesian anxiety refers to the notion that, since René Descartes posited his influential form of body-mind dualism, Western civilization has suffered from a longing for ontological certainty, or feeling that scientific methods, and especially the study of the world as a thing separate from ourselves, should be able to lead us to a firm and unchanging knowledge of ourselves and the world around us.
_	This reaffirms the notion that Herodian was about 70 years of age when this was written and that the actions did indeed occur during his lifetime.
_	This was a reference to the notion that pricing of state-owned produce should reflect cost as accurately as possible.
_	This was later confirmed in further studies, supporting the notion that ancient Mars was a "water-rich world with conditions amenable for life".
_	The pace, the punchlines, and the characters of Dog Park all land just a little north of target, even though the notion that canine playgrounds make good pickup grounds for humans would appear to be an imperviously, uncompromisingly L.A. idea."
_	The Task Force committed itself to the notion that any viable program fostering the integration of informational technology must be structured in such a way that the value of risk-taking would be clearly evident and occasional failures would be viewed as opportunities for future success.
_	According to a 2003 review of DMPA, the majority of published clinical studies indicate that DMPA is not associated with depression, and the overall data support the notion that the medication does not significantly affect mood.
_	To a non-believer who rejects the notion that the truth about God, the world, and themselves can be found within the Bible, the presuppositional apologist attempts to demonstrate the incoherence of the epistemic foundations of the logical alternative by the use of what has come to be known as the "Transcendental Argument for God's existence" (TAG).
_	Having presented his counter argument against the principle of alternate possibilities, Frankfurt suggests that it be revised to take into account the fallacy of the notion that coercion precludes an agent from moral responsibility.
_	Following the completion of the new Global Center for Health Innovation and spurred by a tax over run that was raised by the county to construct that facility, the first chief executive of Cuyahoga County, Ed FitzGerald spearheaded the notion that the county needed to mount a hotel project to meet demand for bigger conventions that would overlook Cleveland simply because it no longer had a large enough hotel to accommodate over 500 guests at a time in one location.
_	A memorandum by Assistant Attorney General Charles J. Cooper rejected the notion that a Saxbe fix—a rollback of the salary for the position—could satisfy the Ineligibility Clause.
_	Williams's first appearance as Zorro was on the Disney anthology television series "The Fourth Anniversary Show", wherein he challenged the notion that Zorro was a "fictional character".
_	Praxeology or praxiology (; ) is the study of human action, based on the notion that humans engage in purposeful behavior, as opposed to reflexive behavior like sneezing and unintentional behavior.
_	Based on the notion that the best way to learn something is to teach it, cross-age tutoring has been used to teach pupils specific skills.
_	Mark McKenna disputes the notion that the character traits that supposedly define the Anzac spirit are uniquely and demonstrably Australian, arguing that these virtues are in fact universal, being "found in Palestine and Iraq, in Darfur and East Timor, in Afghanistan and Zimbabwe."
_	In addition to emphasizing the novel's morality, Pollock reviews the characters in catalogue-like fashion, praising and criticizing them in according to the notion that Austen favors Elinor's point of view and temperament.
_	Environmental modeling undertaken in 2018 suggests that in a 'business-as-usual' scenario of wood depletion, above-ground woody biomass in Haiti would only decrease by approximately 4% of existing stocks , lending credence to the notion that the issue is vastly misunderstood and exaggerated.
_	These studies support the notion that people from collectivistic cultures tend to demonstrate a holistic cognitive style, which is reflected in processes such as memory, visual perception, attributional style, and categorization schemas.
_	Led by a coalition of organizations known as Washington Families Standing Together (WAFST), the campaign to approve the referendum was built around the notion that secular organizations needed to ally with progressive religious organizations in order to leverage their organizing power, and credibility within communities of faith, where much opposition to LGBT equality finds root.
_	Marr also insisted that the notion that a people are united by common language was nothing more than false consciousness created by “bourgeois nationalism”.
_	Many of the company's Shakespearean productions at the time were considered interpretive and modern, which drew criticism from some traditionalists, but Shaw defended the experimental nature of the shows and rejected the notion that plays should be restricted to preconceived interpretations.
_	Scott Glausher of "HipHopDX" said "If there is one hypothesis that J.I.D wants you to walk away with after bumping "The Never Story", it’s the notion that he can rap well.
_	Most importantly, since 1990 and its 1st Congress, OAKKE was supporting -in terms of tactics- the eve of Greece in the then EEC (as opposed to the founding position of OAKKE in 1985, which was a direct exit from the EEC) with the notion that United Europe constitutes a mound to the two superpowers, Russia and the USA, especially to the Russians, who according to Mao Zedong, have as their first geo-strategic goal the military conquest of Western Europe.
_	He argues that this casts doubt on the notion that recessions are caused by a reallocation of resources from industrial production to consumption, since he argues that the Austrian business cycle theory implies that net investment should be below zero during recessions.
_	The word "dike", "justice", conveyed the notion that someone should stay within his own specified boundaries, respecting the ones of his neighbour.
_	In an interview with "Lucky Magazine", Wise stated that the idea for the collection stems from the notion that: "Bread is a symbol of status and wealth (think 'the breadwinner' or the use of the term 'dough') and these 'it' bags connoted status in the early 2000s..."
_	According to Madaio, the notion that Vivekananda and other Hindu modernists deviate from orthodox, classical Advaita Vedanta, neglects the fact that considerable developments took place in Indian religious thinking, including Advaita Vedanta.
_	Founded in 1967, the label takes its name from the notion that improvisation is "instant composition".
_	Sometimes this began to be used by a monarch to support the notion that the king ruled both his own kingdom and Church within its boundaries, a theory known as caesaropapism.
_	Transactionalists reject the notion that any truth is inherently settled or beyond question.
_	These studies have converged on the notion that there is a greater rate of delay in language development in twins compared to their single-born counterparts.
_	He argues against the notion that Ancient Greece, although ahead of its time for most of antiquity and perhaps the Middle Ages, was eventually superseded by the advancements in Renaissance Europe.
_	New thinking favored the notion that no religious doctrine can be supported by philosophical arguments, eroding the old alliance between reason and faith of the medieval period laid out by Thomas Aquinas.
_	In the light of postmodern critique, the notion that one could control systems or say objectively "what is" came increasingly into question.
_	Lastly this large review also supported the notion that in hospital settings no medicinal type of cord care treatment was better at reducing infections compared to dry cord care.
_	Grant, in rejecting the Lost Cause arguments, said in an 1878 interview that he rejected the notion that the South had simply been overwhelmed by numbers.
_	James Mann points out: "quite a few neo-conservatives, like Wolfowitz, believed strongly in democratic ideals; they had taken from the philosopher Leo Strauss the notion that there is a moral duty to oppose a leader who is a 'tyrant.
_	The combination of subtitles and minimal exposure adds to the notion that "World Cinema" has an inferred artistic prestige or intelligence, which may discourage less sophisticated viewers.
_	In this context, he was noted for rejecting the notion that deputies were ethnic representatives, declaring himself a servant of the country as a whole.
_	To subvert the notion that Brutes are just the "dumb muscle" of the Covenant, Atriox is presented as a smart commander that takes advantage of the alliance's collapse.
_	Lampkin uses the outburst to turn his arguments abruptly into the notion that Baltar is being railroaded to execution and the trial is being held as a formality to justify the carnal desire to punish Baltar beyond any blame he deserved.
_	Their content may generally be characterized as a rejection of the notion that Orthodox Christianity in America constitutes a diaspora, that the ongoing uncanonical disunity of American Orthodoxy must come to an end.
_	R&B production, blasts the notion that MJB is all raw power and Beyoncé is all chilly technique — the women are both bold and great here, with a slight advantage going to Blige."
_	As for the third question, the court found nothing in logic or law to militate against acceptance of the notion that an extant right may be transferred to another forthwith despite its being subject to a condition.
_	On the other hand, there are reports that disagree with the idea that individuals can work hard, obtain an education and succeed because there is the notion that America is actually getting poorer and actually more likely to stay poor as compared to any other western country.
_	Richard Santucci, chief of urology at Detroit Receiving's Center for Urologic Reconstruction, has criticized the notion that this masturbation technique causes any issues.
_	Moreover, men who were shown in the footage occasionally communicated in English and laughed, providing credence to the notion that the tapes were fake and entirely staged.
_	A new consciousness of the inequality of American women began sweeping the nation, starting with the 1963 publication of Betty Friedan's best-seller, "The Feminine Mystique", which explained how many housewives felt trapped and unfulfilled, assaulted American culture for its creation of the notion that women could only find fulfillment through their roles as wives, mothers, and keepers of the home, and argued that women were just as able as men to do every type of job.
_	In 2012 it had an exhibition of fine art such as painting and photography done by indigenous people, with the aim of combating the notion that such is only done by those of European heritage.
_	Others suggested moving more slowly, as Bill Clinton did before his attempt to enact a national healthcare program, based on the notion that rapid change could quickly wear down any bipartisan consensus.
_	These words have since been taken by many to support the notion that Henderson is selfish and arrogant, although years later, Henderson revealed that he had gone over his planned remarks ahead of time with Brock, and the Cardinals Hall of Famer "had no problem with it.
_	He established, according to Griffin, the notion that the blowpipe was an instrument of "indispensable utility", and his published work, later translated into English, was regarded as one of the most useful books on practical chemistry extant.
_	The god introduces the notion that not all "tengu" are equal; knowledgeable men become , but ignorant ones become .
_	As a result, comics published in "Read Yourself Raw" challenges the notion that comics’ intended audience only as one for children.
_	Furthermore, researchers from the 20th century and earlier perpetuated the notion that slow lorises were common by reporting them as either present or absent rather than noting low population densities in their field research.
_	Clergie is the notion that people have a duty to understand, learn, and preserve works of the past for future peoples.
_	influential in adding weight to the notion that any murder was sinful, regardless of the authority which directed it - a school of thought that would last up until the First Crusade (1096-1099).
_	ties many of the ideas together, developing the notion that it is flows rather than locations that are key to an understanding not only of cities but also the processes for their design and planning.
_	The Committee concluded that "...there exists no reliable, empirical evidence to support the notion that there is a higher prevalence of antisemitic attitudes within the Labour Party than any other political party."
_	However, the official BBC website cites as "myth" the notion that Sara was created as a companion to replace Katarina.
_	"The New York Times" editorialized that "Webster's has, it is apparent, surrendered to the permissive school that has been busily extending its beachhead in English instruction in the schools ... reinforced the notion that good English is whatever is popular" and "can only accelerate the deterioration" of the English language.
_	A mobile condom vendor—a pink van dubbed the "condom-mobile"—was orchestrated by a Raëlian, who advocated the notion that extraterrestrial Elohim wanted the teens to live a long life of pleasure and criticized the commission by quoting statistics about teen pregnancies and sexually transmitted diseases.
_	The RUF instilled the notion that the soldiers should never return home because of the violent atrocities they had carried out against their families and communities.
_	Some of the new theories (e.g. those proposed by David Miller and by Theo Kuipers) build on Popper's approach, guided by the notion that truthlikeness is a function of a truth factor and a content factor.
_	Lead vocalist Bono wrote the lyrics in response to the notion that it is possible to identify a person's religion and income based on the street on which they lived, particularly in Belfast.
_	The campaign is based on the notion that unnecessary tests, treatments, and procedures often do more harm than good, resulting in poor clinical outcomes and significant waste in the Canadian healthcare system.
_	He rejects the notion that a concrete physical object in the universe can be ascribed a simple spatial or temporal extension, that is, without reference to its relations to other spatial or temporal extensions.
_	Closer examination quickly dispelled the notion that the Solid Muldoon was a "petrified man"; instead, it was taken to be an ancient work of art, sculpted by an unknown primitive race.
_	Dyer nevertheless continued to travel in New England to preach her Quaker message, and in early 1658 was arrested in the New Haven Colony, and then expelled for preaching her "inner light" belief, and the notion that women and men stood on equal ground in church worship and organization.
_	Its use here seems to corroborate the notion that Belbello spent his later life in Venice, as it exhibits Venetian characteristics.
_	One premise underlying zoopoetics is the notion that humans are not the only beings who dwell (in Heidegger’s sense of the word) on the earth.
_	From their winged turtle-like mobile fortress called the Waller Castle Gamedeath, they search for water throughout the universe on the notion that they are sustaining the life .
_	First, it was the bedrock of the notion that all citizens, irrespective of rank, were entitled to seek civil justice through the King's court or courts.
_	Some scholars have challenged the notion that race is primarily a social construction by arguing that race has a biological basis.
_	Research however also challenges the notion that ethnic heterogeneity reduces public goods provision.
_	Issues of cultural relativism also affect professors' views on cheating; the standard objection being that "students from certain Middle Eastern, Asian, and African cultures are baffled by the notion that one can 'own' ideas, since their cultures regard words and ideas as the property of all rather than as individual property".
_	More recent research is questioning the notion that second-generation antipsychotics are superior to first generation typical anti-psychotics.
_	By March 30, 2016, the Pentagon renamed the base to "Kara Soar Counter Fire Complex" to reinforce the notion that the firebase was conducting "defensive missions."
_	In a survey of leading economists, none disagreed with the notion that "freer trade improves productive efficiency and offers consumers better choices, and in the long run these gains are much larger than any effects on employment."
_	The economy of scale concept, as taught to chemical engineers, has led to the notion that one of the objectives of process development and design is to achieve “economy of scale” by scaling-up to the largest possible size processing plant so that the product cost can be economically affordable.
_	However, Harris qualifies his argument by noting that, while writers act not as isolated individuals but as members of discourse communities with certain language, practices, and beliefs, the notion that academic or other discourse communities are “discursive utopias” existing without conflict is irrational.
_	Francis J. Weber, then director of the San Fernando Mission, was interviewed by the "Los Angeles Times" and rejected the notion that the Indian population had a rich civilization: "They were on par with what we studied in school as the Stone Age.
_	In their 2009 review, Puhl and colleagues found that many studies provide evidence supporting the notion that health professionals (including doctors, nurses, medical students, fitness professional, and dietitians) consistently endorse negative stereotypes about patients with overweight and obesity, in particular ascribing to them culpability for their weight status.
_	The most contentious idea at the time though was the notion that anyone could simply pick up the Bible and learn enough to gain salvation.
_	The relevance of the tradition of negative theology to Derrida's preference for negative descriptions of deconstruction is the notion that a positive description of deconstruction would over-determine the idea of deconstruction and would close off the openness that Derrida wishes to preserve for deconstruction.
_	The "Principia Discordia" holds three core principles: the Aneristic Principle (order), the Eristic Principle (disorder) and the notion that both are mere illusions.
_	Much strong academic, legislative and judicial opinion was opposed to the notion that businessmen could escape accountability for their role in the failing businesses.
_	According to the account of Onofrio Panvinio, Cardinal John of Toledo suggested that the roof be removed ("Let us uncover the Room, else the Holy Ghost will never get at us"—the first recorded reference to the notion that the Holy Spirit should guide cardinal electors), which the two magistrates readily obliged.
_	Nazi racial policies, including the notion that people who were racially inferior had no right to live, date back to the earliest days of the party; Hitler discusses this in "Mein Kampf".
_	Some volunteers participate under the notion that they receive special "ethics protection".
_	Although inaccurate, this name for the war relates to a series of scandals at the Navarre court and to the notion that Henry of Navarre took up arms in response to jibes about his love life from the French court.
_	Squire and Alvarez took the temporally graded nature of patients with retrograde amnesia as support for the notion that once a connection has been established within the neocortex the hippocampus is no longer required, but this process is dynamic and extends for several years.
_	Oklahoma Publishing Co. v. District Court (1977) expressly rejected the notion that courts or legislatures may bar the publication of the names of juvenile offenders; that case involved a newspaper's publishing the name of the juvenile offender, which it learned from a court hearing, but the rationale applies at least as strongly to a person's publishing a name that she learned from the attack itself."
_	A rejoinder is that these situations actually reflect a virtue of the BCS system, which rewards teams for their performance throughout the entire season, thereby reinforcing the notion that, in college football, every game (rather than just conference championship games, or games late in the season) matters.
_	Karl Rahner accepted the notion that without Christ it was impossible to achieve salvation, but he could not accept the notion that people who have never heard of Jesus would be condemned.
_	Nested structures of governance balancing the principles of irreducibility (i.e., the notion that certain problems can only be addressed at the global level, such as global warming) and subsidiarity (i.e., the notion that decisions should be made at as local a level possible) would thus form the basis for a cosmopolitan political order.
_	In a 1997 interview that Mr. Daly gave for the "New York Times" it is said "Mr. Daly brushed aside the notion that he and Mr. Semel are stretched too thin.
_	Many attempts at international arms control, such as the Chemical Weapons Convention, Biological Weapons Convention and the Australia Group, are premised on the notion that one or both parties involved will be state actors.
_	Supporters have said that arguments against the building are based on the notion that Islam, rather than Islamic radicals, is responsible for the terrorist attack.
_	Another study by García et al. (2007) also corroborated the notion that a large body size increased the extinction risk in elasmobranchs.
_	As a result, Ben 23 taught himself how to use the Omnitrix while on the notion that all aliens are evil as he fought a group of aliens serving the Intellectuary: Dimension 23's version of Azmuth who deemed the boy unworthy due to his misuse.
_	Adherents of queer nationalism support the notion that the LGBT community forms a distinct people due to their unique culture and customs.
_	In a reference to the Trausk's "Influencing Machine," the book debunks the notion that “The Media” is an external force, outside of our control.
_	In a 2012 interview with "Time Out Tokyo", he described his approach as "defying the notion that you can't create something from nothing."
_	Rejecting the notion that each woman should be under the control of a man, it called for women to be in control of both their own bodies and their destinies.
_	This also confirms the notion that the battle took place months, not days, after the revolt.
_	National Alliance Party founder and former Great Council of Chiefs Chairman Ratu Epeli Ganilau said that the notion that politically motivated crimes could be justified was ""insulting to the intelligence of ordinary people,"" and that it represented a naive and uncaring attitude toward the hurt suffered by many during the 2000 coup.
_	In addition to making Oxford the queen's son by Seymour, the book also revives the notion that the "Virgin Queen" had children by the Earl of Leicester.
_	Sole custody arrangements have been generally considered a traditional form of custody for many in the past; however, there has been a trend since the 1980s towards the notion that joint custody arrangements are more favorable than sole custody arrangements.
_	Throughout, the book entertains, and provides evidences for, the notion that key administration officials were set on invading Iraq and that the proffered reasons for the invasion—such as national security threats like the presence of WMD in Iraq—were pretexts rather than actual motivations for going to war.
_	The hierarchy in the model is based on the notion that an organization operates a number of business functions, each function requires information from a number of source, and each of these sources may operate one or more operation systems, which in turn contain data organized and stored in any number of data systems.
_	The concept of Yin and Yang, often mistakenly conceived of as a symbol of dualism, is actually meant to convey the notion that all apparent opposites are complementary parts of a non-dual whole.
_	Sometimes grouped with the unity of action is the notion that no character should appear unexpectedly late in the drama.
_	Although towards the end of the century MacBride's theories were being challenged, the medical establishment in Britain remained wedded to the notion that scurvy was a disease of internal ‘putrefaction’ and the Sick and Hurt Board, run by administrators, felt obliged to follow its advice.
_	He was one of the few thinkers who disagreed with the notion that subjectivity invalidates observation, judgment and prediction.
_	Double-loop marketing is based upon the notion that in today's information-rich world, marketing must of necessity be people and knowledge-driven rather than product driven.
_	Currently, it is recommended that individuals with TMD be followed medically for signs, symptoms, or laboratory evidence of its progression to this malignant disease with the notion that its early treatment may be of clinical benefit.
_	Some of the other Creedence members have taken exception to the notion that Fogerty was the sole creative force in the band, with Doug Clifford telling Gary James of classicbands.com, "We all jammed every day when we weren't on the road and actually when we were on the road.
_	This bold action was extremely ill-received in Venice as the populous displayed its animosity for the notion that an Orseolo was somehow entitled to the Dogeship.
_	However, the notion that he died at the age of 46 conflicts with Weston's explanation in Chapter 7 that he had neglected the study of biology "until I reached the fifties".
_	The idea of fixity with regard to printed materials, for example, is largely predicated on the notion that an object has been recorded on a relatively stable medium.
_	He also dismissed the notion that the ITS represented a far right ideology, and argued that his presence would be a sign of actual moderation.
_	Dumas constructs the plot around the notion that the Man in the Iron Mask is the twin brother of Louis XIV, Philippe, who had been concealed and imprisoned from birth by his father, Louis XIII, and his mother, Anne of Austria, "for the good of France".
_	He also rejects the notion that God is a supernatural being who created and continues to look over the world.
_	He utilized many contemporary science fiction tropes, e.g. the notion that atoms were miniaturized solar systems in his stories "Submicroscopic" and "Awlo of Ulm".
_	He demonstrated a peculiar desire to, in the "Faith and Order" components of world ecumenical discussion, advance the notion that God desired for those Protestant churches separated for generations due to minor conflicts over theology and, more speciously, ethnic and socioeconomic differences to overcome the alienations of the past and join forces to bring a stronger Christian witness to a world beset by wars, poverty, and increasing indifference or hostility toward spiritual matters.
_	Associated evidence, however, such as the relatively short period of prominence for the monastery at Clonbroney (the convent, which may have been founded as early as the fifth century, fades from the records after the death of Abbess Caillechdomhnaill in 1163), the use of individual names (in particular Niall, son of Fergal, king of Cenél Éogain, and Uí Néill overlord from 763–770 and Flann son of Connla), and the association of the monastery in the mid- to late eighth century with the royal family of Tethba, in Cairpre Gabra, all support the notion that this "Life" was initially composed within a few generations of the saint’s death, and is a well-preserved late eighth to early ninth century "Life".
_	The term moron comes from the notion that the additional genes mean that these bacteriophage genomes have "more on" them.
_	Freud believed in a duality between how genders construct mature sexuality in terms of the opposite gender, whereas feminists reject the notion that female sexuality can only be defined in relation to the male.
_	Deriving from the Italian and Burgundian courts of the Renaissance, the notion that the state had a key role to play in the sponsoring of artistic production and that the arts were linked to national prestige was found in France from at least the 16th century on.
_	One of the vehicles focusing on housing the chronically homeless is Housing First which is premised on the notion that housing is a basic human right, and so should not be denied to anyone, even if they are abusing alcohol or other substances.
_	According to Nawaz, the notion that Muslims cannot cope with criticism or mockery of Islam and only react violently is "patronizing, self-pity inspiring mollycoddling" of the very Muslims it claims to serve and emancipate, because it does not expect them to be civil and control their anger.
_	The idea was eventually rejected because of the notion that the two gaming systems would be identical.
_	Mark T. Conard's "The Philosophy of Film Noir" follows this same idea, claiming that the film presents the notion that "what it takes to catch a serial killer is tantamount to being one".
_	The painting is exceedingly similar to a Jacopo Bellini work of the same name, lending credibility to the notion that Foppa may have spent time training with Bellini in Venice.
_	In this book, Goodstein rejected the notion that after peak occurs new alternative sources of energy will be able to fuel industry at the same level.
_	He also rejected the notion that crusaders could be regarded as martyrs if they died while despoiling non-Christians.
_	Other milestones were the notion that metals are elements too (Antoine Lavoisier) and the periodic table of the elements by Dmitri Ivanovich Mendeleev.
_	The "philosophy of positivism powerfully reinforced the notion that scientific progress was inherently incompatible with religious interference".
_	The two can be seen carrying buckets full of human blood, bones, and organs somewhere, giving off the notion that they committed numerous murders while working together.
_	Republicans also want to see a constitution that they claim will inspire aspiration (by allowing anyone to become head of state) and political responsibility (by introducing popular sovereignty, the notion that the people are "in charge").
_	Diversity in the genus "Ginkgo" dropped through the Cretaceous (along with that of ferns, cycads, and cycadeoids) at the same time the flowering plants were on the rise, which supports the notion that flowering plants, with their better adaptations to disturbance, displaced "Ginkgo" and its associates over time.
_	Gore's attorneys therefore understood that they could fight on, and could petition the Florida Supreme Court to repudiate the notion that December 12 was final under Florida law.
_	Many people are struck by the notion that cannabis could induce symptoms of nausea and vomiting, given the common perception that cannabis can be used to prevent nausea and vomiting.
_	Nevertheless, the notion that birth-order significantly influences personality continues to have a strong presence in pop psychology and popular culture.
_	The balance sheet channel refers to the notion that changes in interest rates affect borrowers' balance sheets and income statements.
_	It was noted that there was "more sympathy than real enthusiasm," which the composer attributed to the notion that the audience had listened to too much Sibelius.
_	Comey told the DOJ OIG that of particular concern to him and Goldsmith was the notion that Yoo's legal analysis entailed ignoring an act of Congress, and doing so without full congressional notification.
_	Consequentialists, in particular, reject the notion that two acts can differ in their moral permissibility if both have exactly the same consequences, or expected consequences.
_	Bremmer's J Curve describes the relationship between a country's openness and its stability; focusing on the notion that while many countries are stable because they are open (the United States, France, Japan), others are stable because they are closed (North Korea, Cuba, Iraq under Saddam Hussein).
_	I particularly loved the notion that as convincing as Jimmy was, the cops apparently ended the interview less than fully persuaded that a lover’s spat, and the aforementioned fetish, explained the home robbery of Daniel Wormald, the world’s most irritating naïf."
_	In any event, the fact that some folks really believe that the MKs had been around, sort of led me, in a very roundabout way, to the notion that a real Maria has existed all along..."
_	The fact that all of the nations between Greece and China were Muslim gave rise to the notion that Islam itself might reinforce that Maginot Line-style strategy.
_	Central to his thought was the notion that the law, as it had evolved in modern societies, concerned with the material results of a defendant's actions.
_	Golub's teaching centers on the notion that a Jew is a member of a "family," the Jewish People; and that Torah is best understood as the Jewish People's unique embrace of life in a response to their sense of the Divine in the universe.
_	Burns and Simon see the theme as an opportunity to explore how individuals end up like the show's criminal characters, and to dramatize the notion that hard work is not always justly rewarded.
_	Augustine took great pains in his anti-Pelagian works to refute the notion that our works could serve as the proper basis for our justification.
_	As a result, the Arab caliphs adopted the notion that, in the words of Mako, it was their duty "to protect the settled, i.e. the civilized world from the northern barbarian".
_	In that publication (1997) they advanced the notion that relationship dimensions seen operating in an interpersonal context could apply as well in the context of organization–public relationships.
_	Much strong academic, legislative and judicial opinion was opposed to the notion that businessmen could escape accountability for their role in the failing businesses.
_	Nonetheless, they both followed the notion that it was to be independent of Spain.
_	From its inception Wigglism has promoted the notion that the truth, or that which seems true, is interactively constructed with the world as a whole, not just with other humans or in the limited text space known as discourse.
_	Comedian Bill Hicks ridiculed the lawsuit as part of his act, pointing out the absurdity of the notion that a successful band would wish to kill off their purchasing fanbase.
_	The 2009 QFR also says the notion that “the government will always be there” (p. 32, 2009 QFR) during a wildfire needs to be changed to a model where property owners and local agencies “take responsibility and become active participants and an integral part” in curbing the effects of wildfire to communities. (p. 21, 2009 QFR.)
_	It tells the story of a Filipino elite woman who is hallucinating, and is preoccupied with the notion that she has two navels or belly buttons in order to be treated as an extraordinary person.
_	This statement of the "sola fide" doctrine is followed by an explicit rejection of the notion that salvation can in any way come from good works.
_	The authors highlights the notion that
_	According to Tom Wells in his book "The War Within" Brown would sometimes entertain the notion that McCarthy could win the nomination "sometimes for up to thirty minutes at a stretch."
_	Its name stems from the notion that it is a "SciKit" (SciPy Toolkit), a separately-developed and distributed third-party extension to SciPy.
_	Commenting on Johns' creation of such concepts as the Blue Lantern Corps, the Red Lantern Corps, and the Indigo Tribe, DC Comics writer and executive Paul Levitz noted in 2010 that "One of Johns' sharpest additions to DC mythology is the notion that the Green Lanterns are but one color within a rainbow spectrum, and that the other hues have their own champions.
_	However Leo Damrosch argued that the notion that the Golden Rule pertains to "rights" per se is a contemporary interpretation and has nothing to do with its origin.
_	Social science research indicates that the exclusion of homosexuals from marriage stigmatizes and invites public discrimination against them, with research also rejecting the notion that either civilization or viable social orders depend upon restricting marriage to heterosexuals.
_	Preliminary evidence supporting the notion that prions can be transmitted through use of urine-derived human menopausal gonadotropin, administered for the treatment of infertility, was published in 2011.
_	The controversy also hit Biden in his most vulnerable area, accentuating the notion that he lacked mental and verbal discipline.
_	and it was Tahirih who pushed the notion that there should be an armed rebellion to save the Bab and create the break.
_	The role of Thorondor was expanded in stages, with the successive introduction of the relevant plot elements; and after the conception of Númenor entered in 1930s, the notion that the eagles were the messengers of Manwë was further elaborated.
_	It has been speculated that this is due to the notion that Sweden may have stricter internet privacy laws than the rest of the world.
_	The band began recording their debut with the notion that each writer would sing their own songs, with the exceptions being Carr's song "Brakeman", sung by Norton, and Wells/De Soto's "Lonely", in which all three took a verse.
_	As Cable infiltrated the New Mutants under the notion that Cannonball was to be the immortal messiah, the External's leader Gideon sought to corrupt Sunspot, who was the messiah promised in the prophecy.
_	In addition, Wyeth emphasized negative messages against the SERM raloxifene for osteoporosis, instructed writers to stress the fact that "alternative therapies have increased in usage since the WHI even though there is little evidence that they are effective or safe...", called into question the quality and therapeutic equivalence of approved generic CEE products, and made efforts to spread the notion that the unique risks of CEEs and MPA were a class effect of all forms of menopausal HRT: "Overall, these data indicate that the benefit/risk analysis that was reported in the Women's Health Initiative can be generalized to all postmenopausal hormone replacement therapy products."
_	Though different interpretations and definitions abound, the chief distinguishing feature of "taishū engeki" is the notion that it is intended as entertainment for regular people.
_	The disseminators of the concept define it as the notion that we have certain rights and responsibilities towards each other by the mere fact of being human on Earth.
_	Early workers proposed the notion that the surface was a glacial deposit between the early Wisconsin and Illinoian stages.
_	In 1908 Tolstoy wrote, and Gandhi read, "A Letter to a Hindu", which outlines the notion that only by using love as a weapon through passive resistance could the native Indian people overthrow the colonial British Empire.
_	This study further supported the notion that it is status, not inherent strengths/weakness of gender differences, which foster gender inequality.
_	Gene Triplett of The Oklahoman states "One begins to get the notion that someone knows the pain of betrayal and heartbreak from the angry power-balladry of “Satisfied”".<br>
_	She has the notion that, if it will help her out, she will go to extremes.
_	The primary arithmetical system used by Islamic mathematicians was based on Hindu arithmetic, which rejected the notion that the relations between numbers and geometrical forms were symbolic.
_	Anti-oppressive education is premised on the notion that many traditional and commonsense ways of engaging in "education" actually contribute to oppression in schools and society.
_	Furthermore, anti-oppressive education is premised on the notion that many commonsense ways of "reforming education" actually mask the oppressions that need to be challenged.
_	In their "Unhappy Cities" paper, Edward Glaeser, Joshua Gottlieb and Oren Ziv examined the self-reported subjective well-being of people living in American metropolitan areas, particularly in relation to the notion that "individuals make trade-offs among competing objectives, including but not limited to happiness."
_	The lack of evidence of kings or "principal" chiefs and also challenges the notion that cultural creations such as monuments require centralized authority.
_	Pedagogically, Margolis rejected the notion that actor training could be broken down into separate contexts ("i.e.": stage "voice" and "movement" classes) and instead suggested that all aspects of actor training are inextricably linked.
_	The Muslim Arab world circling Israel had been arbitrarily sliced up into 19 ethnically heterogeneous states by imperial powers, France and Great Britain, and was just a 'temporary house of cards put together by foreigners' - the notion that pan-Arabism was a house of cards doomed to collapse had been already argued by Fouad Ajami some years earlier - composed of mutually hostile ethnic minorities and majorities, that, once disintegrated into, in Ahmad's interpretation, feudal tribal fiefdoms, would no longer challenge Israel.
_	An unusual modern scholar who supported the notion that the Synoptic Gospels were of an early date, specifically before 70, was John Robinson.
_	Some scholars challenge the notion that a "mobile reserve" in the modern military sense existed in the Roman Empire, and instead argue that the shifts in organization represent a series of field armies deployed in various areas as needed, particularly in the East.
_	The "Fabrica" rectified some of Galen's worst errors, including the notion that the great blood vessels originated from the liver.
_	They credit entertainment figures such as Ghetto Ruff founder Lance Stehr or Selimathunzi producer Baby Joe for instilling in them the notion that their "industry is not about the glitz and the glamour" but rather culture and specially South African music.
_	On the other hand, it is impossible to know the subjective feelings of animals, and the notion that non-human animals experience emotions similar to humans is a contentious subject.
_	Nerdist's Kyle Anderson and "Strange Horizons"s Orrin Grey analyzed "The Thing" as an example of author H. P. Lovecraft's cosmic horror, the notion that ancient, inhuman beings exist that do not care about humanity in any way.
_	Responding to a reporter, he claimed he was unaware that Kobach had testified in his state, firmly rebutting the notion that he had any role in advancing the bill.
_	Together, they dictate that society should be structured so that the greatest possible amount of liberty is given to its members, limited only by the notion that the liberty of any one member shall not infringe upon that of any other member.
_	Having been under the notion that the election of a black mayor, Carl B. Stokes, would be their insurance against such violent uprisings, and fearing an all-out race war, previously successful white business owners left the inner city in droves and never looked back.
_	But when the Kyodain develop independent AI from a surge of Cosmic Energy with the notion that they have been chosen as the dominant life forms, Professor Blink had XVⅡ seal the Kyodain in human form after being mortally wounded by them.
_	By then, scholars were increasingly rejecting the notion that Adams and others used "propaganda" to incite "ignorant mobs", and were instead portraying a revolutionary Massachusetts too complex to have been controlled by one man.
_	The case is often cited as authority for the notion that the public has only very limited rights in intertidal zone (the area between high and low tide).
_	Durkin called for a criminal perjury investigation of Senator Burris, and "scoffed at the notion that Mr. Burris had not been granted time to mention such relevant conversations or that lawmakers had moved on."
_	More to the point, however, is the putting forward of the notion that just as descriptive statements being considered true are conditioned upon certain self-evident descriptive truths suiting the nature of reality (such as: it is impossible for the same thing to be and not be at the same time and in the same manner), a prescriptive truth can suit the nature of the will through the authority of it being based upon self-evident prescriptive truths (such as: one ought to desire what is really good for one and nothing else).
_	As Eva Kenny explains in her review " Something that comes across strongly from these texts is the notion that capitalism, whiles very enthusiastic and hardworking, is perhaps not particularly imaginative.
_	Smetters has also written about the need for insurance industry reform and supports the notion that the private sector should provide terrorism insurance or protection instead of government.
_	The campaign was aimed at publicizing the notion that many projective diagnostic tests have poor or no validity.
_	Mainly older people use the word ' with the notion that it is a neutral word paralleling "negro".
_	Dr. Frank J. Hayden has a wide variety of co-curricular programs, not called extracurriculars as that supports the notion that participating in clubs and teams is extra work, which is an idea that Hayden would like to discourage.
_	Another now-uncommon premium-rate scam involves television programming that induces young children to dial the number, banking on the notion that they will be unaware of the charges that will be incurred.
_	In a review from "Rickey.org", Nick Roman said, ""Once Upon a Time" frequently asks viewers to sympathize with villains, predicated on the notion that every villain has some good in there somewhere.
_	In describing the American identity, Huntington first contests the notion that the country is, as often repeated, "a nation of immigrants".
_	It was the Strategic Air Command's (SAC) October 1952 edition of the SAC Manual 205-2 that rejected the notion that the USAF's ground defense mission conflicted with Army functions.
_	In the field of legal academia, Peter Swire has written about the trade-off between the notion that "security through obscurity is an illusion" and the military notion that "loose lips sink ships" as well as how competition affects the incentives to disclose.
_	It is based on the notion that there is a tendency for reversal when the price range widens, and therefore compares previous trading ranges (highs minus lows).
_	He became First Naval Lord in the Second Palmerston ministry in June 1861 and subsequently published a pamphlet "Admiralty Administration, 1861–1866" describing his reforms which included, inter alia, the notion that all senior naval promotions and appointments should be non-political and should be discussed and agreed by the Naval Members of the Admiralty Board on a collective basis before recommendations were made to the First Lord of the Admiralty.
_	The Constitution does not explicitly state that the courts may exercise judicial review; however, the notion that courts could declare laws unconstitutional was envisioned by the founding fathers.
_	In a backlash to the new emerging realities of the American demographic, many prohibitionists subscribed to the doctrine of “nativism” in which they endorsed the notion that America was made great as a result of its white Anglo-Saxon ancestry.
_	Analytic philosophers were shaped strongly by logical positivism, united by the notion that philosophical problems could and should be solved by attention to logic and language.
_	"Rerum novarum" also recognized that the poor have a special status in consideration of social issues: the modern Catholic principle of the "preferential option for the poor" and the notion that God is on the side of the poor were expressed in this document.
_	Inventing the Flat Earth (1991; ) is a book by historian Jeffrey Burton Russell debunking the notion that medieval Christians believed the earth was flat.
_	It was an environment – he added – "...in which crackpots flourished, and this made matters worse for those who were at least willing to entertain the notion that there might have been some serious science going on."
_	The rabbis determined that the matter should be left until Elijah (in reference to the notion that Elijah's arrival would precipitate the coming of the Messiah, at which time all halakhic questions will be resolved) and the fifth cup came to be known as the "Kos shel Eliyahu" ("Cup of Elijah").
_	Over time, people came to relate this cup to the notion that Elijah will visit each home on Seder night as a foreshadowing of his future arrival at the end of the days, when he will come to announce the coming of the Jewish Messiah.
_	One rabbi said that it is preferable for a married Jewish woman to expose her hair than to don a wig, for the wig actually increases attraction in the public domain and encourages the notion that Halakha is both irrational and intellectually dishonest.
_	Selective recruitment is the notion that, when making peer comparisons, an individual selects their own strengths and the other's weaknesses in order that they appear better on the whole.
_	However, Gibson later disputed the notion that the creators of lonelygirl15 drew influence from him.
_	The inverse relationship between income and fertility has been termed a "demographic-economic "paradox"" by the notion that greater means would enable the production of more offspring as suggested by the influential Thomas Malthus.
_	Box office results, however, tended to be modest, thus reinforcing the notion that audiences were not likely to pay for at the theater what they could see at home for free.
_	The windows rise from floor level and open onto the garden which enhances the notion that Prestwold was designed in the style of an Italian classical villa.
_	Oxygen isotopic analysis of magmas from other APVC centres support the notion that the area of the APVC has been subject to arid climate for the duration of its active phase.
_	An alert and questioning reader might pause over the notion that the young man can steal himself: and this betrays a perhaps worrying sense of emotional entitlement in the poet.
_	A key idea in "The Limits to Growth" is the notion that if the rate of resource use is increasing, the amount of reserves cannot be calculated by simply taking the current known reserves and dividing by the current yearly usage, as is typically done to obtain a static index.
_	Such gurukuls were considered by the British to be seditious schools because they fostered pride in Hindu culture and Indian achievements, encouraging the notion that Aryan Indians would overthrow what they regarded as their temporary subjugation to the British.
_	The term was originally coined by Mikhail Bakunin in 1872 as a criticism of the notion that organized workers are the most radical.
_	He was uncomfortable with the notion that he was a hero, and deliberately missed the homecoming parade near his base.
_	All that is remembered, however, is the "I am the greatest of all time" quote, which has been taken by many to support the notion that Henderson is selfish and arrogant.
_	LBC took up the slot previously occupied by Jazz FM (and briefly Birdsong), and dropped the "97.3" from the station name to reinforce the notion that it now had national coverage.
_	His point was that the Founding Fathers were anti-slavery and the notion that slavery was good was a radical innovation that violated American ideals.
_	Bad writers—especially scientific, political, and sociological writers—are nearly always haunted by the notion that Latin or Greek words are grander than Saxon ones.
_	In "Beloved," Morrison attempts to come to grip with the legacies left by slavery, challenging the notion that these legacies exits only from the past.
_	It rejects the notion that Jesus or any other object or living being could be 'God', that God could have a literal 'son' in physical form or is divisible in any way, or that God could be made to be joined to the material world in such fashion.
_	However, others disagree, arguing that a more radical transformation of agriculture is needed, one guided by the notion that ecological change in agriculture cannot be promoted without comparable changes in the social, political, cultural and economic arenas that conform and determine agriculture.
_	In this they were successful; the last communiqué helped lay the foundation for the legend of the "clean Wehrmacht", the notion that Wehrmacht had fought honourably and professionally, and was not in any way implicated in the crimes of the Nazi regime, for which (according to the myth) the SS bore sole responsibility.
_	He mentioned that “The songs embody the idea of an adult who continues to dream on; as children, we would dream about growing up and what things will be like when we are adults,” “I think even as adults, we have dreams that are always changing so I wanted to express the notion that we are always dreaming children at heart.” during the interview with Koreaherald.
_	The Babylonian Talmud presents that the eternity of the priesthood belonging to Aaron is exemplified by the notion that Ahron himself will be present to accept "terumah" following the coming of the Messiah.
_	He was one of the first contemporary Indigenous scholars to articulate the notion that Indigenous people could still hold onto traditions while fully engaging in modernity.
_	A mouse study found that knockout of the MOR or DOR or selective pharmacological ablation of the NOP did not affect the antidepressant-like effects of buprenorphine, whereas knockout of the KOR abolished the antidepressant-like effects of the drug, supporting the notion that the antidepressant-like effects of buprenorphine are indeed mediated by modulation of the KOR by the drug (and not of the MOR, DOR, or NOP).
_	This contrasts with the notion that only men are competitive and aggressive.
_	Cho has been lauded as a poet who tore down the notion that modern poetry must be obscure and won the sympathy of many readers by his candid expression in everyday language of the sentiments and experiences of his own life.
_	Structural Honesty is linked to the notion that a structure shall display its “true” purpose and not be decorative etc.
_	For example, the article "Kurt Cobain" was edited by a Scientologist in order to include a link to the Scientology-founded "Citizens Commission on Human Rights" (CCHR), putting forth the notion that "the singer's childhood Ritalin prescription led him to suicide".
_	Instead, a more objective test is used, to avoid providing "any encouragement to the notion that all that is required is for the user to have a sincere belief, however misguided, that he or she is criticising a work or reporting current affairs".
_	Signals had disabused him of the notion that he was attacking the Third Fleet, and the longer Kurita continued to engage, the greater the risk of major air strikes.
_	The qualities that create the distinctive character of liturgical music are based on the notion that liturgical music is conceived and composed according to the norms and needs of the various historic liturgies of particular denominations.
_	Lacan rejects the notion that partial drives can attain any complete organization since the primacy of the genital zone is always precarious.
_	Liam Kelley disproved the notion that the Phong Châu 峯州 was the capital of the Hùng kings.
_	Trilling confronts the notion that an artist’s imagination and genius comes from a neurotic illness.
_	They proposed the notion that individuals assign value to gains and losses rather than to final assets.
_	Somali nationalism (Somali:"Soomaalinimo") is centered on the notion that the Somali people share a common language, religion, culture and ethnicity, and as such constitute a nation unto themselves.
_	Mace's work on "Incentives: Some Experimental Studies" (1935) discredited the notion that workers are primarily incentivized by money.
_	Roland S. Martin of CNN said that the notion that black people are just now starting to value education is "ridiculous" and that the notion that black people let Sharpton or Jackson think for them is "nuts".
_	The risk function formalizes the notion that an agent's willingness to risk conflict is the ratio of the utility that agent would lose by accepting the other agent's proposal to the utility that agent would lose by causing a conflict.
_	For the cover of the single, Sire Records portrayed a hip-hop collage of downtown New York, rather than a portrait shot of Madonna, further perpetuating the notion that Madonna was African-American.
_	Pontoppidan made several claims regarding kraken, including the notion that the creature was sometimes mistaken for an island and that the real danger to sailors was not the creature itself but rather the whirlpool left in its wake.
_	The court denied the request, rejecting the notion that the other actions had any bearing on the inducement case, except to the extent that already-recovered damage amounts might be taken into account when calculating the inducement damages, and further holding that "Bouchat" doesn't apply; 17 USC 504 doesn't preclude finding inducement of infringement separately from finding direct infringement of the same works.
_	Amplituhedron theory challenges the notion that space-time locality and unitarity are necessary components of a model of particle interactions.
_	Moreover, he proposes that Williams was influenced by William Hutton's 1788 "The Battle of Bosworth-Field", which Foss blames for introducing the notion that the battle was fought west of Ambion Hill on the north side of the River Sence.
_	The magazine stated that the game "reinforces the notion that all computer freaks are emotionally underdeveloped high school and college boys", but nonetheless concluded that it "is hopelessly addicting ... it's just a shame that [the author] didn't take the time to make his program a bit classier".
_	She also argued that arguments against human rights commissions dealing with complaints against media are premised on the notion that "new rights are bad rights."
_	Victim blaming in this context reinforces the notion that black female victims are not only less innocent, but also less worthy of rescue relative to white women.
_	In Geertz's original usage, the concept of the theatre state contests the notion that precolonial society can be analysed in the conventional discourse of Oriental despotism.
_	The book is an important milestone in Italian historiography because it introduced in the academic debate the notion that the struggle that took place in 1943-45 between Italian fascists and the partisan movement was indeed a civil war.
_	Historically, the merger doctrine (a.k.a. "doctrine of merger") was the notion that marriage caused a woman's legal identity to merge with that of her husband.
_	Crainic's main innovation was in linking ethnic nationalism and ethnocracy with the notion that the Romanian Orthodox Church was the guarantee of Romanian identity, therefore discarding the implicit secularism of "Sămănătorist" thought.
_	They feel that "many of the stereotypes and misinformation that contribute to the articulation of Islamophobia are rooted in a particular perception of Islam", such as the notion that Islam promotes terrorism  – especially prevalent after the September 11, 2001 attacks.
_	It seeks to play on the notion that any normal person can be thrust into the limelight via reality and talent shows such as Big Brother or The X Factor.
_	His studies led to his theory of insular dwarfism, the notion that "limited resources" on small islands can lead to a down-sizing of the indigenous vertebrate animals.
_	Medieval Hungary's concept of nobility originated in the notion that nobles were "free men", eligible to own land.
_	The research in this area further investigates the notion that children create imaginary companions due to the absence of peer relationships.
_	As Michèle Mendelssohn argues, "it is the story of a love affair, as well as the story of an ideological romance that challenges one of the United States’ most cherished ideas about itself, the notion that it is a land of progress and possibility for all.
_	However, the notion that a dying swan sings a melodious "swan song" was proverbial, and its application to a character need not prove the character is being presented as a poet.
_	A second memorial found in Stara Zagora, also by Traianus Mucianus, dedicated to Heraclianus's brother, Marcus Aurelius Apollinarius, who was an equestrian governor of Thrace, reinforces the notion that Heraclianus had strong family connections in that region and was most likely a citizen of "Augusta Traiana".
_	He defends an interesting and sophisticated system of vague semantics, based on the notion that a vague predicate might be "made precise" in many alternative ways.
_	Thomas and his father grew to become bitter rivals after Thomas' paternity was cast into doubt and his father openly toyed with the notion that Thomas was not his true son.
_	He openly dismisses the notion that the world's poorest people constitute a significant market for high-tech products anytime soon.
_	He was and is committed to the notion that strict accountability by ANC officials must be followed.
_	Of the fans aware of the IMAX premiere, many "expressed the notion that IMAX is too expensive and they will wait for the television premiere", while the service noted fan skepticism surrounding the characters and production value, and negative comparisons of the visual effects to those in the MCU films.
_	Cocteau himself was aware of this perception, and worked earnestly to dispel the notion that their relationship was sexual in nature.
_	The doctrine is not a written document but rather inspired by the former Danish Foreign Minister Uffe Ellemann-Jensen's term of office in which he promoted the notion that a small country can gain influence by supporting those greater countries that share the same values and ideas, which the small country itself embraces.
_	Domain specificity is the notion that some areas of the brain are responsible almost exclusively for the processing of particular categories.
_	This is such a powerful idea that as the sun rises in the sky and the air heats up and as, gradually, the puddle gets smaller and smaller, it's still frantically hanging on to the notion that everything's going to be all right, because this World was meant to have him in it, was built to have him in it; so the moment he disappears catches him rather by surprise.
_	"Sho-kō" involves the normal care owed by children to their parents; "dai-kō" involves the notion that our human parents are themselves the children of the divine parents — thus, if one's parents are wrong, then one should encourage them to return to virtue.
_	The film was praised by critics, but the notion that the film was purely a historical fiction was lost on some.
_	The declaration of Ravenna in 2007 re-stated the notion that the bishop of Rome is indeed the "protos", although future discussions are to be held on the concrete ecclesiological exercise of papal primacy.
_	He advanced the notion that fighters could not prevent a bombing attack.
_	Voltaire's "Candide" attacks the notion that all is for the best in this, "the best of all possible worlds", a world closely supervised by a benevolent deity.
_	Some particularly important results were the demonstration that some tasks are accomplished via discrete processing stages, the study of attention, and the notion that behavioural data do not provide enough information by themselves to explain mental processes.
_	Self-system therapy (SST) is based on the notion that depression arises from chronic failure to attain personal goals due to one’s inability to self-motivate and pursue their goals.
_	They agreed with the notion that the National Park Service's regulation fit the CCNV's demonstration.
_	By the 1920s, the notion that the Hyades shared a common origin with the Praesepe Cluster was widespread, with Rudolf Klein-Wassink noting in 1927 that the two clusters are "probably cosmically related."
_	The report concluded that "...there exists no reliable, empirical evidence to support the notion that there is a higher prevalence of antisemitic attitudes within the Labour Party than any other political party."
_	Prior to the broadcast, members of the real-life von Trapp family were critical of casting Underwood to play Maria, agreeing with the notion that she would be a good singer but a poor actor.
_	There is nothing to support the notion that the snake would secrete its venom into the bowl.
_	Deleuze takes as axiomatic the notion that there is no time but the present, which contains past and future.
_	Many Jewish thinkers have rejected the notion that God can be anthropomorphized.
_	Happiness was a very important word in his work each of his canvases conveys the notion that every moment of life is a marvel.
_	This functional, yet truncated, form of dystrophin gave rise to the notion that shorter dystrophin can still be therapeutically beneficial.
_	The Nootka Conventions undermined the notion that a country could claim exclusive sovereignty without establishing settlements.
_	Consistent with the notion that religious experience is a collective good, Iannaccone et al.
_	Aristotle criticised the notion that celestial bodies make a sound in moving in the context of his own cosmological model.
_	Specifically, the Gender Equality Bureau singles out the notion that women are supposed to be homemakers and men the breadwinners, calling on all citizens of Japan to "rethink our prejudiced notions of gender-based roles, so that we may realize a society where men and women can participate together in politics, at the workplace and at home, and lead exciting and fulfilling lives".
_	The rabbis determined that the matter should be left until Elijah (in reference to the notion that Elijah's arrival would precipitate the coming of the Messiah, at which time all halakhic questions will be resolved) and the fifth cup came to be known as the "Kos shel Eliyahu" ("Cup of Elijah").
_	Over time, people came to relate this cup to the notion that Elijah will visit each home on Seder night as a foreshadowing of his future arrival at the end of the days, when he will come to announce the coming of the Jewish Messiah.
_	When General Schwarz threatens the other ToQgers and Right is out of commission, Zaram is talked into becoming ToQ 6gou on the notion that he can finally be able to die to atone for his past sins.
_	According to Schlosser, many Christians reject the notion that they have any privilege by claiming that all religions are essentially the same.
_	Part of the function of menu prose is to impress customers with the notion that the dishes served at the restaurant require such skill, equipment, and exotic ingredients that the diners could not prepare similar foods at home.
_	Though both explanations have been rejected in the academic literature, the notion that the name "Assam" has a Sanskrit origin continues to hold sway in popular perceptions, due mainly to two standard dictionaries of Assamese: "Hemkox" and "Chandrakanta Abhidhan".
_	In several of his philosophical writings, he defends the notion that qualia are not physical.
_	She offers the notion that what is needed is a theory of sexuality separate from feminism.
_	However, Rodgers found fault with the bare-bones natures of the collection, writing that its presentation "does little to dispel the notion that it's a cheap cash-in for ["I Want to Believe"]".
_	In 2013, the image of women and relationships in Berg's lyrics was described by as "antifeminist", as they engage in the notion that a woman cannot be happy without a man and that she should forgive him for everything negative.
_	It also further solidifies the notion that unknown substance leakages are to be classified as environmental hazards until they can be accurately identified and controlled.
_	Though some argue this is likely on the grounds that her beliefs countered the imperialistic intentions of the British Empire and the notion that Africans were inferior peoples, this is not entirely true, as she did support British traders and British indirect rule in Africa, and thus cannot entirely explain her sometimes unfavorable reception.
_	NASA's investigation team found melted aluminum on the thermal tiles and inside edges of the left wing of the spacecraft, supporting the notion that the Columbia's destruction was due to hot gases that penetrated the damaged spot on the wing.
_	Taking a lead from Pythagoras's Golden Rule of doing to others as would be done to oneself, a shift was made away from asserting human dominance over nature and in turn led to the notion that humans have no rights to nature as it is common to all creatures.
_	In any event, it is clear that much research supports the notion that when an individual is moved to a role that requires new and unfamiliar skills their performance will decline (at best) and be seen as incompetent.
_	This was an unexpected finding, but is in agreement with the notion that GAT2 permits efflux of GABA and taurine from the brain to circulating blood through the blood brain barrier.
_	Both Wollstonecraft and Burke associate him with Enlightenment thinking, particularly the notion that civilization could progress through rational debate, but they interpret that stance differently.
_	A few days later, after two top officials of the NRA challenged the notion that drinking clubgoers should be armed, Trump reversed his position, saying that he "obviously" meant that additional guards or employees should have been armed in the nightclub.
_	While agreeing that job opportunities are greater in America, 89 percent disagreed with the notion that they would rather be in the United States, and they were more likely to feel closer to English Canadians than to Americans.
_	Il-sung rejected the notion that he had created a cult around himself, and accused those who suggested this of "factionalism".
_	His essential premise put forth the notion that the "fictionalization" aspect of privacy law did not harm freedom of expression.
_	Later on, as the Parade grew, people who took part came with the notion that the Parade should focus on LGBT rights, equality and equal representation, and should not be used as a stage for radical politics, which are not accepted by most of the Parade's participants.
_	In it, he refuted the notion that Congress did not have the power to regulate slavery in the territories, and argued the Founding Fathers had favored the eventual abolition of the slavery.
_	Parker downplayed the notion that the album was entirely aimed at former lovers, however, and likened it to an inner monologue:
_	Titchener put great stock in the systematic work of Gustav Fechner, whose psychophysics advanced the notion that it was indeed possible to measure mental phenomena (Titchener 1902, p. cviii- cix).
_	Although he does not challenge the BSA rights regarding "a prospective leader presents himself as a role model inconsistent with Boy Scouting's understanding of the Scout Oath and Law", he rejects the notion that being openly gay makes a man a bad role model for Boy Scouts.
_	These findings reinforce the notion that it is the mechanical activity rather than the electrical activity imposed on the muscle that is essential to maintaining physiological homeostasis.
_	The digital divide is the notion that people with less access have less opportunities to develop skills(p. 33).
_	However, even the Mahanubhavas, who rose in the 13th century as a Krishna-worshipping sect, not only dismissed the notion that Vithoba is Krishna but also frequently vilified Vithoba.
_	A few days later, the Reverend W. Gordon Baillie disputed the notion that Carter did not know he had been the model for the Mad Hatter:
_	The discovery of "Eotyrannus" corroborates the notion that early tyrannosauroids were gracile with long forelimbs and three-fingered grasping hands, although the somewhat large size of the animal either means that early evolution for this clade was carried out at a large size or "Eotyrannus" developed large size independently.
_	It rejects the notion that the Holy Spirit proceeds jointly and equally from two principles (Father and Son) and teaches dogmatically that "the Holy Spirit proceeds eternally from the Father and the Son, not as from two principles but as from one single principle".
_	Gati rejected the notion that Obrecht could be "rational" and said "She basically is evil" However, the actress insisted that Obrecht is a "person" who has "emotions" and shows "sensitivity" and a "soft side."
_	However, one needs to be made to understand the fallacy of the notion that communication is an all-embracing area.
_	Non-directive play therapy, also called client-centred and unstructured play therapy, is guided by the notion that if given the chance to speak and play freely under optimal therapeutic conditions, troubled children and young people will be able to resolve their own problems and work toward their own solutions.
_	She reportedly declined to speak about herself, or past events, and that "nothing at all emerged from the meeting to support the notion that she was either the Grand Duchess Olga, or even a Romanov".
_	It noted the prevalent themes of "follow your dreams and never give up", the "plucky, brave and determined" role model nature of the princess protagonists, and the notion that "as a Disney property, this film inevitably works as brand reinforcement for the Disney Princess line of products."
_	Frankfurter's extensive dissent began by raising and then rejecting the notion that as a Jew, he ought "to particularly protect minorities."
_	Clarke concluded that "Evidently the notion that a boy's education and a girl's education should be the same, and that the same means the boy's, has not yet penetrated the German mind.
_	One common misconception among historians of the Bronze Age such as Stone and Eisler is the notion that the Semites were matriarchal while the Indo-Europeans practiced a patriarchal system.
_	However, Yosef Garfinkel has written in a preliminary report published by the Israeli Antiquities Authority that finds at the Khirbet Qeiyafa site support the notion that an urban society already existed in Judah in the late 11th century BCE.
_	Instead, the goal is to force viewers into a critical, analytical frame of mind that serves to disabuse him or her of the notion that what he is watching is necessarily an inviolable, self-contained narrative.
_	This supported the notion that oral rehydration might be possible even during severe diarrhea due to cholera.
_	The Team Small Group innovation was premised on the notion that adolescence is a complex social/emotional developmental stage which needs to be recognised and addressed by educators.
_	However, opposition arose to the notion that it would replace the streetcar system.
_	She dismisses the notion that women are too weak to withstand such consequences.
_	Geobiochemistry is founded on the notion that life is a planetary response because metabolic catalysis enables the release of energy trapped by a cooling planet.
_	He was also apparently the one who came up with the notion that Dampa Sangye, the Indian founder of the Pacification () school in Tibet who supposedly also visited China, and Bodhidharma were the same person.
_	Dispersed knowledge in economics is the notion that no single agent has information as to all of the factors which influence prices and production throughout the system.
_	Birbal's economic and social status improved when he married the daughter of a respected and rich family, contrary to the notion that he was on poor economic terms before his appointment at Mughal Emperor Akbar's imperial court.
_	There is some research the supports the notion that these non-linguistic acts are universal, eliciting the same assumptions even from speakers of different languages.
_	Tzu Chi is most well known for its work in disaster relief, Cheng Yen's philosophy includes the notion that not only are those receiving assistance benefiting materially by receiving the aid, but those delivering the aid are also spiritually rewarded when they see the gratitude in the eyes and smiles of the recipients.
_	These two findings gave rise to the notion that viral replication and malignant transformation are separate processes in RSV.
_	The film discusses the notion that any group in power is capable of committing a war atrocity.
_	While Meehan was Librarian he supported and perpetuated the notion that "the congressional library should play a limited role on the national scene and that its collections, by and large, should emphasize American materials of obvious use to the U.S. Congress."
_	The order was based on the notion that in order to crush the Greek partisan movement, whole local communities had to be wiped out, including measures such as "aerial bombardment and heavy artillery fire", "pillaging of their food supplies", and "the deportation to concentration camps of the village chiefs and all of the men who made up the community council".
_	Historical theories put based on the notion that fearful consequences would discourage potential offenders.
_	Sheena wrote the song in order to explore the notion that industry leaders were typically male, noting that fashion industry leaders tended to be male while consumers female.
_	Teenagers don’t read for a variety of reasons including (but not limited to): the notion that reading is not cool, unnecessary, and uninteresting.
_	It is based on the notion that "human memory is extremely sensitive to the symbolic modality of presentation of event information".
_	Judging from the Fordson's market share in the late teens and early 20s, the anecdotal horror stories, while extreme, must have been relative outliers (that is, the notion that "all Fordsons flip over backwards and burst at the seams" was an exaggeration).
_	The name Three Fields is based on the notion that all the founding employees had skills within all three fields of their business, design, art and engineering.
_	Specific similarities include the notion that the Earth's resources have been used up, the extraction of resources in an exploitative manner from another planet, a native population on that planet which lives in close harmony with their world, and a rebellion by those natives against the exploitative human colonizers.
_	The word "dike" (justice) was probably originally derived from the boundaries of a man's land and transmits metaphorically the notion that somebody must remain into his own sphere, respecting the one of his neighbour.
_	He notes these events could have imparted valuable pointers to the Bush Administration such as the notion that terrorism tactics used by insurgency operations including guerrilla warfare were difficult to defeat effectively, even in the face of overwhelming U.S. military forces.
_	In favor of affective homogeneity stand the notion that familiarity and similarity bring feelings of liking, comfort and positive emotions, and thus presumably better group outcomes and performances.
_	Mutual constitution is the notion that the society and the individual have an influencing effect on one another.
_	Solomon was particularly interested in the idea of "love", arguing against the notion that romantic love is an inherent state of being, and maintaining that it is instead a construct of Western culture, popularized and propagated in such a way that it has achieved the status of a universal in the eyes of many.
_	Jensen and Rushton present ten categories of evidence in support of the notion that IQ differences between whites and blacks are partly genetic in origin.
_	However, this campaign did no go as expected, the Legal Adviser of the Department of State did not support the notion that the Commonwealth could be an "inalterable pact" that could only be modified by mutual consent, recognizing the fact that Congress -as the holder of Puerto Rico's sovereignty- was capable of doing so unilaterally.
_	On the third count, she rejected the notion that public trust doctrine was applicable to copyright law.
_	O'Rourke rejects the labels, but also rejects the notion that the Irish tax code shouldn't legally, and transparently, exploit loopholes in the US tax code:
_	An example to that effect can be seen in that during the deliberations on the law of treaties at the ILC, he opposed the notion that an international agreement reached by exchange of notes did not require ratification by the state legislature of the contracting states.
_	In general, these examples support the notion that risk arbitrage generates steady returns over the long term.
_	One of the issues within the poem and in Coleridge's lectures in 1794 and 1795 was to criticize the notion that peace could be won during the French Revolution through aggressive action by England.
_	To confirm the notion that language acquisition occurs as a progression of comprehension before production, Castro and Snowdon (2000) showed that infants respond behaviorally to vocalizing adults in a fashion that indicates they can comprehend auditory inputs.
_	This decision came after the notion that he only played four games this season (22 the previous one) and didn't perform well at all during that time.
_	"The Royal Proclamation," writes historian Colin Calloway, "reflected the notion that segregation not interaction should characterize Indian-white relations."
_	Former Secretary of State George Shultz stated "... the notion that U.S. policy on Israel and Middle East is the result of [the Israel lobby's] influence is simply wrong."
_	It is claimed by some that anti-Arabism in Iran may be related to the notion that Arabs forced some Persians to convert to Islam in 7th century AD ("See: Muslim conquest of Persia").
_	Research does not support the notion that gay speech entirely adopts feminine speech characteristics, but, rather, that it selectively adopts some of those features.
_	St. Clair's defense was centered around the notion that while Nixon had made a number of statements that looked bad, he had committed no crimes.
_	Strom went to the referees union to appeal the fine based on the notion that he was trying to defend himself.
_	The union also exhibited some degree of closed-mindedness with the notion that MLB is the enemy.
_	Webb described it as an anti-war song, and challenged Campbell's version of his song and the notion that it was in any way a "patriotic song".
_	She also conceived the notion that she was to become the bride of the Messiah, who was soon to appear.
_	In late 2011 he also expressed skepticism about the $447 billion jobs bill proposed by President Obama, and disputed the notion that the bill would be paid for without adding to the national debt.
_	In doing so, he challenged the notion that the number of grains of sand was too large to be counted, devising his own counting scheme based on the myriad, which denoted 10,000.
_	One author asserts that "few would argue with the notion that the institutions of the mass media are important to contemporary politics ... in the transition to liberal democratic politics in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe the media was a key battleground."
_	Many support the notion that Agrippa - The Transmission is the first viral online netcast in history.
_	It was a year which gave birth to key features of the modern age: the thought crime; the belief that calculated acts of violence can perfect humanity; the notion that the interests of "mankind" can be placed above those of "man"; the use of policemen to enforce morals; and the use of denunciation as a political tool.
_	Its founder, Marshall Fritz believed that any school voucher or scholarship programs should be privately funded, and rejected the notion that it was acceptable for tax-payers to fund school vouchers.
_	The French word "casser" (to break) was also invoked, based on the notion that the movements could be freely broken up into any order.
_	In turn the notion that there is no knowledge outside science is a 'convenient fairy-tale' held only by dogmatists who distort history for the convenience of scientific institutions.
_	Pre-Modern inventions such as crop rotation, hybrid plants, chemical inventions and architectural achievements not yet understood like that of the pyramids are all examples which threaten the notion that science is the only means of attaining knowledge.
_	Co-convenor of the Scottish Greens and Advisory Board Member of Yes Scotland, Patrick Harvie has challenged the notion that supporters of independence are all nationalists, stating "National identity is not at the heart of my politics.
_	Based upon Travis Hirschi's "Causes of Delinquency" (1969), social bonding theory pioneered the notion that criminologists can gain useful insight into the motives behind criminal behavior by examining what normally motivates individuals to refrain from crime.
_	The "fluid, seemingly unbroken hand" in which it is written has encouraged the notion that it was produced in a single sitting, followed by a break before the second part was begun.
_	Musharraf had agreed, later when asked by Mr. Munshi, Siddiqui refused and rejected the notion that judges of the courts be administered any other oath and that to contrary to the ones under the 1973 constitution.
_	Laser spine surgery first began seeing clinical use in the 1980s and was primarily used within discectomy to treat lumbar disc disease under the notion that heating a bulging disc vaporized enough tissue to relieve pressure on the nerves and help alleviate pain.
_	He also cited the notion that he was a poor defender due to the belief that he lacked speed, while D'Antoni stated that Lin "was one of the quickest athletes we've ever worked out".
_	The EU ban on seal products was implemented in 2010 on the notion that it had caused pain and distress to the animals.
_	The dead ox itself is a reminder of death and is thus linked to the 'memento mori' idea, the notion that you should 'remember that you are mortal’.
_	In a 1964 publication, Warner and Rich showed that ribosomes active in protein synthesis contained tRNA molecules bound at the A and P sites, and discussed the notion that these molecules aided in the peptidyl transferase reaction.
_	The developmental biologist Stuart Newman, a professor at New York Medical College in Valhalla, N.Y., applied for a patent on a human-animal chimera in 1997 as a challenge to the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office and the U.S. Congress, motivated by his moral and scientific opposition to the notion that living things can be patented at all.
_	The disseminators of the concept define it as the notion that we have certain rights and responsibilities towards each other by the mere fact of being human on Earth.
_	Some Austrian economists therefore entirely reject the notion that interest rates are affected by liquidity preference.
_	Randall Roberts from "Los Angeles Times" said "the clip reinforces the notion that no one understands the convergence of image and music right now better than Gaga."
_	He held the notion that God was personal.
_	Fukuyama rejects the notion that biotechnology cannot be controlled.
_	Postmodernism is a rejection of 'totality', of the notion that planning could be 'comprehensive', widely applied regardless of context, and rational.
_	Postmodernism also brought a break from the notion that planning and architecture could result in social reform, which was an integral dimension of the plans of Modernism (Simonsen 1990).
_	""In these circumstances, while we accept that the Strasbourg court jurisprudence relied on by the appellant does provide some support for the notion that article 8 was engaged when Judge Corrie was asked to make an order for possession against her, there is no support for the proposition that the judge could be required to consider the proportionality of the order which he would have made under the provisions of the 1980 and 1988 Acts.
_	The decision to call it a guild was partly inspired by the notion that medieval guilds had encouraged professionalism along with mutual aid, as well as by a whimsical desire to create the acronym GOONS, evoking a popular British radio humorous show, "The Goon Show," and making a self-mocking comment on the quixotic nature of one-name studies.
_	A variety of religious scholars surveyed by TheBlaze condemn this viewpoint, saying "Some atheists and Biblical critics have held up the notion that the Bible condones rape.
_	Ida B. Wells, the well-known anti-lynching activist published the pamphlet entitled the "Southern Horrors: Lynch Law in All Its Phases" from 1892-1920 reporting that contrary to the notion that lynchings occurred because African American males had sexually abused or attacked white women, fewer than 30% of reported lynchings even involved the charge of rape.
_	"Tenure will put to rest the notion that this is a pick-up orchestra," Spisto said.
_	In contrast, theodicies of fortune emphasise the notion that privileges are a blessing and are deserved."
_	Dahrendorf expands on this idea with the notion that roles of authority may conflict when in different positions that call for different things.
_	By treating these events in isolation, however, 20th-century historians such as Douglas Lockwood and Timothy Hall have unwittingly reinforced the notion that these early raids on Australia – and Darwin – were isolated incidents conducted opportunistically and in no way related to, say, the later raids against Broome, Millingimbi or Horn Island.
_	This incident gives rise to the notion that Adalric was in fact an independent Basque duke in Gascony, though others interpret him as a rival Carolingian count.
_	Blaug's analysis rejects the notion that outdoor relief had a disastrous effect on the rural labour market.
_	Also, he objected to the notion that Britain could choose between greatness and happiness: "The choice is not in our power.
_	Psychologist Andrew Neher has written that "there is no good evidence to support the notion that auras are, in any way, psychic in origin."
_	Indeed, monostratal systems, be they dependency- or constituency-based, will likely reject the notion that the functions are derived from the constellation or that the constellation is derived from the functions.
_	He rejects the notion that existential philosophy is incompatible with religious thought.
_	User-in-the-Loop (UIL) refers to the notion that a technology (e.g., network) can improve a performance objective by engaging its human users (Layer 8).
_	Mansfield, in summing up the jury's verdict, said "The Case of Slaves was the same as if Horses had been thrown over board", and endeavoured to uphold the notion that slaves were property which could be destroyed in situations of "absolute necessity".
_	It was more or less a compendium of theological concepts, as articulated by Armstrong, which included the notion that God deliberately coded the bible "so that it would not be understood until our modern time".
_	In the scientific rendering of the word, atomism refers to the notion that all matter in the universe is composed of basic indivisible components, or atoms.
_	"Tikkun" editor Lerner also rejected the notion that he was anti-Israel.
_	Despite the fact that it is impractical and very unlikely to produce any effect at large scale, during the 1960s a great deal of attention was paid to the notion that counter-culture figures could intoxicate a whole city by putting a small dose of LSD in the water supply.
_	Some authorities within Conservative Judaism, notably Neil Gillman, also support the notion that the souls of the dead are unconscious until the Resurrection.
_	These two propositions, together with the tradition that the clan Aurelius had been entrusted with the maintenance of that deity's cult in Rome, inspired the notion that this could explain the devotion to the sun-god that Aurelian was to manifest as Emperor - see below.
_	A "New York Times" article mistakenly depicted Bush as being surprised to see a supermarket barcode reader; the report of his reaction exacerbated the notion that he was "out of touch".
_	Speaking in early 2004, he criticized traditional healers for spreading harmful, unscientific ideas, such as the notion that AIDS could be cured by having sex with a virgin.
_	Also GCU consistently opposed the notion that Rusyns are Ukrainians, arguing instead that they are a distinct nationality.
_	Loblaw president Richard Currie laughs at the notion that Canada has too many grocery stores.
_	Simon Reynolds, in "", describes it as touching on themes of alchemy: "the notion that instead of chasing the profane gold of material wealth, the true quest is for gold of the spirit."
_	"The Cult of Impotence" (1998) disputed the notion that countries had no alternative but to submit to corporate demands for deep tax cuts and reduced social spending -- or wealth-holders would move their capital offshore.
_	Jon Cole of the University of Liverpool explained that the results on dopaminergic neurotoxicity in the Ricaurte article were a big surprise and was quoted as saying, "The entire human literature relies on the notion that MDMA is a selective serotonergic neurotoxin."
_	However, after the discovery of the fossil in Kenya, it came to the notion that the "K. platyops" were one of the earlier species, living in the same time of the "Australopithecus afarensis".
_	Additional pieces show how she rebels against the notion that women are objects, in essence an instrument to be played by men.
_	Nevertheless, in 2007, "New York Times" columnist Nicholas Kristoff and others popularized the notion that "hard-liners in the Bush administration killed discussion" of an Iranian "Grand Bargain" that "could have saved lives in Iraq, isolated Palestinian terrorists and encouraged civil society groups in Iran," with Kristoff concluding:
_	McKinley is a strong supporter of the notion that people should be allowed to carry a concealed weapon.
_	Also, the notion that patients in heroin assisted treatment are enabled to maintain "destructive behavior" contradicts the findings that patients significantly recover in terms of both their social and health situation.
_	Critics were especially complimentary of the band's willingness to write a long, unconventional album, with AllMusic commenting, "Dream Theater have invested in the 'album' concept (and in listeners' attention spans) even as the music biz doubles down on the notion that long-players are merely envelopes to hold singles."
_	Charlie has become obsessed with the notion that the long-lost treasure of Spanish explorer Father Juan Florismarte Torres is buried somewhere near their suburban California house in the Santa Clarita Valley.
_	Since the original agreement between Ford and Ferguson was sealed with a handshake (versus a written contract) and included the notion that either party could terminate it at any time without reason, Henry Ford II didn't feel the need to continue to honor it.
_	Nathan Lee in "The Village Voice" advanced the notion that while "Pattern Recognition" focused to an extent on "specifying the ambient sense of invasiveness in all aspects of life after the collapse of the towers", "Spook Country" accepted that anxiety as a premise, and was thus "the more reflective, less unnerving of the two novels".
_	At the other extreme, the "thick" rule of law entails the notion that in addition to the requirements of the thin rule, it is necessary for the law to conform with certain substantive standards of justice and human rights.
_	He says that Yasser Arafat made a "disastrous mistake" in rejecting the peace offer, but that "based on my 14 years of dealings with Arafat, I reject the notion that he was bent on Israel's destruction".
_	Third, the notion that role modeling by upper income residents should improve behaviors of lower income residents may be grounded in assumptions around a culture of poverty, which asserts that those living in poverty actually have an alternative value system, separate from mainstream, middle- and upper-class values.
_	Local bookstores in the Seattle area described wariness over the physical presence of Amazon.com, with the University Book Store in the U District noting "different spending patterns" two months after the opening of Amazon's store; an Amazon spokesperson dismissed the notion that Amazon Books would interfere with independent bookstores and their operations, stating that "offline retail is a big space with room for lots of winners".
_	Evidence also suggested the notion that NSAIDs could reduce inflammation related to amyloid plaques, but trials were suspended due to high adverse events.
_	Rasmussen's model of grief is known as the "Life Reentry Model", referring to the notion that grief is not only a function of coping with loss, but also of each individual's need to "reenter" life.
_	During this period Fontenoy became fixated with the notion that Doriot was plotting to kill him, despite a lack of evidence.
_	In particular, she challenged the notion that Eliot was only accessible to those well-versed in his many allusions:
_	No less erroneous is the notion that it consists solely in a list of laws and prescriptions according to which the ecclesiastical hierarchy orders the sacred rites to be performed.
_	Newman agrees that Argento used "Tenebrae" to address his own public image, the notion that someone who creates art as "sick and twisted" as his, must himself be sick and twisted.
_	The book reveals that "the closer one gets to IBM, the more it becomes apparent that the majority of employees, whatever their personal ties, are, as professionals, unusually upright and uniformly dedicated to the notion that the customer pays their salaries.".
_	Murdock wrote, "the notion that America's cops simply are gunning down innocent black people is one of today's biggest and deadliest lies."
_	This sentimental, anti-intellectual form of pietism is seen in the thought and teaching of Zinzendorf, founder of the Moravians; but more intellectually rigorous forms of pietism are seen in the teachings of John Wesley, which were themselves influenced by Zinzendorf, and in the teachings of American preachers Jonathan Edwards, who restored to pietism Gerson's focus on obedience and borrowed from early church teachers Origen and Gregory of Nyssa the notion that humans yearn for God, and John Woolman, who combined a mystical view of the world with a deep concern for social issues; like Wesley, Woolman was influenced by Jakob Böhme, William Law and "The Imitation of Christ".
_	Nonetheless, they both followed the notion that it was to be independent of Spain.
_	Tom Casey, deputy spokesman at the U.S. State Department rejected the notion that the U.S. had bullied S. Korea into removing the 2003 ban on U.S. beef imports and said,
_	To further elaborate on the death of Moses, the actions of Moses preluding to his death, in the Islamic tradition, hint at the notion that Moses may have been an early recipient of the entitlement of being a martyr.
_	Hicks ridiculed the lawsuit as part of his act, pointing out (as many others have also done) the absurdity of the notion that a successful band would wish to kill off their purchasing fanbase.
_	An experiment (O'Keeffe and Wiseman, 2005) involving 5 mediums found no evidence to support the notion that the mediums under controlled conditions were able to demonstrate paranormal or mediumistic ability.
_	Two thirds of them succumbed and perished, and they had entertained the notion that all of them would perish either by the plague, by famine or by thirst, may God forbid.
_	To this he contrasts the stance of the "transpersonal ecology" described by Warwick Fox: this is "centred on the notion that only the ego-involved, contracted self can imagine itself to be distinct from the natural world and that expansion of the self beyond the boundaries of the personal necessarily means that one's awareness, and ground of concern, extends to the natural world" (page 194).
_	Conversely, the notion that the patenting of human genes is invalid may have support in the decision reached in the Howard Florey/Relaxin case, where an attempt was made to take out a patent on a naturally occurring human hormone.
_	She has also criticized separatist strands of feminism as "reactionary" for promoting the notion that men are inherently immoral, inferior, and unable to help end sexist oppression or benefit from feminism.
_	J.A.C. Brown calls "Naskh" an expression of “the notion that aspects of the Quran’s message and the Prophet’s teachings developed over time".
_	He introduced the notion that art, as he put it, “was not a question of forms and colors but one of the production of meaning.”
_	Investment in office buildings, stores, factories, utilities, streets, and, especially, apartments and single-family homes, added substantially to the infrastructure, and contributed to the notion that better times lay ahead.
_	John A. Whitehead, Director of the State Office Building Commission, rejected the notion that late entries were accepted.
_	On April 23, vocalist Craig Mabbitt stated via Twitter, "off to vegas today to finish out last minute badass demos with monte, then off to bamboozle, then studio time", giving the notion that the band will begin recording their studio album directly after The Bamboozle, and release it mid/late Summer 2010.
_	Maracle expressed himself (as did other Canadian modernist painters such as Carl Beam and Robert Houle) as an individual sometimes using identifiable native imagery and sometimes not, making irrelevant the debate of “authentically Indian” Maracle moved beyond the notion that all native artists draw their subjects from myth and legends and showed works based on political issues and ideas.
_	They also show that these people go unpunished for their crime, creating the notion that crime is something a person can get away with.
_	Through various media, producers and writers have been capitalizing on the notion that Americans admire the samurai lifestyle.
_	Hauerwas and Willimon proceed to discuss ethics and the relationship between Christianity and politics, critiquing the notion that Christians, or the church as a whole, should attempt to transform secular governments or get overly involved in politics in an attempt to change society.
_	Linnaeus then included it in his 1753 publication, as "Chelone pentstemon", altering the spelling to better correspond to the notion that the name referred to the unusual fifth stamen (Greek "penta-", five).
_	After several failed attempts to contact her, Sinisi finally agrees to meet Dana after having the notion that someone is watching her.
_	It is derived from the Greek words στίγμα "stigma" "mark, sign" and ἔργον "ergon" "work, action", and captures the notion that an agent’s actions leave signs in the environment, signs that it and other agents sense and that determine and incite their subsequent actions.
_	Inspired by the notion that the political intrigues behind the Wars of the Roses often seemed like playground squabbles, Howell and production designer Oliver Bayldon staged the four plays in a single set resembling a children's adventure playground.
_	Citing the biblical verse "the matter is very near to you, in your mouth, your heart, to do", the philosophy is based on the notion that the human is not inherently evil; rather, every individual has an inner conflict that is characterized with two different inclinations, the good and the bad.
_	The incoming Jewish migrants to Southern Syria (Palestine) and the Jewish communities were criticized for their "foreign and racial loyalties", their unwillingness to assimilate, and their active willingness to create an ethnically Jewish state in Palestine, with Saadeh deeming the Jews as the community unable and unwilling to assimilate, and having criticized the notion that Jewishness can be a cornerstone for a nation-state.
_	In 2010, based on the notion that Coandă invented the first jet, the centennial of the jet aircraft was celebrated in Romania.
_	After selling the shop to a local loan shark, Calvin slowly begins to see his father's vision and legacy and struggles with the notion that he just sold it out.
_	Sanctuaries act on behalf of the animals, and the caregivers work under the notion that all animals in the sanctuary, human and non-human, are of equal importance.
_	The film's marketing played up the notion that the film was haunted.
_	CJCDC’s neighborhood revitalization efforts are based on the notion that there is a role that people must play in their own uplift.
_	Directive play therapy is guided by the notion that using directives to guide the child through play will cause a faster change than is generated by nondirective play therapy.
_	Catherine Strong states that grunge's strongest metal influence was thrash metal, which had a tradition of "equality with the audience", based on the notion that "anyone could start a band" (a way of thinking also shared by US hardcore punk, which Strong also cites as an influence on grunge) which was also taken up by grunge bands.
_	Despite the notion that getting several things done at once makes us more productive, research has indicated that polychronicity is negatively correlated with deadlines.
_	Even if we were to surmount the difficulties attending the notion that due process of law can be embodied in fixed rules, and those attending respondent's particular formulation, the rule he proposes would not appear to be of significant benefit to him.
_	BTR echoed the notion that the world was divided in two camps, and in the struggle between the Anglo-American imperialist camp and the Soviet-led democratic camp the Indian state had aligned itself with the imperialists.
_	Mr. Justice Douglas is troubled by the notion that corporations are to be classified as people for the purpose of interpreting the Equal Protection Clause.
_	The resemblance of this barnacle's fleshy stalk to a goose's neck gave rise in ancient times to the notion that geese, or at least certain seagoing species of wild geese, literally grew from the barnacle.
_	He refutes the notion that the Maronites are "saintly martyrs" but rather "as savage and bloodthirsty in their traditional warfare as their pagan neighbours".
_	From the start Wegener was hostile to the notion that Vidkun Quisling should take a leading role in the new government, instead favouring the idea that the Nazis should establish their own administrative system in Norway.
_	The findings are consistent with the notion that differences in labor market opportunities of different migrant groups shape their potential impact on crime."
_	Then 'quantifier variance' combines the notion that the same object can have different names, so the quantifier may refer to the same thing even though different names are employed by it, and the notion that quantifier expressions can be formed in a variety of ways.
_	It was established on the notion that there was no community in India empowering women filmmakers.
_	A number of additional proteins have been identified that associate with SLP-76 both constitutively and inducibly following receptor ligation, supporting the notion that SLP-76 functions as an adaptor or scaffold protein.
_	In an interview taped in 1976, bisexual Conservative Party politician Robert Boothby, who had been a close friend of Michael during their teens described Michael's relationship with Barrie at that time as 'morbid' and 'unhealthy', but dismissed the notion that there had been a sexual aspect to it.
_	In spite of well-proven and widely known historical facts about the Final Solution in the territory of modern-day Ukraine, Nakonechny rejected the notion that Ukrainian nationalists participated in the destruction of the Jews.
_	One of the foundational concepts in the literary criticism of the Hebrew Bible in general and the Pentateuch in particular is the notion that the various literary components, whether small or large, were put together by redactors or editors rather than authors in the modern sense.
_	The Holy Office further enjoined Galileo on February 26, 1616 from teaching or defending the notion that the earth revolved around a stationary sun.
_	She builds on Michael Silverstein's notion of indexical order: the notion that linguistic variables index a social group, which by association leads to the indexing of certain traits stereotypically associated with members of that group.
_	In philosophy, the Weyl's tile argument (named after Hermann Weyl) is an argument against the notion that physical space is discrete, or composed of a number of finite sized units (or tiles).
_	"The Guardian"'s John Patterson argued that Hollywood depictions of NSA surveillance, including "Enemy of the State" and "Echelon Conspiracy", had "softened" up the American public to "the notion that our spending habits, our location, our every movement and conversation, are visible to others whose motives we cannot know."
_	A simple solution is that the year engraved in the inscription has also been misinterpreted, and that the original message reads "1831" instead of "1837"; this would be a logical fit with the notion that Robidoux may have been searching for a place to establish a new trading post in late 1831, shortly before he eventually did so when he bought the Reed Trading Post.
_	One of the main arguments for scientific realism centers on the notion that scientific knowledge is progressive in nature, and that it is able to predict phenomena successfully.
_	He did not reject the notion that preservation and storage were important, but he asserted that the purpose of such activities was to promote use.
_	During the first season, having Joy be removed from the Anubis House under the notion that she was the Chosen One, Victor went to great lengths to conceal her being there.
_	This reinforced the notion that PK was meant to be a "real superhero", existing in its own world, related to but fundamentally different from the mostly parodic and humorous Paperinik.
_	Colonial feminism was a Western discourse of dominance which, "introduced the notion that an intrinsic connection existed between the issue of culture and the status of women, and … that progress for women could be achieved only through abandoning the native culture."
_	He has also argued in support of the notion that George W. Bush will be judged "one of the great presidents of the United States".
_	The sculptor had no idea of its location, and enjoys the notion that wood which grew out of the land will finally return to it.
_	He warned against the notion that the Americans would back down in the face of force, since most Americans were of British descent:
_	The enigma, or apparent paradox relevant to Zuni belief and realism in art is resolved in the notion that carvings for sale and collection are produced without religious intent.
_	If some supporters articulate that they agree to the independence of Taiwan, they may either be referring to the notion of formally creating an independent Republic of Taiwan, or to the notion that Taiwan has become synonymous with the current Republic of China from Resolution on Taiwan's Future and ROC-Taiwan is already independent (as reflected in the evolving concept from Four Noes and One Without to One Country on Each Side), these ideas run counter to the claims of the People's Republic of China.
_	Liz resigns herself to the notion that she has lost another boyfriend, only to return home and find that Criss has cooked her an amazing Valentine's Day dinner.
_	He rejects the notion that the graduates of the SS schools were a military elite.
_	During this period, while holding a position as a teacher in a secondary school, Pasolini stood out in the local Communist Party section as a skilful writer defying the notion that communism was contrary to Christian values, even though Pope Pius XII had excommunicated communist sympathisers from the Church.
_	Numerous historians have stated that there is limited evidence to support the notion that Rama was born at the precise location of the Babri Masjid, as well as that a temple to Rama once stood at the site.
_	Proponents advance the notion that nuclear power produces virtually no air pollution, in contrast to the chief viable alternative of fossil fuel.
_	One key concept Estill Voice Training takes from dynamical systems theory is the notion that complex systems can have attractor states.
_	Data as a service brings the notion that data quality can happen in a centralized place, cleansing and enriching data and offering it to different systems, applications or users, irrespective of where they were in the organization or on the network.
_	The name "horror fusionis" (Latin phrase literally meaning "fear of fusion") arises from the notion that the brain is, or at least appears to be, actively preventing binocular fusion.
_	The survivors rejected the notion that the killings were "not deliberate," pointing to accounts from veterans and to documents attesting to front-line orders to shoot civilians.
_	Like the ecological approach, the action-specific perception account favors the notion that perception involves processes that relate the environment to the perceiver's potential for action.
_	Stowe's final chapter is dedicated to defending the notion that blacks should be employed to help build the state of Florida to transform it from a wilderness into a civilization.
_	He rejected the notion that homosexuals were a social minority, and argued that the Soviet Union, governed by "manly proletariat", is obliged to persecute homosexuals to protect the youth from their corrupting effect.
_	Sadoveanu rejected the notion that ancestral Romanians were religious individuals, stating that their belief was in fact "limited to rituals and customs."
_	Hamilton continued in this essay on defending the notion that a bill of rights is unnecessary for the Constitution when he stated,
_	Shared sensing is the notion that individual or aggregated sensory experiences are shared in real-time across members of a group, toward greater awareness of information relevant to an individual's goals.
_	Otto I was told by some to send Theophanu away, on account of the notion that her questionable imperial origin would not legitimize the emperorship.
_	In closing arguments, Darden ridiculed the notion that police officers might have wanted to frame Simpson.
_	Anti-Agenda 21 conspiracy theories have circulated in the U.S. Some Tea Party movement activists and others promoted the notion that Agenda 21 was part of a UN plot to deny property rights, undermine U.S. sovereignty, or force citizens to move to cities.
_	He put forward the notion that planetary orbits with in spirals, not circles or ellipses so recognized that the Solar System is in expansion (planets move away from the Sun).
_	Earlier studies of achievement often emphasized the notion that high-achieving individuals typically possess traits above and beyond that of normal ability.
_	Galba scorned the notion that soldiers should be "bribed" for their loyalty.
_	The notion that microcredit brings loans to people who previously had no access to them is widespread but mistaken, as is the notion that the strong majority of microloans are used for business purposes.
_	Central to these studies was the notion that statistically speaking, homosexuals suffered greater losses than many of the smaller minorities under Nazi persecution such as the Jehovah’s Witnesses and within the camps experienced harsher treatments and ostracization as well as execution.
_	His rendering on coins from Volterra and his inclusion in a dedicatory inscription found in Fiernzuola, however, preclude the notion that his worship was limited to Cortona.
_	Written eight years ahead of the 12th FYP that holds the same thematic title "The Chinese Dream" () it introduces the notion that China's highly fragmented, sclerotic urban patterns determine a path of increasing inefficiency and energy-dependence.
_	In following with the notion that seven-month-olds have categorical understandings of emotion, they are also capable of associating emotional prosodies with corresponding facial expressions.
_	It hits on the notion that mankind's activities have created conditions that begin to affect a delicate equilibrium of biotic and abiotic conditions that have fostered and sustained complex life forms and ecosystems.
_	Dworkin opposes the notion that judges have a discretion in such difficult cases.
_	Navitaire also confirmed the notion that an injunction would be granted only where it wasn't oppressive.
_	Consequently, developmental data offers little support for the notion that language processing occurs within a module.
_	Both in Luke and John Jesus rejects the notion that illness and misfortune are the result of sins.
_	The fact that his first consulate was an ordinary one, not suffect, reinforces the notion that he was held in high regard by Caracalla.
_	At the end, the notion that more rights should be granted is rebuffed by the speaker.
_	One of the most radical aspects of Pérez's program for government was the notion that petroleum oil was a tool for under-developed nations like Venezuela to attain first world status and usher a fairer, more equitable international order.
_	Caregivers were uncomfortable with the notion that patient violence is part of the job but also that it is unfair to believe that those with mental illness should be seen as more violent in nature.
_	Moline rejects the notion that points of view are reducible to some rules based on some theories, maxims or dogmas.
_	In the late 1970s researchers dispelled the notion that pacifiers were psychologically unhealthy and aberrant.
_	Unlike other snakes that tend to run away from human disturbance, the death adder is inclined to hold its ground, leading to the notion that the death adder cannot hear.
_	The "Washington Post"'s Zachary A. Goldfarb, who covers economic policy and the White House for the Post, rejected the notion that Obama's speech was liberal.
_	Several academic statements have alluded to the notion that racism and ethnic discrimination are deep, inherent and fundamental aspects of North American society.
_	The ruling elite attempted to draw attention away from these problems by promoting Rydz-Śmigły as Piłsudski‘s heir and a natural patriotic magnet for all of society, with its own propaganda and sloganeering, giving rise to the notion that his leadership would lead Poland out of its nearly impossible geopolitical situation.
_	The media latched on to the notion that this animal rivals the size of Hogzilla.
_	"Rerum novarum" also recognized that the poor have a special status in consideration of social issues: the modern Catholic principle of the "preferential option for the poor" and the notion that God is on the side of the poor found their first expression in this document.
_	Kennedy also faced the notion that with one brother President and another U.S. Attorney General, "Don't you think that Teddy is one Kennedy too many?"
_	Geoffrey Strickland emphasizes that current discussions on economic development are led by the notion that human reproduction is a commodity that must be regulated and improved in order to encourage market efficiency, which is a phenomenon that counteracts the growth of capitalism.
_	Prior to the decision, the notion that a party may owe another a duty of care for statements made in reliance had been rejected, with the only remedy for such losses being in contract law.
_	As a result, a number of political, military, and religious leaders during the Renaissance were inculcated with the notion that their pursuit of personal fulfillment should be grounded in classical example and philosophical contemplation.
_	In all these areas a central change was the adoption of certain ideas of Johann Gottlieb Fichte, especially the notion that the self-transcendence of the world by man was a possibility and duty, but one that could never be conclusively fulfilled.
_	As local protests against CDM projects are arising on every continent, the notion that CDM 'brings development to the South' is contested.
_	Norman Golb took up the notion that the Qumran settlement was established as a fortress and argued—against the prevailing views of the time—that not only was Qumran not established as a sectarian residence, but that there were no sectarians at the site at all.
_	Intentionality refers to the notion that consciousness is always the consciousness "of" something.
_	Carroll disclaims the notion that Christian anti-Judaism leads inevitably to the Holocaust committed by Nazi Germany, but he argues that Church's long history of "Jew-hatred" laid the foundation for Hitler's crimes.
_	Early in Gregory's career, he began to formulate the notion that the Black race could, and should necessarily, use the arts as a means for social change.
_	Central to Thurnauer's choice of Manet's work as a starting point is the notion that his female subjects were themselves painters, as opposed to models.
_	In one correspondence, Murad entertained the notion that Islam and Protestantism had "much more in common than either did with Roman Catholicism, as both rejected the worship of idols", and argued for an alliance between England and the Ottoman Empire.
_	In 1900, in his book, "Interpretation of Dreams," Freud introduced the notion that the unconscious mind is not merely used to describe the opposite of consciousness, but instead, he insisted that there exist two kinds of unconscious minds: unconscious and preconscious.
_	To Kruger's critics this lent much credence to the notion that he was a tyrant.
_	It was in this time that Kabata developed the notion that separate populations of fish can be identified by study of the prevalence of various parasites and diseases.
_	This helps you differentiate one thing from another by the experience of moving around it, seeing new aspects of it (often referred to as making the absent present and the present absent), and still retaining the notion that this is the same thing that you saw other aspects of just a moment ago (it is identical).
_	Troubled by the notion that the apparition might represent an evil spirit, Soubirous used the holy water as a test.
_	Johnson is determined "dispel the notion that science is 'something that happens in a lab far away that doesn’t matter' ".
_	The law in Sweden, Norway and Iceland – where it is illegal to pay for sex, but not to sell sexual services – is based on the notion that all forms of prostitution are inherently exploitative, opposing the notion that prostitution can be voluntary.
_	The motive force in Islamic ethics is the notion that every human being is called to "command the good and forbid the evil" in all spheres of life.
_	Early attempts at an explanation of dowsing were based on the notion that the divining rod was physically affected by emanations from substances of interest.
_	After congratulating Cuza on his accomplishment, Asachi authored a pome titled "Odă la Dumnezeu" ("An Ode to God"), which proclaimed the brotherhood of Romanians and the notion that "power resides in Unity".
_	It refers to the notion that a complex idea can be conveyed with just a single still image or that an image of a subject conveys its meaning or essence more effectively than a description does.
_	In the recounting of an interview with reporter Will Rankin, Curry was quoted as rejecting the notion that Henry Chadwick should be credited.
_	This is the time to take the path to working with other minority groups, civil society organizations and human rights bodies to confront antisemitism within the context of a wider antiracist struggle, not to perpetuate the notion that Jews stand alone."
_	Many Iraqis chose to take refuge in Lebanon because of the notion that it was easier to get registered for resettlement in a third country with the UNHCR in Beirut.
_	Although it condemned lying, Garnet's treatise supported the notion that when questioned, for instance, on the presence of a priest in his house, a Catholic might "securely in conscience" answer "No" if he had a "secret meaning reserved in his mind".
_	Her audiences were struck by the contrast between her physical girlishness and the eloquence with which she spoke of spiritual matters, and found in that contrast support for the notion that spirits were speaking through her.
_	One frequent complaint about the game involves the notion that there is too much luck involved, especially concerning possessing too many or too few lands.
_	While many attendees held the notion that U.S. films served to promote a secret agenda they called "Hollywoodism", they often differed in their approaches.
_	UN documents of the period denied the existence of the Jews, Israel ancient history, the Holocaust, and the notion that Jews deserve the same rights granted to other groups.
_	The episode raised concerns over violent movies on video and the notion that they were being viewed by children.
_	Contemporary socialisation theory proposes the notion that when a child is first born it has a biological sex but no social gender.
_	Critic Andrew O'Hehir also denounced the notion that the film has a message, writing that it "just piles imaginary atrocities on top of real ones, and then halfheartedly claims that it means something.
_	It consists of the notion that in order to understand vertical problems (looking deeply at one particular issue), you must understand and evaluate the horizontal environment as a whole (the entire system and its interrelated functions).
_	Performative surveillance is the notion that people are very much aware that they are being surveiled on websites, like Facebook, and use the surveillance as an opportunity to portray themselves in a way that connotes a certain lifestyle—of which, that individual may, or may not, distort how they are perceived in reality.
_	More broadly, it refers to the notion that some signals intelligence capabilities are so powerful or otherwise inaccessible that only the NSA will be able to deploy them, though recent analyses suggest that this advantage may be under stress.
_	BDI is fundamentally reliant on folk psychology (the 'theory theory'), which is the notion that our mental models of the world are theories.
_	Denton suggested that these data undermined the notion that fish were ancestral to frogs, which were ancestral to reptiles, which were ancestral to birds and mammals.
_	Even if you saw the play, I don't think your familiarity with the alcoholic hallucinations of Elwood P. Dowd, the hero, will diminish your enjoyment of the film, and though James Stewart, who plays Dowd in the picture, doesn't bring to his part all the battered authority of Frank Fay, the originator of the role, he nevertheless succeeds in making plausible the notion that Harvey, the rabbit, would accept him as a pal."
_	The experiments strongly supported the notion that in the séance room, believers are more suggestible than disbelievers for suggestions that are consistent with their belief in paranormal phenomena.
_	Plutarch and other ancient authors scoff at the notion that the god himself enters the body of a paid mantic for use as a mouthpiece.
_	However, further work by the same researchers noted that the spread of several unusual modern variants of plague worldwide can be dated to an evolutionary radiation event approximately coinciding with the Plague of Justinian, supporting the notion that it was caused by a strain of bubonic plague.
_	This further supports the notion that "Apis florea" prefer to have a queenright colony and use worker policing as an ESS.
_	The "Chicago Tribune", in an article about conditions in the canal, referred to the notion that yellow fever was carried by mosquitos as "bugaboo".
_	Fleming is very much a product of his time and class, however, exulting in the notion that he is going where "no one has ever been before," ignoring the fact that the natives have been living there for many thousands of years.
_	Musicologist Philip Lambert disagrees with the notion that "Brian wrote B-side songs before his December catharsis and A-side songs in the sunny glow of his subsequent freedom", believing that the compositions which preceded his plane episode still showed evidence of progressive ingenuity.
_	The Court upheld the restriction on corporate speech based on the notion that "[c]orporate wealth can unfairly influence elections," and the Michigan law still allowed the corporation to make contributions from a segregated fund.
_	The Indians residing in the Black Hills feared the notion that if they accept the award their land would be officially sold.
_	However, the Commission was unable to say much more about the size and importance of such involvement, concluding that "the notion that the trade in looted art – compared with the occupied territories of Western Europe – took place on a particularly large scale could not be confirmed.
_	In 1986 Fasold, along with Ron Wyatt, was one of the first Americans to investigate the notion that Jabal al-Lawz in Saudi Arabia might be the Biblical Mount Sinai.
_	The theorist of Neoclassicism, Johann Joachim Winckelmann, analysed the stylistic changes in Greek classical art in 1764, comparing them closely to the changes in Renaissance art, and "Georg Hegel codified the notion that each historical period will have a typical style", casting a very long shadow over the study of style.
_	Shortly before the war started among the many designs initiated by the Drawing Office was one known as the 'Hydravion', based on the notion that an aeroplane should be able to take off from water as well as from land.
_	Just as familiar is the notion that the abortive Curtiss XP-46 was the basis of the P-51 design.
_	The same study found also found instances of women's successes and failures being described as "her little jump hook", adding to the notion that women are less talented or skilled than their male counterparts.
_	The stare-in-the-crowd effect is the notion that an eyes-forward, direct gaze is more easily detected than an averted gaze.
_	In 1995, Noam Chomsky criticized the book's conclusions about race and the notion that Blacks and people with lower IQs having more children is even a problem.
_	Ellie Mae O'Hagan of "The Guardian" commented that "the problem, I think, is not the belief that Barton is a reformed character, but the notion that one cannot possibly be a philosopher and violent at the same time: that quoting philosophy should automatically be taken as a sign of reformation ...
_	They critique the notion that there could be legitimate leaders, democratically chosen through a formal network of grassroots structures, acting on behalf of a big-tent pluralistic association of global citizens to directly confront the entrenched power of transnational corporations and state governments.
_	In his 2005 textbook on training and behavior, Steven Lindsay writes "Instead of instilling social aversion and anxiety ... animal and human research supports the notion that competent shock [collar] training appears to promote positive social attachment, safety, and reward effects that may be provided and amplified via affectionate petting and reassuring praise.
_	Since the South Korean government bases its legitimacy partly on the notion that it defends South Korea from North Korea in the North and from Japan from the south, nationalism has been stoked over this issue.
_	It was added that the court would not deny restitution if the illegality was collateral or insignificant, but it rejected the notion that recovery should be allowed merely because denial might affront "public conscience".
_	Francis Vollmer, an orphan of unknown parentage, is raised by a wealthy New York banker and develops an overwhelming obsession with the notion that he is the offspring of noble parentage, possibly even an illicit union of Kaiser Wilhelm and Queen Mary.
_	These findings are consistent with previous research, and they point to the notion that social support in the form of "spousal participation" exerts beneficial effect on adherence towards fitness programs, or in general, most types of health-related joint endeavor.
_	Although studies justify the notion that people often do not contribute to online communities, some research shows that older adults are more likely to participate in online communities than younger people because different generations tend to use the internet differently.
_	However, the notion that the thylacine was a taxidermied mount was challenged by Robert Paddle in 2008.
_	Bell discusses the development, through history, of the notion that paintings can express feelings and ideas.
_	This game serves to clarify the notion that rotations in space have properties that cannot be intuitively explained by considering only the rotation of a single rigid object in space.
_	The film was delivered to Antenne 2 in 1987, but was not released for to years: firstly, it was not aired until after the French presidential election of 1988, as to avoid any semblance of opposition to its far-right candidate; furthermore, arguments such as « the French being divided » on the subject, or the notion that « Nazism does not interest anyone anymore », were put forwards and retarded the release.
_	The "Brulotte" ruling did not depend "on the notion that post-patent royalties harm competition."
_	Boyd Tonkin, in his "Independent" profile on McCarthy, picks up on the notion that literature itself is a series of repetitions and duplications.
_	Although Ebert did not engage with the issue again and his view remains mired in controversy, the notion that video games are ineligible to be considered fine art due to their commercial appeal and structure as choice-driven narratives has proved persuasive for many including video game luminary Brian Moriarty who in March 2011 gave a lecture on the topic entitled "An Apology For Roger Ebert".
_	It appears first in Section 22, in a critique of the notion that nature dictates a morality of equality before the law.
_	Moreover, the notion that a New York jury (which plaintiffs have demanded) applying Ecuadorian law (which likely governs the claims here made) could meaningfully assess what occurred in the Amazonian rainforests of Ecuador in the late 1960s and early 1970s is problematic on its face..."
_	In further support of a Place Name interpretation is the notion that MMST was lost from the Hebrew Masoretic text, but preserved via a corrupt Greek transliteration in the Septuagint version of the book of Joshua, 15:59-60 (Rainey, 1982, p. 59):
_	Jalal claims to campaign on a platform that rejects the notion that Afghan politics must be tribal and divisive.
_	The concepts of self-referential encoding and the SRE rely on the notion that relating information to the self during the process of encoding it in memory facilitates recall, hence the effect of self-reference on memory.
_	There are no official definitions of these generations; rather, they represent the notion that there are stages in the development of fighter design approaches, performance capabilities, and technological evolution.
_	Suba, in his influential 1991 book "Dynamic Chess Strategy", rejects the notion that the initiative can always be transformed into an enduring advantage.
_	The novel's title is derived ostensibly from the notion that there was an excess of one million women over men in Victorian England.
_	Underlying the Bradley immunity...is the notion that private rights can be sacrificed in some degree to the achievement of the greater public good deriving from a completely independent judiciary, because there exist alternative forums and methods for vindicating those rights.
_	The overt pronoun analysis entirely rejects the notion that ellipsis is involved.
_	He is noted for developing a series of mouthpieces based on the notion that clarinetists with more or less under- or overbite need different facings on their mouthpieces.
_	The 1966 discovery of a 9.5 kilometer long earthwork north of Tikal's center did much to dispel the notion that the Maya were peaceful.
_	Herwig Wolfram classifies the Turcilingi as a Germanic tribe, and supports the notion that they were the royal clan of the Scirii.
_	It was from these early experiences that Woolworth developed the notion that goods should sell themselves, something which became increasingly prominent in his retail career.
_	However, the justices did mark the notion that cameras would return to courtrooms eventually:
_	She also displays generosity towards her maid, Natasha, by sharing the transformative cream with her, reinforcing the notion that she truly does not care for money or beauty but only for the Master and love.
_	However, it has not supported the notion that one preceded and produced the other, as supporters of the "primacy of ritual" hypothesis would claim.
_	Further, they reject the notion that the home becomes a source of enjoyment based purely on its uniqueness, claiming that comfort is largely the product of organization, order, and functionality.
_	He rejects the notion that men be crass, abusive, and violent.
_	refers to "God the Judge of all" and the notion that all humans will eventually "be judged" is an essential element of Christian teachings.
_	So the notion that he could be sitting there on a cosmic pit stop during the jump gate sequence in "Guardians"...really says, so wait a minute, he's this same character who's popped up in all these films?"
_	In "The Unthinkable Swift: The Spontaneous Philosophy of a Church of England Man", Warren Montag argues that Swift was concerned to refute the notion that the individual precedes society, as Defoe's novel seems to suggest.
_	Her memory of the luncheon supported the notion that Josephine was one of Crosby's many passing fancies.
_	In fact, much of the economic development discourse is centered around the notion that formalization indicates how developed a country's economy is; for more on this discussion see the page on fiscal capacity.
_	Coolidge adopted the taxation policies of his Secretary of the Treasury, Andrew Mellon, who advocated "scientific taxation" — the notion that lowering taxes will increase, rather than decrease, government receipts.
_	This approach does not include a critical approach to mathematics itself, or the notion that mathematics education should include the learning of mathematics for the purpose of being able to analyze and change structures of power and injustice in the world.
_	Theory and empirical research has supported the notion that people are using working memory to process information needed to follow the story line or plot.
_	It turns out that the killings are being done by a faction of the Christian Church (The Church of the Reborn Jesus) who hold the notion that the Jews have forfeited their role as the chosen people (replacement theology) and by killing the 36 should bring about the Second Coming (something the Jews do not believe).
_	This supports the notion that moral reasoning is related to both seeing things from other persons' points of view and to grasping others' feelings.
_	Jack Cowart, executive director of the Lichtenstein Foundation, contests the notion that Lichtenstein was a copyist, saying: "Roy's work was a wonderment of the graphic formulae and the codification of sentiment that had been worked out by others.
_	Overall, however, the premise is further supported by the notion that the German word for street is "Strasse" (Straße, abbreviated St).
_	He uses as an example the notion that God becomes "angry" with people who do wrong.
_	Partly mentioned in the counter-suit included the notion that Slipknot were parodies of bands themselves, further citing the specific example of Mushroomhead, who wore near identical style masks and jumpsuits, and had been playing several years before Slipknot even formed, let alone went mainstream.
_	Practitioners may recommend detoxification as a treatment to address the notion that mercury poisoning arises from consumption of contaminated fish and from dental amalgam fillings – Quackwatch states: "Removing good fillings is not merely a waste of money.
_	Wong contested the notion that Lee was fighting for the right to teach whites as not all of his students were Chinese.
_	The sonnet emphasizes the notion that the subject will not reach true harmony if he does not settle down with a wife and children.
_	Heinlein was a vocal proponent of the notion that juvenile readers were far more sophisticated and able to handle more complex or difficult themes than most people realized.
_	Critics from "Vibe" said that the notion that "rock is dead" is a cliché, but argued that the track was mocking that notion, adding that "maybe rock "is" dead if people like Marilyn keep recreating old styles [like glam rock] instead of doing something new and innovative."
_	It is true that sabotage is a weapon whose use is highly characteristic of revolutionary unionism, but the notion that its use is confined to revolutionary unionists fades out the moment its true character and varied forms are known.
_	Neurath also rejected the notion that science should be reconstructed in terms of sense data, because perceptual experiences are too subjective to constitute a valid foundation for the formal reconstruction of science.
_	Stemming from this idea, the second defining belief of Hindus in Ghana is the notion that cows are sacred beings that must not be harmed, but rather revered.
_	However, this deceptive effort on Robin's part causes strife and distrust among the team, and only inflates the notion that Robin's obsessive search for Slade is making him more and more a reflection of the menace.
_	Throughout the second season, using Munya to give the Saturdays the notion that he had died, Argost when into hiding before saving Zak from Rani Nagi and offering to help him hone his Kur powers.
_	As time passed, this idea was replaced with the notion that the creature was indeed both a living animal and a living plant.
_	He also called for political reforms within the context of the Jamahiriya system and rejected the notion that he could succeed his father, saying that "this is not a farm to inherit".
_	TEAM addresses some of the shortcomings in cognitive therapy, and is based on the notion that motivation influences our thoughts, feelings, and actions just as much as our thoughts (or cognitions).
_	She calls herself a rebel against the notion that "the female sphere is domestic, and the practice of our duty in that province should be our highest ambition," and sees a woman trapped in an unhappy marriage as "the legal slave of a despotic sovereign".
_	Yet, he clung to the notion that Yiddish can still be a living language.
_	Furthermore, after 1980 the disorder was a progressively deteriorating one once again, with the notion that recovery, if it happened at all, was rare.
_	Criticism from reformer Martin Luther on the Fugger business methods and novelistic portrayal from early research have led to the notion that Jakob Fugger exercised considerable power over Maximilian I the king and emperor of the Holy Roman Empire, while more recent research shows that this was only partially true.
_	SlashNET's administration officially decries the use of mission statements and other business-like "buzzwords" for IRC networks and rejects the notion that these are necessary for the operation of a network.
_	I don't care about the notion that it creates a legacy."
_	The Hindutva-notion that the Hindu-culture originated in India was threatened by the notion that the Aryans originated outside India.
_	The concept of motor cognition grasps the notion that cognition is embodied in action, and that the motor system participates in what is usually considered as mental processing, including those involved in social interaction.
_	The film plays with the notion that "It" is a quality which eschews definitions and categories; consequently, the girl portrayed by Bow is an amalgam of an ingenue and a femme fatale, with a touch of Madonna's latter day "Material Girl" incarnation.
_	Marx did not reject the basic concept of the Quantity Theory of Money, but rejected the notion that each of the four elements were equal, and instead argued that the quantity of commodities and the price of commodities are the determinative elements and that the volume of money follows from them.
_	Therefore, Šašel-Kos supports the notion that the province was dissolved during the reign of Vespasian (79–89 AD)
_	This portrayal perpetuates the notion that women are always submissive to social structures.
_	Kozowyk's job, the people he encountered, the stories he heard, and the notion that everybody both has and is a "client", meaning everybody works for somebody, and that everybody is not entirely mentally stable.
_	It is from this fanciful etymological musing that Thomas Malory got the notion that Excalibur meant "cut steel" (""the name of it,' said the lady, 'is Excalibur, that is as moche to say, as Cut stele"").
_	On March 1, 2013, Obama, speaking about "Hollingsworth v. Perry", the U.S. Supreme Court case about Proposition 8, said "When the Supreme Court asks do you think that the California law, which doesn't provide any rationale for discriminating against same-sex couples other than just the notion that, well, they're same-sex couples—if the Supreme Court asks me or my attorney general or solicitor general, 'Do we think that meets constitutional muster?'
_	According to Deepa Kumar in her book "Islamophobia and the Politics of Empire", Emerson's Investigative Project on Terrorism, together with David Yerushalmi's Society of Americans for National Existence, have forwarded the notion that there is a conspiracy by Muslims to take over the US, that Muslims have infiltrated its society, making no distinctions between Muslims and Islamists, and contend that Muslim Americans have ties to terrorist organizations and want to institute Sharia law in the United States.
_	Genie's language skills were deemed as poor, and this was linked to the notion that she began to learn language when she was 13½.
_	The FDA recommends understanding the ingredient label and says "There is no list of ingredients that can be guaranteed not to cause allergic reactions, so consumers who are prone to allergies should pay careful attention to what they use on their skin", further warning that "[t]here is no basis in fact or scientific legitimacy to the notion that products containing natural ingredients are good for the skin".
_	Given his limited vision, he mostly speaks to anyone hung up on the notion that Brooklyn’s vacant throne needs an immediate placeholder."
_	There is an academic dispute over the ships, and some archaeologists have criticised the notion that the ships were actually built, calling the ships a myth.
_	Manning and Rathbone both released a number of works which used Caslon Old Face font, to add a visual element to the notion that their works were actual diaries of long ago persons.
_	Press reports have alleged that Addington helped to shape an August 2002 opinion from the Department of Justice's Office of Legal Counsel (OLC) that said torture might be justified in some cases, although John Yoo—who actually wrote those memos himself—avers in a book he later authored that the notion that Addington "had a hand in drafting Justice Department legal opinions in the war on terrorism" is "so erroneous as to be laughable."
_	Bruno Latour, in "Critical Inquiry, " argued that Baudrillard believed that their destruction was forced by the society that created them, alluding to the notion that the Towers were "brought down by their own weight".
_	Forbes and Street also point out that, along with other festivals such as the Venice Film Festival and Berlin International Film Festival, Cannes offers an opportunity to determine a particular country's image of its cinema and generally foster the notion that European cinema is "art" cinema.
_	Such absence of omnibenevolence is one kind of theist counterargument to the notion that the problem of evil poses any great logical challenge to theism.
_	It defended 'engagement', the notion that recognition of the Parliamentary regime should be required.
_	Moreover, she is critical of the notion that one loses a job or finds it hard to find one because of some internal failing, instead placing the emphasis on the difficulties and challenges of the external reality.
_	It is predicated on the notion that people are basically good and won’t cheat."
_	In view of the civil and religious powers held by the king, there can be little argument against the notion that proceedings of an official character began with sacred ceremonials.
_	Intrinsic to this worldview is the notion that all experiences are influenced by prior experiences, and will influence all future experiences.
_	Patrick and Sydnor emphasize the notion that gospel music is "sentimental", quoting Sankey as saying, "Before I sing I must feel", and they call attention to the comparison of the original version of Rowley's "I Will Sing the Wondrous Story" with Sankey's version.
_	Efforts to municipalize often also begin with the sentiment that the IOU is not managed well and the notion that by undertaking municipalization of electricity services, a city government can better capture profits and exercise greater control over electricity generation and distribution (also often tying this process to sustainability measures).
_	Hiley gave evidence to the notion that the ontology of implicate and explicate orders could be understood as a process described in terms of an underlying non-commutative algebra, from which spacetime could be abstracted as one possible representation.
_	Ronne disproved the notion that the continent was divided in two and established that East and West Antarctica was one single continent, i.e. that the Weddell Sea and the Ross Sea are not connected.
_	Those who upheld the notion that Christ was co-eternal and con-substantial with the Father were led by the young archdeacon Athanasius.
_	Foremost, Ehrenreich attacks the notion that low-wage jobs require only unskilled labor.
_	Krug strongly opposed the notion that libraries should censor the material that they provide to patrons.
_	The more recent "Product Data Exchange Specification" (PDES) project in the U.S., the related ISO Standard for the exchange of product model data (STEP) and the Computer Integrated Manufacture Open Systems Architecture (CIMOSA) [ISO87] project in the European Economic Community have whole heartedly accepted the notion that useful data sharing is not possible without formal semantic data models of the context the data describes.
_	Thomm Ander Coney, is intent on taking to the stars with the notion that humanity has ruined its homeworld, but can use the lessons of the past to create a utopia out in the universe.
_	By chance, Takumi encounters Mari and followed her on the notion that the bag she carried was the one stolen from him three days prior, getting caught up in her war with the Orphnoch as he reluctantly transforms into Kamen Rider Faiz to fight off the Orphnochs pursuing her for the Faiz Gear.
_	Among other ideas, Cameron advanced the notion that downsizing is usually not an effective business strategy because of the ways it is implemented.
_	The F.A.Q for alt.cyberpunk, mirrored on the website, rejects the notion that there is a "cyberpunk fashion".
_	In "Eichmann in Jerusalem", Hannah Arendt disputes the notion that "Obersturmbannführer" was a rank of significance, pointing out that Eichmann spent the war "dreaming" about promotion to "Standartenführer".
_	Instead, apart from the story, there is a general feeling of detachment from the game and its main gameplay elements giving rise to the notion that most who play it will do so only to find out how the tales of Mors and Alester twist and turn on their way to conclusion."
_	The "quantifying in" idiom captures the notion that the variable-binding operator (for example, the existential quantifier 'something') "reaches into", so to speak, the non-extensional context to bind the variable occurring within its scope.
_	Leavell disagreed with the notion that Dudek co-wrote the song, noting that Betts created the melody of the song and its rhythm.
_	They are premised on the notion that to be effective, the quantitative strategy must be applied and the emotion of the trader has to be stripped from the process.
_	The song a humorous look on show business and the many problems that current entertainers endure, along with the notion that anyone can be famous as a result of reality television programs.
_	The study of Chinese was thought to be unladylike and went against the notion that only men should have access to the literature.
_	The Commission recognized the notion that governments can ratify, yet not enforce the Convention fully.
_	Vronsky the notion that he may visit Anna if she calls for him.
_	However, with the newfound ability to manipulate the final product, the notion that photographs depicted "truth" was soon shattered.
_	The next day Rose reads some of Tholan's work which causes her to abandon the notion that he is an imposter.
_	In particular to "deconstruct" the notion that some books and writers are difficult because they deal with profound and difficult ideas.
_	He challenged the notion that Germanic barbarians had caused the Western Roman Empire to end and he challenged the notion that the end of the Western Roman Empire should be equated with the end of the office of emperor in Europe, which occurred in 476.
_	The laws Ginsburg targeted included those that on the surface appeared beneficial to women, but in fact reinforced the notion that women needed to be dependent on men.
_	However, film scholar Kim Wilkins rejected the notion that "Moonrise Kingdom" is a romance film.
_	On March 26, 2018, CEO Eddie Lampert himself said, "I'm not sure Kmart on its own could ever be a great retailer," stating the notion that the company is eagerly trying to shift to online shopping as opposed to brick and mortar stores.
_	A commonly repeated theme by those supporting censorship, and one mentioned in the Code itself was the notion that the common people needed to be saved from themselves by the more refined cultural elite.
_	To Archbishop Demetrios, the notion that the saints' relics were intermingled in the dust with the remains of the attack victims only serves to sanctify the site further.
_	The polymath Michael Psellos of the 11th century inherited the notion that the "stryggai" and "gelloudes" were "interchangeable".
_	The phrase "parson's nose" comes from the notion that an English parson may 'have his nose up in the air', upturned like the chicken's rear end.
_	He promotes the rebelling of the notion that hierarchies can dictate people’s identities.
_	He did, however, dispute the notion that he would willingly accept dubious positions in order to complicate tactics, a characteristic he attributed more to Tal.
_	Favre disputed the notion that he does not want to play for Green Bay and said that while he understands the organization has decided to move on, they should now allow him to do the same.
_	More recently, the notion that visual art need not be conceived solely in terms of perpetually fixed objects is embodied in performance and installation art by virtue of their unfolding and temporary qualities.
_	At the same time, British Israelism became associated with various pseudo-archaeological pyramidology theories, such as the notion that the Pyramid of Khufu contained a prophetic numerology of the British peoples.
_	The location of Kirkjubø, only 5 km to the south east on the same coast, supports the notion that there was a heathen shrine at Velbastað.
_	The term "life cycle" refers to the notion that a fair, holistic assessment requires the assessment of raw-material production, manufacture, distribution, use and disposal including all intervening transportation steps necessary or caused by the product's existence.
_	However, the notion that urban land is tantamount to state ownership and, therefore, excludes private ownership had been formally disputed by the State Land Administration up to the early 1980s.
_	It was inspired by the notion that a manned moon landing would ruin the moon as a poetic trope and possibly lead to a collapse of moral values.
_	According to the book "American Countercultures", Ross and others forwarded the notion that charismatic leaders were able to brainwash college-aged youths, and that such cases were in need of forcible removal from the cult environment and deprogramming.
_	Results support the notion that the running interferes with adaptation to the new feeding schedule and is associated with the reward system in the brain.
_	Further to this is the notion that you are trying to achieve something that is beyond good or bad, right or wrong.
_	The principle of macromolecular crowding is derived from the notion that "in vivo" cells reside in a highly crowded/dense extracellular space and therefore the conversion of the "de novo" synthesised procollagen to collagen I is rapid.
_	The "Los Angeles Times" dismissed the notion that he got the name from a baking powder, Arm & Hammer.
_	But as Krim also told Webb's biographer Nick Schou, "The zeal that helped make Gary a relentless reporter was coupled with an inability to question himself, to entertain the notion that he might have erred."
_	Sterling is based on the notion that one way to generate interesting fractal images is by using elaborate color filters and shading.
_	John Podhoretz of "The Weekly Standard" argued that "Avatar" revealed "hatred of the military and American institutions and the notion that to be human is just way uncool."
_	Overall, the researchers based their experiment on the notion that the more time a toddler spends being attentive towards a novel potential threat the greater the chance that they will experience issues with the regulation of distress, which can predict anxious behavior such as social inhibition.
_	Although there has been a lot of debate regarding homosexuality, there is evidence that supports the notion that individuals are born with their sexual orientation.
_	The most popular story involves the notion that if you were to leave your car in neutral at the bottom of the hill, a ghost will push you up the hill and leave handprints on the back bumper.
_	The eastern ascetics saw their spiritually disciplined life as a journey of steps, adopting the notion that all were equal in God’s eyes, each finding oneself on a stairway of godliness that led ultimately towards eternity with God.
_	The introduction goes on to say that "Once he attained lichdom, Acererak ceased paying homage to Orcus, lending credence to the notion that his worship had never been more than a means to an end."
_	Although there is some research that supports the notion that eye movement can indicate visual and auditory (but not kinesthetic) components of thought in that moment, the existence of a preferred representational system ascertainable from external cues (an important part of original NLP theory) was discounted by research in the 1980s.
_	One of the most noticeable changes was the emergence of "all-finance", the notion that banking and insurance companies break out of their traditional spheres of activity, and, through mergers, takeovers, and strategic alliances, look instead to offer their clients a suite of banking, insurance, stockbroking, and financial services products.
_	Evolutionary Archaeology is based on the notion that claims culture exhibits key Darwinian evolutionary properties.
_	The second stage, from roughly the late 1930s to the 1940s, during which he developed the notion that "binary distinctive features" were the foundational element in language, and that such distinctiveness is "mere otherness" or differentiation.
_	Ibn Dawud also rejected the notion that verdicts of the first generation of Muslims could constitute a source of law.
_	However, young children may not be eloquent enough to have any other feasible methods of persuasion, and consequently the notion that adverts are specifically designed to encourage young children to nag could be argued not to be the case.
_	The wormhole's discovery cements in Opaka's and other Bajorans' minds the notion that Sisko is the Emissary of the Prophets, a title and set of responsibilities with which Sisko is initially ill at ease.
_	Advocates of mind uploading point to Moore's law to support the notion that the necessary computing power is expected to become available within a few decades.
_	Peasants and their supporters advocated the notion that each family was supposed to receive at least four hectares of land; in their system, which made note of differences in local traditional, peasants living in wetlands were to be assigned 16 "pogoane" (approx. eight hectares), those living in plains 14 (approx. seven hectares), inhabitants of hilly areas 11 (between five and six hectares), while people inhabiting the Southern Carpathian areas were supposed to receive eight "pogoane" (approx. four hectares).
_	Duveen played an important role in selling to self-made industrialists on the notion that buying art was also buying upper-class status.
_	At the time, corporate spokespeople dismissed the notion that the Honeywell Project's activities had any part in their decision to do this.
_	In his 1798 paper, Rumford acknowledged that he had predecessors in the notion that heat was a form of motion.
_	But conflation of these two different concepts leads to the notion that all ideological ideas should be treated with respect, rather than just the right to hold these ideas.
_	In keeping with the notion that Kane had been scarred by the fire—and to conceal Jacobs' identity—the character wore a mask, sported long hair, and wore red and black ring attire that almost covered his entire body.
_	This has led some ecologists to "reiterate that the notion that species clearly aggregate into discrete, homogeneous trophic levels is fiction."
_	The judge further wrote, "the theory that homosexuality is a disorder is not novel but, like the notion that the earth is flat and the sun revolves around it, instead is outdated and refuted.
_	The case was notable for a number of comments made during the course of judgment about the superior nature of the English courts to the French ones, and rebuffing the notion that it would be inappropriate for the English courts to hear cases that were otherwise unconnected with England.
_	A more familiar example in the Western world today is the notion that non-democratic states, because of their internal composition, start wars.
_	An ABC executive recalled, "I remember the creepiness of this woman in this horrible, horrible crash, and David teasing us with the notion that people are chasing her.
_	In relation to Chopin's Preludes, Op. 28, Schonberg says: "It also is hard to escape the notion that Chopin was very familiar with Hummel's now-forgotten Op. 67, composed in 1815 – a set of twenty-four preludes in all major and minor keys, starting with C major".
_	In his writings, Du Toit put forward the notion that Afrikaners were a distinct nationality with a fatherland (South Africa) and their own language (Afrikaans) and that the "volk's" destiny was to rule South Africa.
_	Most findings also support the notion that risk arbitrage experiences very little beta in most market environments.
_	Further, a core principle in CMT is the notion that behavior is thought to be regulated by perceptions of safety versus danger.
_	In some parishes, the notion that the surface of the altar should only be touched by those in holy orders is maintained.
_	The movie is described by critic Roger Ebert as "one of the great scare stories of our time, the notion that deep in the uncharted rain forests, deadly diseases are lurking, and if they ever escape their jungle homes and enter the human bloodstream, there will be a new plague the likes of which we have never seen."
_	Before that time, U.S. jurisprudence followed the notion that contracts, such as a postnuptial agreements, could not be valid when executed between a husband and wife.
_	However, the other states did not follow suit and several rejected the notion that states could nullify federal law.
_	In the 1980s and 1990s, the Eskaya community attracted the interest of local mystics who promoted the notion that their language was of exotic origin.
_	This definition encompasses the notion that in a secure scheme, the adversary should learn no information from seeing a ciphertext.
_	The later poem literally emphasizes and politicizes the French poet Blaise Cendrars' declaration and manifesto, "Poetry is in the Streets" ("Le Poesy es en la rue"), while extending his claim to the notion that the poetry emerging from these streets is historical and demands a radical disclosure and expression regarding the ideologies of power and censorship underlying and undermining the subject.
_	In it, he argues against "interpretivism" of which Hugo Black was an exponent, "originalism" advanced by Robert Bork, and "textualism" advanced by Antonin Scalia, by contending that "strict construction" fails to do justice to the open texture of many of the Constitution's provisions; at the same time, though, he maintains that the notion that judges may infer broad moral rights and values from the Constitution is radically undemocratic, whether the "moralism" of Ronald Dworkin or the libertarian Richard Epstein.
_	When taken in conjunction with the laboratory-based experiments, there is strong support for the notion that negative information generally has a stronger pull on attention than does positive information.
_	Based on his formulae, and on the notion that the "aperture ratio" should be kept fixed in comparisons across formats, Abney says:
_	Smith provides a lucid, probing and astute overview of the death drive in Freud, but also leads the reader into strange and compelling new terrain, exploring the notion that works of art have 'an unconscious of their own'.
_	Among his defenders, Robert Orledge has challenged the notion that in his pared-down handling of the medium Satie was simply "making a virtue of his technical limitations":
_	The Indians residing in the Black Hills feared the notion that if they accept the award their land would be officially sold.
_	Shirin's further teachings include the idea of a Law of Life, the concept that storytelling may be a genetic characteristic of humans, the promotion of animism, and the notion that totalitarian agriculture results in ecological imbalance and over-population, which themselves are rapidly leading to humankind's self-destruction.
_	A source of confusion is the notion that a transitional form between two different taxonomic groups must be a direct ancestor of one or both groups.
_	A guiding principle to all college activity has been the notion that Piula should be, as near as possible, a Christian village.
_	On that night, the song’s expression of a romantic promise fulfilled clearly spoke to the hope that political promises would be fulfilled, not to mention the notion that, at last, an African-American had assumed this nation's highest honor.
_	It's the fact that she sings quite proudly about being a total doormat with the notion that THAT is sexy."
_	He maintains that this portrait cannot be fully interpreted until scholars accept the notion that objects can have multiple associations.
_	Harbison urges the notion that one needs to conduct a multivalent reading of the painting that includes references to the secular and sexual context of the Burgundian court, as well as religious and sacramental references to marriage.
_	This is word-sense disambiguation (a concept that is evolving away from the notion that words have discrete senses, but rather are characterized by the ways in which they are used, i.e., their contexts).
_	In addition, CTR centers around the notion that discourse is delivered in a prescribed, mechanical form, leading to its pedagogical focus on grammar, spelling, syntax, and uniform style and arrangement.
_	Born of domestic beliefs, the ritual of punishing suicide, which is usually concerned with the suicidal corpse, embodies the notion that suicide is polluting, and that the suicide should be ostracized by the community of the living and the dead.
_	“I could not wrap my head around the notion that an African-American woman in 1952 would willingly have a relationship with a town’s sainted physician.
_	This investigation proceeded on the basis of the notion that this mass-murder constituted a crime against humanity which cannot be subject to any amnesty or statute of limitations.
_	Harris continues by examining the nature of belief itself, challenging the notion that we can in any sense enjoy "freedom" of belief, and arguing that "belief is a fount of action "in potentia"."
_	The newspaper also rejected the notion that the wreckage should be compared to , a sailing ship that wrecked on a beach near Astoria in the early 1900s, and whose remnants are a popular tourist draw.
_	Together they were able to immunize guinea pigs by inoculating them with heat-treated dead bacteria, calling into question the notion that only weakened, not dead, bacteria can be used to immunize.
_	Mason and Deane JJ, in dissent, rejected the notion that functions, such as those granted under s 20 of the "Telecommunications (Interceptions) Act 1979 (Cth)" to provide for the ability of judges to issue telephone taps, could be exercised constitutionally by 'judges' as defined by s 18 of the Act. Mason and Deane JJ were of the opinion that conferring non-judicial functions could not be granted to a Chapter III court without undermining the doctrine in "Boilermaker's Case" and the separation of powers prescribed by the Constitution as 'a safeguard of individual liberty'.
